<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ACN/ACN-8K-20090901085959.txt.gz
TIME:20090901085959
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Unregistered Sales of Equity Securities	Material Modifications to Rights of Security Holders	Changes in Control of Registrant	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Unregistered Sales of Equity Securities
ITEM: Material Modifications to Rights of Security Holders
ITEM: Changes in Control of Registrant
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Assumption and Amendment of Equity Compensation Plans
On September 1, 2009, Accenture plc and Accenture Ltd entered into an Assumption and General Amendment Agreement (the "Assumption Agreement") pursuant to which Accenture Ltd assigned to Accenture plc, and Accenture plc assumed, the following equity incentive plans of Accenture Ltd, including all award or grant documents or agreements thereunder: the 2001 Share Incentive Plan and the 2001 Employee Share Purchase Plan.
All awards or grants under the equity incentive plans continue to be exercisable, issuable, held, available or vest upon the same terms and conditions as under the awards or grants prior to their assumption by Accenture plc, except that upon the exercise, issuance, holding, availability or vesting of those awards or grants, Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares are now issuable or available, or benefits or other amounts determined, in lieu of Accenture Ltd Class A common shares.
This Assumption Agreement is effective as of immediately prior to the effective time of the Transaction (as such term is defined in Item 8.01 below).
The Assumption Agreement is filed as Exhibit 10.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated by reference herein.
Assumption and Amendment of Certain Agreements related to Accenture plc Class X ordinary shares
Accenture plc, as successor to Accenture Ltd, has agreed with the original holders of Accenture SCA Class I common shares and Accenture Canada Holdings Inc. exchangeable shares not to redeem any Class X ordinary share of such holder if the redemption would reduce the number of Class X ordinary shares held by that holder to a number that is less than the number of Accenture SCA Class I common shares or Accenture Canada Holdings Inc. exchangeable shares owned by that holder.
With respect to the Accenture Canada Holdings Inc. exchangeable shares, Accenture plc has entered into the First Supplemental Agreement to Support Agreement with Accenture Ltd and Accenture Canada Holdings Inc., dated September 1, 2009 and the First Supplemental Agreement to Exchange Trust Agreement with Accenture Ltd, Accenture Canada Holdings Inc. and Accenture Inc., dated September 1, 2009, which are filed as Exhibits 10.2 and 10.3, respectively, to this Current Report on Form 8-K and are incorporated by reference herein.
Also related to the exchange of Accenture plc Class X ordinary shares for Accenture SCA Class I common shares and Accenture Canada Holdings Inc. exchangeable shares, Accenture plc entered into an Assumption Agreement of the Amended and Restated Voting Agreement, dated September 1, 2009 (the "Amended Voting Agreement Assumption"), pursuant to which it assumed all rights and obligations of Accenture Ltd under the Amended and Restated Voting Agreement, dated as of February 3, 2005. The Amended Voting Agreement Assumption is filed as Exhibit 10.4 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated by reference herein.
 
On September 1, 2009, pursuant to the Transaction, each holder of Accenture Ltd Class A common shares outstanding immediately before the Transaction received one Accenture plc Class A ordinary share, in exchange for each outstanding Class A common share of Accenture Ltd (or, in the case of fractional interests in Class A common shares, cash), and each holder of Accenture Ltd Class X common shares outstanding immediately before the Transaction received one Accenture plc Class X ordinary share, in exchange for each outstanding Accenture Ltd Class X common share.
In connection with the Transaction, Accenture plc issued a total of approximately 622,956,209 Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares and 89,918,808 Accenture plc Class X ordinary shares (excluding Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares issued in exchange for Accenture Ltd Class A common shares held by subsidiaries of Accenture Ltd) to the holders of Accenture Ltd Class A common shares and Class X common shares, respectively, immediately prior to the effective time of the Transaction. The terms and conditions of the Scheme of Arrangement (as such term is defined below in Item 8.01) resulting in the issuance of the securities were sanctioned by the Supreme Court of Bermuda, after a hearing upon that scheme at which all Accenture Ltd shareholders had a right to appear and of which adequate notice had been given. The issuance was exempt from the registration requirements of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Securities Act"), by virtue of Section 3(a)(10) of the Securities Act.
The information included under Item 5.03 and Item 8.01 is incorporated by reference herein.
 
The description of the Transaction under Item 8.01 is incorporated by reference herein.
 
As of September 1, 2009, following the completion of the Transaction, the directors and executive officers of Accenture Ltd immediately prior to the Transaction became the directors and executive officers of Accenture plc. Accenture Ltd's directors carry their terms of office over to the Accenture plc Board of Directors. The Board of Directors of Accenture plc is divided into three classes serving staggered three-year terms. The current class I, II and III terms will expire at the 2011, 2012 and 2010 annual general meetings, respectively.
In connection with the completion of the Transaction, Accenture International Srl, an indirect subsidiary of Accenture plc, has entered into indemnification agreements with each of the directors of Accenture plc that provide for indemnification and expense advancement and include related provisions intended to facilitate the indemnitee's receipt of such benefits. A form of the indemnification agreement is filed as Exhibit 10.5 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated by reference herein.
 
On September 1, 2009, in connection with and effective upon completion of the Transaction, the rights of shareholders of Accenture plc will be governed by its memorandum and articles of association. The summary of the material terms of the memorandum and articles of association and the comparison of the rights of shareholders under those documents described under the headings "Description of Accenture plc Share Capital" and "Comparison of Rights of Shareholders and Powers of the Board of Directors" in Accenture Ltd's definitive proxy statement dated June 24, 2009 and filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "Commission") on June 24, 2009 is incorporated by reference herein. The complete text of the memorandum and articles of association of Accenture plc is filed as Exhibit 3.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated by reference herein. The summary of the memorandum and articles of association of Accenture plc is qualified in its entirety by reference to Exhibit 3.1.
 
THE TRANSACTION
On September 1, 2009, Accenture Ltd and Accenture plc completed a transaction effected by way of a scheme of arrangement under Bermuda law (the "Scheme of Arrangement") pursuant to which each holder of Accenture Ltd Class A common shares or Class X common shares outstanding immediately prior to the effectiveness of the Scheme of Arrangement received one Accenture plc Class A ordinary share or Class X ordinary share in exchange for each outstanding Accenture Ltd Class A common share or Class X common share, as applicable, and cash for any fractional shares (the "Transaction"). As a result of the Transaction, Accenture Ltd became a direct, wholly-owned subsidiary of Accenture plc. On September 1, 2009, Accenture plc issued a press release announcing the completion of the Transaction. The press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
Prior to the Transaction, the Accenture Ltd Class A common shares were registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act"), and listed on the New York Stock Exchange ("NYSE") under the symbol "ACN" and the Accenture Ltd Class X common shares were registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Exchange Act. As a result of the Transaction, all of the Accenture Ltd Class A and Class X common shares were cancelled and holders thereof received Accenture plc Class A and Class X ordinary shares, as applicable, on a one-for-one basis (or, in the case of fractional interests in Class A common shares, cash). Accordingly, Accenture Ltd requested that the NYSE file with the Commission a Form 25 to remove the Accenture Ltd Class A common shares from listing on the NYSE. Accenture Ltd expects to file a Form 15 with the Commission to terminate the registration of the Accenture Ltd Class A and Class X common shares and suspend its reporting obligations under Sections 13 and 15(d) of the Exchange Act.
Pursuant to Rule 12g-3(a) promulgated under the Exchange Act, the Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares are deemed registered under Section 12(b) of the Exchange Act. The Accenture plc Class X ordinary shares are deemed registered under Section 12(g) of the Exchange Act pursuant to a separately filed Current Report on Form 8-K. The Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares have been approved for listing on the NYSE and began trading under the symbol "ACN," the same symbol under which the Accenture Ltd Class A common shares previously traded, on September 1, 2009.
DESCRIPTION OF ACCENTURE PLC SHARE CAPITAL
The following description of our share capital is a summary. For the purposes of the following description, references to the terms "Accenture," "we," "our Company," "our" and "us" refer to Accenture plc and its subsidiaries. This summary is not complete and is subject to the complete text of Accenture plc's memorandum and articles of association, which is filed as Exhibit 3.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and incorporated by reference herein. We encourage you to read this document carefully.
Capital Structure
The authorized share capital of Accenture plc is 40,000 and US$517,500 divided into 40,000 ordinary shares with a nominal value of 1 per share, 20,000,000,000 Class A ordinary shares with a nominal value of US$0.0000225 per share, 1,000,000,000 Class X ordinary shares with a nominal value of US$0.0000225 per share and 2,000,000,000 undesignated shares with a nominal value of US$0.0000225 per share. The authorized share capital includes 40,000 ordinary shares with a nominal value of 1 per share in order to satisfy statutory requirements for all Irish public limited companies commencing operations.
Authorized Share Capital.
Accenture plc has the authority to issue authorized but unissued Class A ordinary shares, Class X ordinary shares or undesignated shares. The undesignated shares may be designated and issued as preferred shares, without further vote or action by our shareholders up to the maximum number authorized.
The authorized share capital may be increased or reduced by way of an ordinary resolution of Accenture plc's shareholders. The shares comprising the authorized share capital of Accenture plc may be divided into shares of such nominal value as the resolution shall prescribe.
As a matter of Irish law, the directors of a company may issue authorized but unissued new ordinary or preferred shares without shareholder approval once authorized to do so by the articles of association of the company or by an ordinary resolution adopted by the shareholders at a general meeting. An ordinary resolution requires over 50% of the votes of a company's shareholders cast at a general meeting. The authority conferred can be granted for a maximum period of five years, at which point it must be renewed by the shareholders of the company by an ordinary resolution. Because of this requirement of Irish law, the articles of association of Accenture plc authorize the Board of Directors of Accenture plc to issue new ordinary or preferred shares without shareholder approval for a period of five years from the date of Accenture plc's incorporation on June 10, 2009.
The rights and restrictions to which the ordinary shares are subject are prescribed in Accenture plc's articles of association. Accenture plc's articles of association entitle the Board of Directors, without shareholder approval, to determine the terms of the undesignated shares issued by Accenture plc. The Accenture plc Board of Directors is authorized, without obtaining any vote or consent of the holders of any class or series of shares unless expressly provided by the terms of that class or series of shares, to provide from time to time for the issuance of other classes or series of preferred shares through the issue of the authorized but unissued undesignated shares and to establish the characteristics of each class or series, including the number of shares, designations, relative voting rights, dividend rights, liquidation and other rights, redemption, repurchase or exchange rights and any other preferences and relative, participating, optional or other rights and limitations not inconsistent with applicable law.
Irish law does not recognize fractional shares held of record; accordingly, Accenture plc's articles of association do not provide for the issuance of fractional Accenture plc shares and the official Irish register of Accenture plc will not reflect any fractional shares.
Under Irish law and the memorandum and articles of association of Accenture plc there are no limitations on the right of nonresidents of Ireland or owners who are not citizens of Ireland to hold or vote shares of Accenture plc.
Immediately prior to the Transaction, the issued share capital of Accenture plc was 40,000, comprised of 40,000 ordinary shares, with nominal value of 1 per share (the "Euro Share Capital"). In connection with the consummation of the Transaction, the Euro Share Capital was acquired by Accenture plc and was then cancelled by Accenture plc. Accenture plc issued approximately 622,956,209 Class A ordinary shares and 89,918,808 Class X ordinary shares (excluding 54,063,554 Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares issued in respect of Accenture Ltd Class A common shares held by subsidiaries of Accenture Ltd), each with a nominal value of US$0.0000225, equal to the number of whole Accenture Ltd Class A and Class X common shares that were cancelled as part of the Transaction. Accenture plc Class A and Class X ordinary shares issued pursuant to the Transaction are fully paid and non-assessable. There are no ordinary shares of 1.00 or undesignated shares of US$0.0000225 in issue.
Issued Share Capital.
Pre-emption Rights, Share Warrants and Share Options
Certain statutory pre-emption rights apply automatically in favor of Accenture plc shareholders where shares in Accenture plc are to be issued for cash. However, Accenture plc has opted out of these pre-emption rights in its articles of association as permitted under Irish law. Because Irish law requires this opt-out to be renewed every five years by a special resolution of the shareholders, Accenture plc's articles of association provide that this opt-out will lapse five years after the incorporation of Accenture plc on June 10, 2009. A special resolution requires not less than 75% of the votes of Accenture plc shareholders cast at a general meeting. If the opt-out is not renewed, shares issued for cash must be offered to pre-existing shareholders of Accenture plc to their existing shareholding before the shares can be issued to any new shareholders. The statutory pre-emption rights do not apply where shares are issued for non-cash consideration and do not apply to the issue of non-equity shares (that is, shares that have the right to participate only up to a specified amount in any income or capital distribution).
pro rata
The articles of association of Accenture plc provide that, subject to any shareholder approval requirement under any laws, regulations or the rules of any stock exchange to which Accenture plc is subject, the Board of Directors is authorized, from time to time, in its discretion, to grant such persons, for such periods and upon such terms as the Board of Directors deems advisable, options to purchase such number of shares of any class or classes or of any series of any class as the Board of Directors may deem advisable, and to cause warrants or other appropriate instruments evidencing such options to be issued. The Irish Companies Acts provide that directors may issue share warrants or options without shareholder approval once authorized to do so by the articles of association or an ordinary resolution of shareholders. The Board of Directors may issue shares upon exercise of warrants or options without shareholder approval or authorization.
Accenture plc is subject to the rules of the NYSE that require shareholder approval of certain share issuances.
Dividends
Under Irish law, dividends and distributions may only be made from distributable reserves. Distributable reserves, broadly, means the accumulated realized profits of Accenture plc less accumulated realized losses of Accenture plc. At incorporation, there were no "distributable reserves." No dividend may be made unless the net assets of Accenture plc are equal to, or in excess of, the aggregate of Accenture plc's called up share capital plus undistributable reserves and the distribution does not reduce Accenture plc's net assets below such aggregate. Undistributable reserves include the share premium account, the capital redemption reserve fund and the amount by which Accenture plc's accumulated unrealized profits, so far as not previously utilized by any capitalization, exceed Accenture plc's accumulated unrealized losses, so far as not previously written off in a reduction or reorganization of capital.
The determination as to whether or not Accenture plc has sufficient distributable reserves to fund a dividend must be made by reference to "relevant accounts" of Accenture plc. The "relevant accounts" will be either the last set of unconsolidated annual audited financial statements or unaudited financial statements prepared in accordance with the Irish Companies Acts, which give a "true and fair view" of Accenture plc's unconsolidated financial position and accord with accepted accounting practice. The relevant accounts must be filed in the Companies Registration Office (the official public registry for companies in Ireland).
We received the approval of Accenture Ltd's shareholders at the August 5, 2009 shareholder meetings to approve a reduction of the share premium account (similar to additional paid-in capital) of Accenture plc to establish distributable reserves of Accenture plc. Before the transaction, the previous shareholders of Accenture plc (Accenture Ltd and its nominees) passed a resolution to approve the reduction of the share premium account of Accenture plc. We are currently in the process of seeking the approval of the Irish High Court, which is required for the reduction of the share premium account to be effective and for the distributable reserves to be created.
The mechanism as to who declares a dividend and when a dividend shall become payable is governed by the articles of association of Accenture plc. Accenture plc's articles of association authorize the directors to declare such dividends as appear justified from the profits of Accenture plc without the approval of the shareholders at a general meeting. The Board of Directors may also recommend a dividend to be approved and declared by the shareholders at a general meeting. Although the shareholders may direct that the payment be made by distribution of assets, shares or cash, no dividend issued may exceed the amount recommended by the directors. The dividends can be declared and paid in the form of cash or non-cash assets.
The directors of Accenture plc may deduct from any dividend payable to any member all sums of money (if any) payable by such member to Accenture plc in relation to the Accenture plc ordinary shares.
The directors of Accenture plc are also entitled to issue shares with preferred rights to participate in dividends declared by Accenture plc in one or more series and to fix the rights, preferences, privileges and restrictions attaching to those shares, including dividend rights, conversion rights, voting rights, redemption terms and prices, liquidation preferences and the numbers of shares constituting any series and the designation of any series, without further vote or action by the shareholders. The holders of such preferred shares may, depending on their terms, be entitled to claim arrears of a declared dividend out of subsequently declared dividends in priority to ordinary shareholders.
Any series of preferred shares could, as determined by Accenture plc's Board of Directors at the time of issuance, rank senior to the Accenture plc ordinary shares with respect to dividends, voting rights, redemption and/or liquidation rights. These preferred shares are of the type commonly known as "blank-check" preferred stock.
Holders of Accenture plc Class X ordinary shares are not entitled to receive dividends and are not entitled to be paid any amount upon a winding-up of Accenture plc.
Share Repurchases, Redemptions and Conversions
Overview
Article 5(b)(iv) of Accenture plc's articles of association provides that any ordinary share which Accenture plc has acquired or agreed to acquire shall be deemed to be a redeemable share. Accordingly, for Irish law purposes, the repurchase of ordinary shares by Accenture plc will technically be effected as a redemption of those shares as described below under "Repurchases and Redemptions by Accenture plc." If the articles of association of Accenture plc did not contain Article 5(b)(iv), repurchases by Accenture plc would be subject to many of the same rules that apply to purchases of Accenture plc shares by subsidiaries described below under "Purchases by Subsidiaries of Accenture plc," including the shareholder approval requirements described below and the requirement that any on-market purchases be effected on a "recognized stock exchange." Except where otherwise noted, when we refer elsewhere in this Description of Accenture plc Share Capital to repurchasing or buying back Accenture plc Class A or Class X ordinary shares, we are referring to the redemption of ordinary shares by Accenture plc pursuant to Article 5(b)(iv) of the articles of association or the purchase of Accenture plc ordinary shares by a subsidiary of Accenture plc, in each case in accordance with the Accenture plc articles of association and Irish law as described below.
Repurchases and Redemptions by Accenture plc
Under Irish law, a company can issue redeemable shares and redeem them out of distributable reserves (which are described above under "Dividends") or the proceeds of a new issue of shares for that purpose. The issue of redeemable shares may only be made by Accenture plc where the nominal value of the issued share capital that is not redeemable is not less than 10% of the nominal value of the total issued share capital of Accenture plc. All redeemable shares must also be fully
paid and the terms of redemption of the shares must provide for payment on redemption. Redeemable shares may, upon redemption, be cancelled or held in treasury. Shareholder approval will not be required to redeem Accenture plc shares, and these shares are redeemable at the option of Accenture plc.
The Board of Directors of Accenture plc will also be entitled to issue preferred shares which may be redeemed at the option of either Accenture plc or the shareholder, depending on the terms of such preferred shares.
Repurchased and redeemed Class A ordinary shares may be cancelled or held as treasury shares. The nominal value of treasury shares held by Accenture plc at any time must not exceed 10% of the nominal value of the issued share capital of Accenture plc. While Accenture plc holds shares as treasury shares, it cannot exercise any voting rights in respect of those shares. Treasury shares may be cancelled by Accenture plc or re-issued subject to certain conditions.
Purchases by Subsidiaries of Accenture plc
Under Irish law, it may be permissible for an Irish or non-Irish subsidiary to purchase Accenture plc shares either on-market or off-market. A general authority of the shareholders of Accenture plc is required to allow a subsidiary of Accenture plc to make on-market purchases of Accenture plc shares; however, as long as this general authority has been granted, no specific shareholder authority for a particular on-market purchase by a subsidiary of Accenture plc shares is required. We expect that Accenture plc will seek to renew such general authority, which must expire no later than 18 months after the date on which it was granted, at the first annual general meeting of Accenture plc in 2010 and at subsequent annual general meetings. In order for a subsidiary of Accenture plc to make an on-market purchase of Accenture plc's shares, such shares must be purchased on a "recognized stock exchange."
The NYSE, on which the Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares are listed, is not currently specified as a recognized stock exchange for this purpose by Irish law. We understand, however, that it is likely that the Irish authorities will take appropriate steps in the near future to add the NYSE to the list of recognized stock exchanges. For an off-market purchase by a subsidiary of Accenture plc, the proposed purchase contract must be authorized by special resolution of the shareholders of Accenture plc before the contract is entered into. The person whose shares are to be bought back cannot vote in favor of the special resolution and, for at least 21 days prior to the special resolution, the purchase contract must be on display or must be available for inspection by shareholders at the registered office of Accenture plc.
The number of shares held by the subsidiaries of Accenture plc at any time will count as treasury shares for the purposes of the permitted treasury share threshold of 10% of the nominal value of the issued share capital of Accenture plc. While a subsidiary holds Accenture plc shares, it cannot exercise any voting rights in respect of those shares. The acquisition of the Accenture plc shares by a subsidiary must be funded out of distributable reserves of the subsidiary.
Existing Share Repurchase Program
Because repurchases of Accenture plc shares by Accenture plc will technically be effected as a redemption of those shares pursuant to Article 5(b)(iv) of the articles of association, separate shareholder approval for such repurchases will not be required.
However, because purchases of Accenture plc shares by subsidiaries of Accenture plc may be made only on a "recognized stock exchange" and only if the required shareholder approval has been obtained, we expect that the shareholder authorization for purchases by subsidiaries of Accenture plc described above will be effective as of the date on which the NYSE becomes a recognized stock exchange for this purpose.
Bonus Shares
Under Accenture plc's articles of association, the Board of Directors may resolve to capitalize any amount credited to any reserve or fund available for distribution or the share premium account of Accenture plc for issuance and distribution to shareholders as fully paid bonus shares on the same basis of entitlement as would apply in respect of a dividend distribution.
Consolidation and Division; Subdivision
Under its articles of association, Accenture plc may by ordinary resolution of its Class A and Class X ordinary shareholders, voting as a single class, consolidate and divide all or any of its share capital into shares of larger nominal value than its existing shares or subdivide its shares into smaller amounts than is fixed by its articles of association.
Reduction of Share Capital
Accenture plc may, by ordinary resolution, reduce its authorized share capital. Accenture plc also may, by special resolution and subject to confirmation by the Irish High Court, reduce or cancel its issued share capital.
Meetings of Shareholders
Accenture plc is required to hold an annual general meeting within eighteen months of incorporation and at intervals of no more than fifteen months thereafter, provided that an annual general meeting is held in each calendar year following the first annual general meeting, no more than nine months after Accenture plc's fiscal year-end. The first annual general meeting of Accenture plc may be held outside Ireland. Thereafter, any annual general meeting may be held outside Ireland if a resolution so authorizing has been passed at the preceding annual general meeting. Because of the fifteen-month requirement described in this paragraph, Accenture plc's articles of association include a provision reflecting this requirement of Irish law. At any annual general meeting only such business shall be conducted as shall have been brought before the meeting (a) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or (b) by any member entitled to vote at such meeting who complies with the procedures set forth in the articles of association.
Extraordinary general meetings of Accenture plc may be convened by (i) the Board of Directors, (ii) on requisition of the shareholders holding not less than 10% of the paid up share capital of Accenture plc carrying voting rights or (iii) on requisition of Accenture plc's auditors. Extraordinary general meetings are generally held for the purposes of approving shareholder resolutions of Accenture plc as may be required from time to time. At any extraordinary general meeting only such business shall be conducted as is set forth in the notice thereof.
Notice of a general meeting must be given to all shareholders of Accenture plc and to the auditors of Accenture plc. The minimum notice periods under Irish law are 21 days' notice in writing for an annual general meeting or an extraordinary general meeting to approve a special resolution and 14 days' notice in writing for any other extraordinary general meeting. Accenture plc's articles of association provide a minimum notice period of 30 days for an annual general meeting and 21 days for an extraordinary general meeting to approve a special resolution to approximate the equivalent provisions of Accenture Ltd's bye-laws. Accenture plc's articles of association provide for a minimum notice period of 14 days' notice for all other extraordinary general meetings reflecting these requirements of Irish law.
In the case of an extraordinary general meeting convened by shareholders of Accenture plc, the proposed purpose of the meeting must be set out in the requisition notice. The requisition notice can contain any resolution. Upon receipt of this requisition notice, the Board of Directors has 21 days to convene a meeting of Accenture plc's shareholders to vote on the matters set out in the requisition notice. This meeting must be held within two months of the receipt of the requisition notice. If the Board of Directors does not convene the meeting within such 21-day period, the requisitioning shareholders, or any of them representing more than one half of the total voting rights of all of them, may themselves convene a meeting, which meeting must be held within three months of the receipt of the requisition notice.
The only matters which must, as a matter of Irish law, be transacted at an annual general meeting are the presentation of the annual accounts, balance sheet and reports of the directors and auditors, the appointment of auditors and the fixing of the auditor's remuneration (or delegation of same). If no resolution is made in respect of the reappointment of an auditor at an annual general meeting, the previous auditor will be deemed to have continued in office.
If the directors become aware that the net assets of Accenture plc are half or less of the amount of Accenture plc's share capital and share premium, the directors of Accenture plc must convene an extraordinary general meeting of Accenture plc's shareholders not later than 28 days from the date that they learn of this fact. This meeting must be convened for the purposes of considering whether any, and if so what, measures should be taken to address the situation.
Directors
The articles of association of Accenture plc provide for a Board of Directors that is divided into three classes serving staggered three-year terms. Directors are elected by the affirmative vote of a majority of the votes cast by shareholders. Shareholders do not have cumulative voting rights. Accordingly, the holders of a majority of the voting rights attaching to the Accenture plc Class A and Class X ordinary shares will, as a practical matter, be entitled to control the election of all directors. At each annual general meeting, directors will be elected for a full term of three years to succeed those directors of the relevant class whose terms are expiring. Any nominee for director who does not receive a majority of the votes cast is not elected to the Board of Directors. Holders of Class A and Class X ordinary shares are entitled to one vote per each such share at all meetings at which directors are elected. Accenture plc's articles of association provide for a minimum number of directors of eight. If at any time the number of directors falls below the minimum, the remaining directors may act only for the purposes of appointing additional directors to satisfy the requirements of the articles of association with respect to the minimum number of directors.
Accenture plc's articles of association provide that a director may be removed with or without cause at the request of not less than 75% of the other directors.
Voting
All votes at a general meeting will be decided by way of poll. Every shareholder shall on a poll have one vote for each Class A or Class X ordinary share that he or she holds as of the record date for the meeting (and, except as otherwise provided by the Irish Companies Acts or Accenture plc's memorandum and articles of association, the holders of Class A and Class X ordinary shares shall vote as a single class). Voting rights on a poll may be exercised by shareholders registered in Accenture plc's share register as of the record date for the meeting or by a duly appointed proxy of such a registered shareholder, which proxy need not be a shareholder. All proxies must be appointed in the manner prescribed by Accenture plc's articles of association. The articles of association of Accenture plc permit the appointment of proxies by the shareholders to be notified to Accenture plc electronically.
Except where a greater majority is required by Irish law or Accenture plc's memorandum and articles of association, any question proposed for consideration at any general meeting of Accenture plc or of any class of shareholders shall be decided by a simple majority of the votes cast by shareholders entitled to vote at such meeting.
In accordance with the articles of association of Accenture plc, the directors of Accenture plc may from time to time cause Accenture plc to issue preferred shares. These preferred shares may have such voting rights as may be specified in the terms of such preferred shares (e.g., they may carry more votes per share than ordinary shares or may entitle their holders to a class vote on such matters as may be specified in the terms of the preferred shares).
Treasury shares and shares of Accenture plc held by subsidiaries of Accenture plc will not be entitled to vote at general meetings of shareholders.
Irish law requires "special resolutions" of the shareholders at a general meeting to approve certain matters. A special resolution requires not less than 75% of the votes cast of Accenture plc's shareholders at a general meeting. This may be contrasted with "ordinary resolutions," which require a simple majority of the votes of Accenture plc's shareholders cast at a general meeting. Examples of matters requiring special resolutions include:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
A scheme of arrangement with one or more classes of shareholders requires a court order from the Irish High Court and the approval of: (1) not less than 75% by value of the voting members of each class of shares participating in the scheme of arrangement; and (2) more than 50% in number of the voting members of each class of shares participating in the scheme of arrangement, at a meeting called to approve the scheme.
Variation of Rights Attaching to a Class or Series of Shares
Variation of all or any special rights attached to any class of Accenture plc shares is addressed in the articles of association of Accenture plc as well as the Irish Companies Acts. Any variation by Accenture plc of class rights attaching to the issued Accenture plc shares must also be approved by a special resolution of the shareholders of the class affected or by the written consent of the holders of not less than 75% of the shareholders of the class affected.
Amendment of Governing Documents
Irish companies may only alter their memorandum and articles of association by the passing of a special resolution of shareholders. In addition, Paragraph 6 of the memorandum of association of Accenture plc provides that any amendment to that paragraph and to the provisions of Accenture plc's articles of association relating to mergers, any sale, lease or exchange by Accenture plc of all or substantially all of its property or assets and the appointment and removal of directors, which are not approved by Accenture plc's Board of Directors, must be approved by shareholders holding not less than 80% of Accenture plc's issued and outstanding voting shares.
Quorum for General Meetings
The presence of two shareholders, in person or by proxy and having the right to attend and vote at the meeting, and of the holders of more than 50% of the Accenture plc ordinary shares outstanding constitutes a quorum for the conduct of business (provided that, if Accenture plc has only one shareholder, one shareholder present in person or by proxy will constitute a quorum). No business may take place at a general meeting of Accenture plc if a quorum is not present in person or by proxy. The Board of Directors has no authority to waive quorum requirements stipulated in the articles of association of Accenture plc. Abstentions and broker "non-votes" will be counted as present for purposes of determining whether there is a quorum in respect of the proposals. A broker "non-vote" occurs when a nominee (such as a broker) holding shares for a beneficial owner abstains from voting on a particular proposal because the nominee does not have discretionary voting power for that proposal and has not received instructions from the beneficial owner on how to vote those shares.
Inspection of Books and Records
Under Irish law, shareholders have the right to: (i) receive a copy of the memorandum and articles of association of Accenture plc and any act of the Irish Government which alters the memorandum of association of Accenture plc; (ii) inspect and obtain copies of the minutes of general meetings and resolutions of Accenture plc; (iii) inspect and receive a copy of the register of shareholders, register of directors and secretaries, register of directors' interests and other statutory registers maintained by Accenture plc; (iv) receive copies of balance sheets and directors' and auditors' reports which have previously been sent to shareholders prior to an annual general meeting; and (v) receive balance sheets of a subsidiary company of Accenture plc which have previously been sent to shareholders prior to an annual general meeting for the preceding ten years. The auditors of Accenture plc will also have the right to inspect all books, records and vouchers of Accenture plc. The auditors' report must be circulated to the shareholders with Accenture plc's Irish Financial Statements 21 days before the annual general meeting and must be read to the shareholders at Accenture plc's annual general meeting.
Accenture plc's Board of Directors has adopted a resolution providing that its shareholders have the right to inspect, at a principal place of business in the United States, copies of certain of our books and records, including shareholder names, addresses, and shareholdings in accordance with the terms set forth in the Model Business Corporation Act, as that act may be amended from time to time. If the Model Business Corporation Act does not provide access to the shareholder names, addresses, and shareholdings, these books and records will be made available for inspection by our shareholders for purposes properly related to their status as shareholders.
Acquisitions
There are a number of mechanisms for acquiring an Irish public limited company, including:
 
 
 
Under Irish law, there is no requirement for a company's shareholders to approve a sale, lease or exchange of all or substantially all of a company's property and assets. However, Accenture plc's articles of association provide that the approval of (i) the Board of Directors by a resolution passed with the approval of a majority of those directors then in office and eligible to vote on that resolution and (ii) a shareholder resolution passed by a majority of votes cast on the relevant record date is required to approve a sale, lease or exchange of all or substantially all of its property or assets.
Appraisal Rights
Generally, under Irish law, shareholders of an Irish company do not have appraisal rights. Under the EC (Cross-Border Mergers) Regulations 2008 governing the merger of an Irish public limited company and a company incorporated in the European Economic Area, a shareholder (a) who voted against the special resolution approving the merger or (b) of a company in which 90% of the shares is held by the other company the party to the merger of the transferor company, has the right to request that the company acquire its shares for cash.
Disclosure of Interests in Shares
Under the Irish Companies Acts, there is a notification requirement for shareholders who acquire or cease to be interested in 5% of any class of voting shares of an Irish public limited company. A shareholder of Accenture plc must therefore make such a notification to Accenture plc if as a result of a transaction the shareholder will be interested in 5% or more of the Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares or 5% or more of the Accenture plc Class X ordinary shares; or if as a result of a transaction a shareholder who was interested in more than 5% of the relevant class of Accenture plc shares ceases to be so interested. Where a shareholder is interested in more than 5% of the Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares or 5% or more of the Accenture plc Class X ordinary shares, any alteration of his or her interest that brings his or her total holding through the nearest whole percentage number, whether an increase or a reduction, must be notified to Accenture plc. The relevant percentage figure is calculated by reference to the aggregate nominal value of the shares in which the shareholder is interested as a proportion of the entire nominal value of the relevant class of share capital. Where the percentage level of the shareholder's interest does not amount to a whole percentage this figure may be rounded down to the next whole number. All such disclosures should be notified to Accenture plc within 5 business days of the transaction or alteration of the shareholder's interests that gave rise to the requirement to notify. Where a person fails to comply with the notification requirements described above no right or interest of any kind whatsoever in respect of any shares in Accenture plc concerned, held by such person, shall be enforceable by such person, whether directly or indirectly, by action or legal proceeding. However, such person may apply to the court to have the rights attaching to the shares concerned reinstated.
In addition to the above disclosure requirement, Accenture plc, under the Irish Companies Acts, may by notice in writing require a person whom Accenture plc knows or has reasonable cause to believe to be, or at any time during the three years immediately preceding the date on which such notice is issued, to have been interested in shares comprised in Accenture plc's relevant share capital to: (a) indicate whether or not it is the case, and (b) where such person holds or has during that time held an interest in the Accenture plc shares, to give such further information as may be required by Accenture plc including particulars of such person's own past or present interests in Accenture plc shares. Any information given in response to the notice is required to be given in writing within such reasonable time as may be specified in the notice.
Where such a notice is served by Accenture plc on a person who is or was interested in Accenture plc shares and that person fails to give Accenture plc any information required within the reasonable time specified, Accenture plc may apply to court for an order directing that the affected shares be subject to certain restrictions. Under the Irish Companies Acts, the restrictions that may be placed on the shares by the court are as follows:
 
 
 
 
Where shares in Accenture plc are subject to these restrictions, the court may order the shares to be sold and may also direct that the shares shall cease to be subject to these restrictions.
Anti-Takeover Provisions
Accenture plc's articles of association provide that any merger of Accenture plc and another company requires the approval of (i) the Board of Directors by a resolution passed with the approval of a majority of those directors then in office and eligible to vote on that resolution and (ii) an ordinary resolution of shareholders in addition to any other sanction required by applicable law, such as the EC (Cross-Border Mergers) Regulations 2008 described above.
Irish Takeover Rules and Substantial Acquisition Rules
A transaction by virtue of which a third party is seeking to acquire 30% or more of the voting rights of Accenture plc will be governed by the Irish Takeover Panel Act 1997 and the Irish Takeover Rules made thereunder and will be regulated by the Irish Takeover Panel. The "General Principles" of the Irish Takeover Rules and certain important aspects of the Irish Takeover Rules are described below.
General Principles
The Irish Takeover Rules are built on the following General Principles which will apply to any transaction regulated by the Irish Takeover Panel:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Mandatory Offer
If an acquisition of shares were to increase the aggregate holding of an acquirer and its concert parties to shares carrying 30% or more of the voting rights in Accenture plc, the acquirer and, depending on the circumstances, its concert parties would be mandatorily required (except with the consent of the Irish Takeover Panel) to make a cash offer for the remaining outstanding shares at a price not less than the highest price paid for the shares by the acquirer or its concert parties during the previous 12 months. This requirement would also be triggered by an acquisition of shares by a person holding (together with its concert parties) shares carrying between 30% and 50% of the voting rights in Accenture plc if the effect of such acquisition were to increase the percentage of the voting rights held by that person (together with its concert parties) by 0.05% within a 12 month period. A single holder (that is, a holder excluding any parties acting in concert with the holder) holding more than 50% of the voting rights of a company is not subject to this rule.
Voluntary Offer; Requirements to Make a Cash Offer and Minimum Price Requirements
A voluntary offer is an offer that is not a mandatory offer. If a bidder or any of its concert parties acquire Accenture plc shares of the same class as the shares the subject of the voluntary offer within the period of three months prior to the commencement of the offer period, the offer price must be not less than the highest price paid for Accenture plc shares of that class by the bidder or its concert parties during that period. The Irish Takeover Panel has the power to extend the "look back" period to 12 months if the Irish Takeover Panel, having regard to the General Principles, believes it is appropriate to do so.
If the bidder or any of its concert parties has acquired Accenture plc shares of the same class as the shares the subject of the voluntary offer (i) during the period of 12 months prior to the commencement of the offer period which represent more than 10% of the total shares the subject of the voluntary offer or (ii) at any time after the commencement of the offer period, the offer shall be in cash (or accompanied by a full cash alternative) and the price per share shall be not less than the highest price paid by the bidder or its concert parties for shares (of the class of shares the subject of the voluntary offer) during, in the case of (i), the period of 12 months prior to the commencement of the offer period and, in the case of (ii), the offer period. The Irish Takeover Panel may apply this rule to a bidder who, together with its concert parties, has acquired less than 10% of the total shares of the class of shares the subject of the offer in the 12 month period prior to the commencement of the offer period if the Panel, having regard to the General Principles, considers it just and proper to do so.
An offer period will generally commence from the date of the first announcement of the offer or proposed offer.
Substantial Acquisition Rules
The Irish Takeover Rules also contain rules governing substantial acquisitions of shares which restrict the speed at which a person may increase his or her holding of shares and rights over shares to an aggregate of between 15% and 30% of the voting rights of Accenture plc. Except in certain circumstances, an acquisition or series of acquisitions of shares or rights over shares representing 10% or more of the voting rights of Accenture plc is prohibited, if such acquisition(s), when aggregated with shares or rights already held, would result in the acquirer holding 15% or more but less than 30% of the voting rights of Accenture plc and such acquisitions are made within a period of seven days. These rules also require accelerated disclosure of acquisitions of shares or rights over shares relating to such holdings.
Frustrating Action
Under the Irish Takeover Rules, the Board of Directors of Accenture plc is not permitted to take any action which might frustrate an offer for the Accenture plc shares once the Board of Directors has received an approach which may lead to an offer or has reason to believe an offer is imminent except as noted below. Potentially frustrating actions such as (i) the issue of shares, options or convertible securities, (ii) material disposals, (iii) entering into contracts other than in the ordinary course of business or (iv) any action, other than seeking alternative offers, which may result in frustration of an offer, are prohibited during the course of an offer or at any time during which the Board of Directors has reason to believe an offer is imminent. Exceptions to this prohibition are available where:
 
 
 
 
 
Corporate Governance
The articles of association of Accenture plc allocate authority over the management of Accenture plc to the Board of Directors. The Board of Directors may then delegate management of Accenture plc to committees of the Board of Directors, executives or to a management team, but regardless, the directors will remain responsible, as a matter of Irish law, for the proper management of the affairs of Accenture plc. Accenture plc's Board of Directors includes an Audit Committee, a Compensation Committee, a Nominating & Governance Committee and a Finance Committee. Accenture plc's Board of Directors has also adopted Corporate Governance Guidelines from its predecessor Accenture Ltd. The Board of Directors may create new committees or change the responsibilities of existing committees from time to time.
Accenture plc's Board of Directors has adopted resolutions, providing, among other things, that:
 
 
 
Notwithstanding the passing of these resolutions, all substantive and procedural requirements of Irish law would have to be satisfied for any derivative proceedings or other legal actions to be brought in Ireland by a shareholder against Accenture plc or any of its directors or officers. In addition, there can be no assurance that Irish courts or courts in other jurisdictions would enforce court judgments obtained in the United States against Accenture plc or its directors in Ireland or in other countries where Accenture plc has assets.
Legal Name; Formation; Fiscal Year; Registered Office
The legal and commercial name of Accenture plc is Accenture public limited company. Accenture plc was incorporated in Ireland, as a public limited company on June 10, 2009 with company registration number 471706. Accenture plc's fiscal year ends on August 31 and Accenture plc's registered address is 1 Grand Canal Square, Grand Canal Harbour, Dublin 2, Ireland.
Duration; Dissolution; Rights upon Liquidation
Accenture plc's duration is unlimited. Accenture plc may be dissolved at any time by way of either a voluntary winding up or a creditors' voluntary winding up. In the case of a voluntary winding up, the approval is required by (i) the Board of Directors by a resolution passed with the approval of a majority of those directors then in office and eligible to vote on that resolution and (ii) a special resolution of shareholders. Accenture plc may also be dissolved by way of court order on the application of a creditor, or by the Companies Registration Office as an enforcement measure where Accenture plc has failed to file certain returns.
The rights of the shareholders to a return of Accenture plc's assets on dissolution or winding up, following the settlement of all claims of creditors, may be prescribed in Accenture plc's articles of association or the terms of any preferred shares issued by the directors of Accenture plc from time to time. The holders of preferred shares in particular may have the right to priority in a dissolution or winding up of Accenture plc. If the articles of association contain no specific provisions in respect of a dissolution or winding up then, subject to the priorities of any creditors, the assets will be distributed to shareholders in proportion to the paid-up nominal value of the shares held. Accenture plc's articles provide that the Class A ordinary shareholders of Accenture plc are entitled to participate in a winding up, but their right to do so may be subject to the rights of any preferred shareholders to participate under the terms of any series or class of preferred shares. Class X ordinary shareholders of Accenture plc are not entitled to participate in a winding up.
pro rata
Uncertificated Shares
Holders of Accenture plc ordinary shares will not have the right to require Accenture plc to issue certificates for their shares. Accenture plc currently intends to issue only uncertificated ordinary shares unless certificated shares are required by any stock exchange, a recognized depository, any operator of any clearance, settlement system or law.
Stock Exchange Listing
The Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares are listed on the NYSE under the symbol "ACN." We do not intend to list the Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares on the Irish Stock Exchange or any other stock exchange. We do not intend to list the Accenture plc Class X ordinary shares on any stock exchange.
No Sinking Fund
The ordinary shares have no sinking fund provisions.
No Liability for Further Calls or Assessments
All issued and outstanding ordinary shares are duly and validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
Transfer and Registration of Shares
Accenture plc's share register are maintained by its transfer agent. Registration in this share register will be determinative of membership in Accenture plc. A shareholder of Accenture plc who holds shares beneficially will not be the holder of record of such shares. Instead, the depository (for example, Cede & Co., as nominee for DTC) or other nominee will be the holder of record of such shares. Accordingly, a transfer of shares from a person who holds such shares beneficially to a person who also holds such shares beneficially through a depository or other nominee will not be registered in Accenture plc's official share register, as the depository or other nominee will remain the record holder of such shares.
A written instrument of transfer is required under Irish law in order to register on Accenture plc's official share register any transfer of shares (i) from a person who holds such shares directly to any other person, (ii) from a person who holds such shares beneficially to a person who holds such shares directly, or (iii) from a person who holds such shares beneficially to another person who holds such shares beneficially where the transfer involves a change in the depository or other nominee that is the record owner of the transferred shares. An instrument of transfer also is required for a shareholder who directly holds shares to transfer those shares into his or her own broker account (or vice versa). Such instruments of transfer may give rise to Irish stamp duty, which must be paid prior to registration of the transfer on Accenture plc's official Irish share register.
Accenture plc does not intend to pay any stamp duty. However, Accenture plc's articles of association allow Accenture plc, in its absolute discretion, to pay any stamp duty payable by a buyer. In the event of any such payment, Accenture plc may (i) seek reimbursement from the transferor or transferee (at our discretion), (ii) set-off the amount of the stamp duty against future dividends payable to the transferor or transferee (at our discretion), and (iii) impose a lien against the Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares on which we have paid stamp duty. Any transfer of Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares that is subject to Irish stamp duty will not be registered in the name of the buyer unless an instrument of transfer is executed by or on behalf of the seller, is duly stamped and is provided to our transfer agent.
Class X ordinary shares are not transferable by their holders, unless the Class X ordinary shareholder has received the prior written consent of Accenture plc to the proposed transfer to the proposed transferee.
The directors of Accenture plc have general discretion to decline to register an instrument of transfer unless the transfer is in respect of one class of share only or, as in the case of Class X ordinary shares, such transfer would violate the terms of an agreement to which Accenture plc or any of its subsidiaries and the transferor are subject.
Enforcement of Civil Liabilities Against Foreign Persons
Accenture plc has been advised by its Irish counsel that a judgment for the payment of money rendered by a court in the United States based on civil liability would not be automatically enforceable in Ireland. There is no treaty between Ireland and the United States providing for the reciprocal enforcement of foreign judgments. The following requirements must be met before the foreign judgment will be deemed to be enforceable in Ireland:
 
 
 
An Irish court will also exercise its right to refuse judgment if the foreign judgment was obtained by fraud, if the judgment violated Irish public policy, if the judgment is in breach of natural justice or if it is irreconcilable with an earlier foreign judgment.
Transfer Agent and Registrar
National City Bank serves as transfer agent and branch registrar for the Class A ordinary shares in the United States. Arthur Cox serves as transfer agent and principal registrar for the Class A ordinary shares in Ireland.
RISK FACTORS
As a result of the Transaction, we have updated our risk factors to include the following additional risk factors listed below. Any references in the "Risk Factors" in our predecessor's Annual Report on Form 10-K, for the year ended August 31, 2008, our predecessor's Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q filed for the most recent fiscal year and the additional risk factors listed below to the terms "Accenture," "we," "our Company," "our" and "us" refer to Accenture plc and its subsidiaries.
Legislative or regulatory action could materially and adversely affect us.
Our tax position could be adversely impacted by changes in tax laws, tax treaties or tax regulations or the interpretation or enforcement thereof by any tax authority. For example, legislative proposals have been introduced in the U.S. Congress which, if enacted, could override tax treaties upon which we expect to rely, or could change the circumstances under which we would be treated as a U.S. person for U.S. federal income tax purposes, each of which could materially and adversely affect our effective tax rate and require us to take further action, at potentially significant expense, to seek to preserve our effective tax rate. We cannot predict the outcome of any specific legislative proposals. However, if proposals were enacted limiting our ability as an Irish company to take advantage of the tax treaties between Ireland and the United States, we could be subjected to increased taxation and/or potentially significant expense. In addition, any future amendments to the current income tax treaties between Ireland and other jurisdictions (including the United States) could subject us to increased taxation and/or potentially significant expense. Also, various U.S. federal and state legislative proposals have been introduced and/or enacted in recent years that deny government contracts to certain U.S. companies that reincorporate or have reincorporated outside the United States. While Accenture was not a U.S. company that reincorporated outside the United States, our reincorporation from Bermuda to Ireland may not eliminate the risk that these contract bans and other legislative proposals could be enacted in a way to affect Accenture.
As an Irish company we are required to comply with numerous Irish and EU legal requirements. Compliance with EU and Irish laws and regulations may have a material and adverse effect on Accenture's financial condition and results of operations.
We may be subject to criticism and negative publicity related to the Transaction.
There continues to be negative publicity regarding, and criticism of, companies that conduct business in the United States but are domiciled in countries like Bermuda. While we were never a U.S. company, some former U.S. companies that have undertaken expatriation transactions to offshore jurisdictions, such as Bermuda, have been criticized as improperly avoiding U.S. taxes or creating an unfair competitive advantage over U.S. companies. We could become subject to criticism in connection with the Transaction.
Our effective tax rate may increase.
While the Transaction is not anticipated to have any material impact on our effective tax rate, there is uncertainty regarding the tax policies of the jurisdictions where we operate (which include the potential legislative actions described above), and our effective tax rate may increase and any such increase may be material. Additionally, the tax laws of Ireland and other jurisdictions could change in the future, and such changes could cause a material change in our effective tax rate.
A future transfer of your Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares may be subject to Irish stamp duty.
Transfers by shareholders who hold their Accenture plc shares beneficially through banks, brokers, trustees, custodians or other nominees, which in turn hold those shares through DTC, will not be subject to Irish stamp duty where such transfers are to holders who also hold through DTC. If you hold your Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares directly rather than beneficially, any purchase of your shares will be subject to Irish stamp duty. Irish stamp duty is currently at the rate of 1% of the price paid or the market value of the Class A ordinary shares acquired, if higher. Any transfer of Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares which is subject to Irish stamp duty will not be registered in the name of the buyer unless an instrument of transfer is executed by or on behalf of the seller, is duly stamped and is provided to our transfer agent. The potential for stamp duty could adversely affect the price of Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares.
Dividends you receive may be subject to Irish dividend withholding tax.
In certain circumstances, as an Irish tax resident company, we may be required to deduct Irish dividend withholding tax (currently at the rate of 20%) from dividends paid to our shareholders. Shareholders resident in "relevant territories" (including countries that are European Union member states (other than Ireland), the United States and other countries with which Ireland has a tax treaty) will generally not be subject to Irish withholding tax provided that, in each case, they complete certain tax forms. However, shareholders residing in other countries will generally be subject to withholding tax.
 
(d) Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 3.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Cert. No.: 471706
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
WE, the several persons whose names, addresses and descriptions are subscribed, wish to be formed into s Company in pursuance of this memorandum of association, and we agree to take the number of shares in the capital of the Company set opposite our respective names.
 
 
 
 
 
means the Companies Act 1963 (No. 33 of 1963) as amended by the Companies Acts 1977 to 2005 and Parts 2 and 3 of the Investment Funds, Companies and Miscellaneous Provisions Act 2006 and all statutory instruments which are to read as one with, or construed, or to read together with the Companies Acts;
"1963 Act"
means the Companies (Amendment) Act 1983;
"1983 Act"
means the Companies (Amendment) Act 1990;
"1990 Act"
includes, without limitation, any number or address used for the purposes of communication by way of electronic mail or other electronic communication;
"address"
means any person appointed by the Secretary from time to time to assist the Secretary;
"Assistant Secretary"
means the board of directors for the time being of the Company;
"Board"
means class A ordinary shares of nominal value US$0.0000225 per share (or such other nominal value as may result from any reorganisation of capital) in the capital of the Company, having the rights and being subject to the limitations set out in these articles;
"Class A Ordinary Shares"
means redeemable class X ordinary shares of nominal value US$0.0000225 per share (or such other nominal value as may result from any reorganisation of capital) in the capital of the Company, having the rights and being subject to the limitations set out in these articles;
"Class X Ordinary Shares"
means, in relation to the period of a notice, that period excluding the day on which the notice is given or served, or deemed to be given or served, and the day for which it is given or on which it is to take effect;
"clear days"
means the Companies Acts 1963 to 2005 and Parts 2 and 3 of the Investment Funds, Companies and Miscellaneous Provisions Act 2006, and all statutory instruments which are to be read as one with, or construed, or to be read together with the Companies Acts;
"Companies Acts"
 
means the company whose name appears in the heading to these articles;
"Company"
means a director for the time being of the Company;
"Director"
has the meaning given to those words in the Electronic Commerce Act 2000;
"electronic communication"
has the meaning given to those words in the Electronic Commerce Act 2000;
"electronic signature"
, and means the currency of Ireland;
"EUR"
"E"
"euro"
means the Company, any holding company of the Company and any subsidiary of the Company or of any such holding company;
"Group Company"
means an ordinary resolution of the Shareholders within the meaning of section 141 of the 1963 Act;
"Ordinary Resolution"
means paid up or credited as paid up;
"Paid Up"
means a person whose entitlement to a share in consequence of the death or bankruptcy of a Shareholder or of any other event giving rise to its transmission by operation of law has been noted in the Register;
"Person entitled by Transmission"
means the date specified in a notice served by the Company on a Class X Ordinary Shareholder under article 5(c)(iv);
"Redemption Date"
means redeemable shares in accordance with section 206 of the 1990 Act;
"Redeemable Shares"
means the register of shareholders of the Company;
"Register"
means the registered office for the time being of the Company;
"Registered Office"
means the common seal of the Company and includes any duplicate seal;
"Seal"
means the secretary of the Company or, if there are joint secretaries, any of the joint secretaries and includes a deputy or assistant secretary and any person appointed by the Board to perform any of the duties of the secretary;
"Secretary"
means any share in the capital of the Company;
"Share"
means in relation to any share, the member whose name is entered in the Register as the holder of the share or, where the context permits, the members whose names are entered in the Register as the joint holders of shares;
"Shareholder"
means a special resolution of the Shareholders within the meaning of Section 141 of the 1963 Act;
"Special Resolution"
and have the same meanings as in section 155 of the 1963 Act, except that references in that section to a company shall include any body corporate or other legal entity, whether incorporated or established in Ireland or elsewhere;
"Subsidiary"
"holding company"
means the 2,000,000,000 shares of nominal value US$0.0000225 per share (or such other nominal value as may result from any reorganisation of capital) in the capital of the Company, having such rights and being subject to such limitations as may be attached to them pursuant to article 6(c); and
"Undesignated Shares"
means United States dollars.
"US dollars" or "US$"
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The Class A Ordinary Shares shall entitle the holders thereof to the following rights:
 
after making all necessary provisions, where relevant, for payment of any preferred dividend in respect of any preference shares in the Company then outstanding, the Company shall apply any profits or reserves which the Directors resolve to distribute in paying such profits or reserves to the holders of the Class A Ordinary Shares in respect of their holdings of such shares pari passu and pro rata to the number of Class A Ordinary Shares held by each of them;
 
on a return of assets on liquidation, reduction of capital or otherwise, the holders of the Class A Ordinary Shares shall be entitled to be paid the surplus assets of the Company remaining after payment of its liabilities (subject to the rights of the holders of any preferred shares in the Company then in issue, having preferred rights on a return of capital) in respect of their holdings of Class A Ordinary Shares pari passu and pro rata to the number of Class A Ordinary Shares held by each of them;
 
subject to the right of the Company to set record dates for the purpose of determining the identity of Shareholders entitled to notice of and/or vote at a general meeting, the holders of the Class A Ordinary Shares shall be entitled to receive notice of, and to attend and vote at, general meetings of the Company; every holder of Class A Ordinary Shares present in person or by proxy shall have one vote for each Class A Ordinary Share held by him (and, except as otherwise provided by the Companies Acts or these articles, the holders of Class A Ordinary Shares and Class X Ordinary Shares shall vote as a single class);
 
a Class A Ordinary Share shall be deemed to be a Redeemable Share on, and from the time of, the existence or creation of an agreement, transaction or trade between the Company and any third party pursuant to which the Company acquires or will acquire Class A Ordinary Shares, or an interest in Class A Ordinary Shares, from the relevant third party. In these circumstances, the acquisition of such shares by the Company shall constitute the Redemption of a Redeemable Share in accordance with Part XI of the 1990 Act;
 
unless the Board resolves otherwise (either generally or in any particular case or cases) holders of Class A Ordinary Shares will not be entitled to receive a share certificate in respect of any Class A Ordinary Shares.
 
The Class X Ordinary Shares shall entitle the holders thereof to the following rights and will be subject to the following restrictions:
 
the holders of Class X Ordinary Shares will have no right to receive any dividend or distribution in respect of their holdings of Class X Ordinary Shares;
 
on a return of assets on liquidation, reduction of capital or otherwise, the holders of the Class X Ordinary Shares will not be entitled to any payment out of the surplus assets of the Company in respect of their holdings of Class X Ordinary Shares;
 
subject to the right of the Company to set record dates for the purpose of determining the identity of Shareholders entitled to notice of and/or vote at a general meeting, the holders of the Class X Ordinary Shares shall be entitled to receive notice of, and to attend and vote at, general meetings of the Company; every holder of Class X Ordinary Shares present in person or by proxy shall have one vote for each Class X Ordinary Share held by him (and, except as otherwise provided by the Companies Acts or these articles, the holders of Class A Ordinary Shares and Class X Ordinary Shares shall vote as a single class);
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Class X Ordinary Shares are not transferable by their holders, unless the Class X Ordinary Shareholder has received the prior written consent of the Company to the proposed transfer to the proposed transferee; and
 
unless the Board resolves otherwise (either generally or in any particular case or cases) holders of Class X Ordinary Shares will not be entitled to receive a share certificate in respect of any Class X Ordinary Shares held by him.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
in every such case (except to the extent that the rights conferred upon holders of any class of shares render the Company liable to make additional payments in respect of sums withheld on account of the foregoing):
 
 
 
 
Subject to the rights conferred upon the holders of any class of shares, nothing in this article 24(c) will prejudice or affect any right or remedy which any law may confer or purport to confer on the Company. As between the Company and every such Shareholder as referred to above (and, his executor, administrator and estate, wherever constituted), any right or remedy which such law shall confer or purport to confer on the Company shall be enforceable by the Company.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
For purposes of this article 43, "Ordinary Shares" shall mean Class A Ordinary Shares and/or Class X Ordinary Shares.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The chairman of the general meeting shall be present at, and the meeting shall be deemed to take place at, the principal meeting place. If it appears to the chairman of the general meeting that the facilities at the principal meeting place or any satellite meeting place are or become inadequate for the purposes referred to above, then the chairman may, without the consent of the meeting, interrupt or adjourn the general meeting. All business conducted at that general meeting up to the time of such adjournment shall be valid.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Nothing in this article 95 shall create any duty owed by any Director to any person or entity to consider, or afford any particular weight to, any of the foregoing matters or to limit his consideration to the foregoing matters. No such employee, retired former partner of Accenture, former employee, beneficiary, customer, creditor or community or member thereof shall have any rights against any Director under this article 95.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The records of account shall at all times be open to inspection by the Directors. No Shareholder shall have any right to inspect any accounting record or book or document of the Company except as conferred by law or authorised by the Board or by Ordinary Resolution.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The Company's power of sale shall extend to any share which, on or before the date or first date on which any such advertisement appears, is issued in right of a share to which article 136(a) applies.
To give effect to any such sale the Board may authorise some person to transfer the shares to the purchaser who shall not be bound to see to the application of the purchase money nor shall his title to the shares be affected by any irregularity or invalidity in the proceedings relating to the sale. The net proceeds of sale shall belong to the Company which shall be obliged to account to the former Shareholder or person entitled by transmission for an amount equal to such proceeds and shall enter the name of such former Shareholder or person entitled by transmission in the books of the Company as a creditor for such amount. No trust shall be created in respect of the debt, no interest shall be payable in respect of the same and the Company shall not be required to account for any money earned on the net proceeds, which may be employed in the business of the Company or invested in such investments as the Board may from time to time think fit.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
and in proving such service or delivery, it shall be sufficient to prove that the notice or document was properly addressed and stamped and put in the post, or, as the case may be, published on a website in accordance with and the provisions of these articles, or sent by courier, email or by other electronic means, as the case may be, in accordance with these articles. Each Shareholder and each person becoming a Shareholder subsequent to the adoption of these articles, by virtue of its holding or its acquisition and holding of a share, as applicable, shall be deemed to have acknowledged and agreed that any notice or other document (excluding a share certificate) may be provided by the Company by way of accessing them on a website instead of being provided by other means.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 3.2
Number 471706
I hereby certify that
ACCENTURE PUBLIC LIMITED COMPANY
is this day incorporated under
the Companies Acts 1963 to 2006,
and that the company is limited.
Given under my hand at Dublin, this
Wednesday, the 10th day of June, 2009
 
for Registrar of Companies

Exhibit 10.1
This Assumption and General Amendment Agreement (this "") is made as of September 1, 2009, by and between Accenture Ltd., an exempted company incorporated with limited liability under the laws of Bermuda (""), and Accenture plc, a public limited company under the laws of Ireland ("").
Agreement
Accenture Ltd
Accenture plc
, the boards of directors of Accenture Ltd and Accenture plc have previously approved a series of transactions to be effected pursuant to a Scheme of Arrangement (the "") in accordance with the laws of Bermuda, pursuant to which Accenture plc will become the parent holding company of Accenture Ltd and Accenture Ltd Class A and Class X common shares ("" and "," respectively, and collectively the "") will effectively be exchanged for Accenture plc Class A and Class X ordinary shares ("" and "," respectively, and collectively the "") on a one-for-one basis, other than with respect to fractional shares (such transactions are collectively referred to as the "");
WHEREAS
Scheme of Arrangement
Class A Common Shares
Class X Common Shares
Common Shares
Class A Ordinary Shares
Class X Ordinary Shares
Ordinary Shares
Transaction
, in accordance with Bermuda law, the Transaction will take place on the effectiveness of the Scheme of Arrangement (the "");
WHEREAS
Effective Time
, Accenture Ltd maintains and sponsors those certain equity compensation-related plans, and certain other plans, agreements, awards and arrangements listed on hereto (collectively, the ""), providing for the grant or award to its directors, officers and employees and other persons of (a) options, restricted shares or other rights to purchase or receive Class A Common Shares or (b) the right to receive benefits or other amounts by reference to Class A Common Shares (individually, an "" and collectively, the "");
WHEREAS
Exhibit A
Assumed Stock Plans
Assumed Stock Award
Assumed Stock Awards
, in connection with the Transaction, Accenture plc desires to assume and adopt the Assumed Stock Plans and the Assumed Stock Awards, and to issue or cause to be issued Class A Ordinary Shares (from Accenture plc or through one of its subsidiaries) in lieu of Class A Common Shares being issued in connection with such Assumed Stock Plans and Assumed Stock Awards;
WHEREAS
, the Compensation Committee of the board of directors of Accenture Ltd passed resolutions on July 22, 2009 to adjust the Plans (pursuant to their terms) and outstanding equity based awards and grants thereunder to provide for the issuance of equity interests in Accenture plc in place of Accenture Ltd, at the Effective Time;
WHEREAS
, in consideration of the foregoing and for good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which is hereby acknowledged, at and as of the Effective Time:
NOW, THEREFORE
Pursuant to the terms of this Agreement and in connection with the Transaction, Accenture Ltd hereby assigns to Accenture plc, and Accenture plc hereby accepts from Accenture Ltd and hereby assumes, the Assumed Stock Plans and the related Assumed Stock Awards and the rights and obligations of Accenture Ltd under the Assumed Stock Plans and Assumed Stock Awards. As a result of such assignment and assumption, Accenture plc will be the sponsor of the Assumed Stock Plans and Class A Ordinary Shares will be issued under the Assumed Stock Plans in lieu of Class A Common Shares being issued thereunder.
1.
To the extent any Assumed Stock Plan and Assumed Stock Award (each, a "", and collectively, the "") provides for the issuance, acquisition, holding or purchase of, or otherwise relates to or references, Class A Common Shares, then, pursuant to the terms hereof and thereof, such Benefit Document is hereby amended to provide for the issuance, acquisition, purchase or holding of, or otherwise relate to or reference, Class A Ordinary Shares (or benefits or other amounts determined in accordance with the Benefit Documents). For the purposes of the Assumed Stock Plans, Accenture Ltd confirms that its board of directors and the Compensation Committee of that board have approved that amendment of the Assumed Stock Plans. It is acknowledged by the parties that amendment of the Benefit Documents is not intended to prejudice or diminish the rights of holders of Assumed Stock Awards.
2.
Benefit Document
Benefit Documents
All references in the Assumed Stock Plans and Assumed Stock Awards to "Accenture Ltd" or its predecessors are hereby amended to be references to "Accenture plc."
3.
All outstanding Assumed Stock Awards or any other benefits available which are based on Class A Common Shares and which have been granted under the Assumed Stock Plans (including, as applicable, any Class A Common Shares exchanged in connection with the Transaction) shall remain outstanding pursuant to the terms hereof and thereof, as adopted as described herein.
4.
Each Assumed Stock Award shall, pursuant to the terms hereof and thereof, be exercisable, issuable, held, available or vest upon the same terms and conditions as under the applicable Benefit Document, except that upon the exercise, issuance, holding, availability or vesting of such Assumed Stock Awards, as applicable, Class A Ordinary Shares are hereby issuable or available, or benefits or other amounts determined, by reference to Class A Ordinary Shares, in lieu of Class A Common Shares.
5.
Each Assumed Stock Award that is a stock option (i) is hereby assumed by Accenture plc, or (ii) the obligations thereunder are hereby assumed by Accenture plc, as applicable, in such manner that Accenture plc would be a corporation "assuming a stock option in a transaction to which section 424(a) applies" within the meaning of Section 424 of the U.S. Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the ""), were Section 424 of the Code applicable to such Assumed Stock Award, with regard to the requirements of U.S. Treasury Regulation Section 1.424-1(a)(5)(iii) for options that are intended to qualify under Section 422 of the Code, and with regard to the requirements of U.S. Treasury Regulation Section 1.409A-1(b)(5)(v)(D) for other options.
6.
Code
Subject to the terms of this Agreement, as amended hereby, each Benefit Document is specifically ratified and reaffirmed by Accenture plc.
7.
This Agreement will be effective immediately prior to the Effective Time subject to effective completion of the Transaction.
8.
THIS AGREEMENT AND THE RIGHTS AND OBLIGATIONS OF THE PARTIES UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED AND INTERPRETED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK.
9.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned have executed this Agreement, which may be executed in multiple counterparts, but when taken together make one and the same instrument, as of the date first set forth above.
 
ACCENTURE LTD 2001 EMPLOYEE SHARE PURCHASE PLAN (as amended September 4, 2001)
ACCENTURE LTD 2001 SHARE INCENTIVE PLAN (and all equity-based award agreements granted thereunder)

Exhibit 10.2
 
 
 
THIS FIRST SUPPLEMENTAL AGREEMENT TO SUPPORT AGREEMENT is entered into as of September 1, 2009, by and between ACCENTURE LTD, an exempted company registered under the laws of Bermuda ("ParentCo"), ACCENTURE plc, an Irish public limited company ("Successor ParentCo") and ACCENTURE CANADA HOLDINGS INC., a corporation incorporated under the laws of Ontario (the "Corporation");
WHEREAS pursuant to a Support Agreement (the "Support Agreement") dated as of May 23, 2001, ParentCo and the Corporation established a procedure whereby ParentCo would take certain actions and make certain payments and deliveries necessary to ensure that the Corporation will be able to make certain payments and to deliver or cause to be delivered Class A Shares in satisfaction of the obligations of the Corporation under the Exchangeable Share Provisions with respect to the payment and satisfaction of dividends, Liquidation Amounts, Retraction Prices and Redemption Prices, all in accordance with the Exchangeable Share Provisions;
WHEREAS pursuant to a Scheme of Arrangement to be undertaken pursuant to the laws of Bermuda, ParentCo is undertaking a reorganization whereby ParentCo will become a wholly-owned subsidiary of Successor ParentCo and holders of Class A Shares will become holders of Class A ordinary shares of Successor ParentCo;
WHEREAS pursuant to Article 11 of the terms of the Exchangeable Shares, the Exchangeable Shares will automatically be adjusted such that references to Class A Shares in the terms of the Exchangeable Shares and the Support Agreement will automatically refer to Class A ordinary shares of Successor ParentCo;
WHEREAS pursuant to section 4.2 of the Support Agreement, the parties hereto are entering into this First Supplemental Agreement in order to amend and modify the Support Agreement as necessary in order that it shall apply with full force and effect, mutatis mutandis, to the Class A ordinary shares of Successor ParentCo, and the parties hereto are executing and delivering this First Supplemental Agreement to give effect to and evidence such necessary amendments and modifications;
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the respective covenants and agreements provided in this agreement and for other good and valuable consideration (the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged), the parties agree as follows:
Section 1.01
Definitions
In this First Supplemental Agreement, unless there is something in the subject matter or context inconsistent therewith or unless otherwise expressly provided "First Supplemental Agreement", "herein", "hereby", "hereof", and similar expressions mean or refer to this First Supplemental Agreement; and the expressions "Article" and "Section" followed by numbers mean and refer to the specified Article or Section of this First Supplemental Agreement, unless the context otherwise requires.
Section 1.02
Incorporation of Support Agreement
This First Supplemental Agreement is supplemental to and will hereafter be read in conjunction with the Support Agreement and the Support Agreement and any supplemental agreements will hereinafter have effect so far as practicable as if all the provisions thereof and hereof were contained in one instrument. In this First Supplemental Agreement and the recitals hereto, unless there is something in the subject matter or context inconsistent therewith, or unless so stated to the contrary in this First Supplemental Agreement, the words and expressions herein contained, including in the recitals hereto, which are defined in the Support Agreement will have the meanings given to such words and expressions in the Support Agreement.
Section 1.03
Reference to and Effect on the Support Agreement
On and after the Effective Time, each reference in the Support Agreement to "this Agreement", "hereunder", "hereof", "herein", or words of like import, and each reference to the Support Agreement in any and all agreements, documents and instruments delivered by Successor ParentCo, ParentCo or the Corporation or any other person will mean and refer to the Support Agreement as supplemented hereby.
Section 1.04
Interpretation not Affected by Headings, etc.
The division of this First Supplemental Agreement into Articles and Sections and the insertion of headings are for convenience of reference only and will not affect the construction or interpretation hereof.
Section 2.01
Vesting of Benefits
From and after the Effective Time, Successor ParentCo shall possess and from time to time may exercise each and every right and power of ParentCo under the Support Agreement in the name of ParentCo or otherwise and any act or proceeding by any provision of this agreement required to be done or performed by the board of directors of ParentCo or any officers of ParentCo may be done and performed with like force and effect by the directors or officers of Successor ParentCo.
Section 2.02
Covenants and Obligations
As of the Effective Time, Successor ParentCo:
 
 
 
Section 3.01
Further Assurances
The parties will execute and deliver such further and other instruments and take such further or other action as may be necessary or advisable to give effect to this First Supplemental Agreement and the provisions hereof.
Section 3.02
Counterparts
This First Supplemental Agreement may be simultaneously executed in several counterparts, each of which so executed will be deemed to be an original, and all such counterparts together will constitute one and the same instrument.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF the parties have executed this First Supplemental Agreement on the date first mentioned above under the hands of their proper officers duly authorized in that behalf.
 
 

Exhibit 10.3
 
 
 
 
THIS FIRST SUPPLEMENTAL AGREEMENT TO EXCHANGE TRUST AGREEMENT is entered into as of September 1, 2009, by and between ACCENTURE LTD, an exempted company registered under the laws of Bermuda ("ParentCo"), ACCENTURE plc, an Irish public limited company ("Successor ParentCo"), ACCENTURE CANADA HOLDINGS INC., a corporation incorporated under the laws of Ontario (the "Corporation"), and ACCENTURE INC., a corporation incorporated under the laws of Ontario ("Trustee");
WHEREAS pursuant to an Exchange Trust Agreement (the "Exchange Agreement") dated as of May 23, 2001, ParentCo and the Corporation established a procedure whereby holders of Exchangeable Shares may exchange their Exchangeable Shares for Class A Shares by and through the Trustee and whereby the rights to require ParentCo or, at the option of ParentCo, ParentCo Sub to purchase Exchangeable Shares from the holders thereof (other than ParentCo and its Subsidiaries) are exercisable by such holders of Exchangeable Shares by and through the Trustee, who holds the covenant of ParentCo to purchase the Exchangeable Shares for the benefit of such holders;
WHEREAS the Trustee is acknowledged and agreed to be the trustee under the Exchange Agreement, notwithstanding that another entity was stated in various other documents, in error, to be the trustee thereunder;
WHEREAS pursuant to a Scheme of Arrangement to be undertaken pursuant to the laws of Bermuda, ParentCo is undertaking a reorganization whereby ParentCo will become a wholly-owned subsidiary of Successor ParentCo and holders of Class A Shares will become holders of Class A ordinary shares of Successor ParentCo and ParentCo has ensured that, following the execution of this Supplemental Agreement, the conditions in section 8.1(a) and (b) of the Exchange Agreement have been met;
WHEREAS pursuant to Article 11 of the terms of the Exchangeable Shares, the Exchangeable Shares will automatically be adjusted such that references to Class A Shares in the terms of the Exchangeable Shares and the Exchange Agreement will automatically refer to Class A ordinary shares of Successor ParentCo;
WHEREAS pursuant to sections 8.2 and 9.5 of the Exchange Agreement, the parties hereto are entering into this First Supplemental Agreement in order to vest in Successor ParentCo at the effective time (the "Effective Time") of the Scheme of Arrangement the rights and powers of ParentCo set out therein and to provide for Successor ParentCo at the Effective Time to assume liability for all moneys payable and property deliverable under the Exchange Agreement, the covenant of Successor ParentCo from and after the Effective Time to pay and deliver or cause to be delivered the same and Successor ParentCo's agreement from and after the Effective Time to observe and perform all the covenants and obligations of ParentCo under the Exchange Agreement;
WHEREAS, these recitals and any statements of fact in this agreement are made by Successor ParentCo, ParentCo and the Corporation and not by the Trustee;
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the respective covenants and agreements provided in this agreement and for other good and valuable consideration (the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged), the parties agree as follows:
Section 1.01
Definitions
In this First Supplemental Agreement, unless there is something in the subject matter or context inconsistent therewith or unless otherwise expressly provided "First Supplemental Agreement", "herein", "hereby", "hereof", and similar expressions mean or refer to this First Supplemental Agreement; and the expressions "Article" and "Section" followed by numbers mean and refer to the specified Article or Section of this First Supplemental Agreement, unless the context otherwise requires.
Section 1.02
Incorporation of Exchange Agreement
This First Supplemental Agreement is supplemental to and will hereafter be read in conjunction with the Exchange Agreement and the Exchange Agreement and any supplemental agreements will hereinafter have effect so far as practicable as if all the provisions thereof and hereof were contained in one instrument. In this First Supplemental Agreement and the recitals hereto, unless there is something in the subject matter or context inconsistent therewith, or unless so stated to the contrary in this First Supplemental Agreement, the words and expressions herein contained, including in the recitals hereto, which are defined in the Exchange Agreement will have the meanings given to such words and expressions in the Exchange Agreement.
Section 1.03
Reference to and Effect on the Exchange Agreement
On and after the Effective Time, each reference in the Exchange Agreement to "this Agreement", "hereunder", "hereof", "herein", or words of like import, and each reference to the Exchange Agreement in any and all agreements, documents and instruments delivered by Successor ParentCo, ParentCo, the Corporation or the Trustee or any other person will mean and refer to the Exchange Agreement as supplemented hereby.
Section 1.04
Interpretation not Affected by Headings, etc.
The division of this First Supplemental Agreement into Articles and Sections and the insertion of headings are for convenience of reference only and will not affect the construction or interpretation hereof.
Section 2.01
Vesting of Benefits
From and after the Effective Time, Successor ParentCo shall possess and from time to time may exercise each and every right and power of ParentCo under the Exchange Agreement in the name of ParentCo or otherwise and any act or proceeding by any provision of this agreement required to be done or performed by the board of directors of ParentCo or any officers of ParentCo may be done and performed with like force and effect by the directors or officers of Successor ParentCo.
Section 2.02
Covenants and Obligations
As of the Effective Time, Successor ParentCo:
 
 
 
Section 3.01
Further Assurances
The parties will execute and deliver such further and other instruments and take such further or other action as may be necessary or advisable to give effect to this First Supplemental Agreement and the provisions hereof.
Section 3.02
Confirmation of Trustee
For the avoidance of doubt, the Trustee is hereby acknowledged, agreed and confirmed to be and to have been appointed to be the trustee under the Exchange Agreement.
Section 3.03
Counterparts
This First Supplemental Agreement may be simultaneously executed in several counterparts, each of which so executed will be deemed to be an original, and all such counterparts together will constitute one and the same instrument.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF the parties have executed this First Supplemental Agreement on the date first mentioned above under the hands of their proper officers duly authorized in that behalf.
 
 

Exhibit 10.4
 
 
This Assumption Agreement dated as of September 1, 2009 by Accenture plc (as successor to Accenture Ltd), a public limited company organized under the laws of Ireland ("Accenture plc") relates to the Amended and Restated Voting Agreement, dated as of February 3, 2005 (the "Voting Agreement"), between Accenture Ltd, an exempted company limited by shares organized under the laws of Bermuda ("Accenture Ltd"), and the Covered Persons (as defined in the Voting Agreement).
, contemporaneously with the execution of this Assumption Agreement, Accenture Ltd and Accenture plc have implemented a scheme of arrangement under Bermuda law constituting a transaction (the "Transaction") pursuant to which, the Class A common shares and Class X common shares of Accenture Ltd will be cancelled and the holders of such Class A common shares and Class X common shares will receive on one-for-one bases, new Class A ordinary shares and new Class X ordinary shares, respectively (or, in the case of any fractional interests in Class A common shares, cash), of Accenture plc;
WHEREAS
pursuant to Sections 5.5(b) of the Voting Agreement, as a result of the Transaction all references in the Voting Agreement to Accenture Ltd are automatically changed to refer to Accenture plc and all references to the Class A Common Shares and Class X Common Shares are automatically changed to refer to the Accenture plc Class A Ordinary Shares ("Class A Ordinary Shares") and Accenture plc Class X Ordinary Shares ("Class X Ordinary Shares"), respectively and certain other defined terms in the Voting Agreement are automatically changed accordingly;
WHEREAS,
, a substantial portion of the operative provisions of the Voting Agreement were removed by the amendment and restatement on February 3, 2005;
WHEREAS
, Accenture plc intends for Accenture Ltd to have no further obligations or liabilities under the Voting Agreement;
WHEREAS
, for the avoidance of doubt in relation to the remaining provisions, Accenture plc, as successor to Accenture Ltd, desires to affirmatively assume all rights and obligations of Accenture Ltd under the Voting Agreement;
WHEREAS
in consideration of the premises and of the mutual agreements, covenants and provisions herein contained, Accenture plc agrees as follows:
NOW, THEREFORE,
1. Pursuant to Section 5.5(d) of the Voting Agreement, as a result of the Transaction Accenture plc hereby assumes all rights and obligations of Accenture Ltd under the Voting Agreement.
2. Accenture plc hereby agrees to indemnify Accenture Ltd against any liabilities that may arise under the Voting Agreement.
3. Pursuant to Sections 5.5(b) of the Voting Agreement, as a result of the Transaction all references to the Class A Common Shares and Class X Common Shares in the Voting Agreement shall hereinafter refer to the Class A Ordinary Shares and Class X Ordinary Shares, respectively, the terms "Covered Shares," "Common Shares," "Employee Covered Shares," shall hereinafter refer to the Class A Ordinary Shares and Class X Ordinary Shares and all references to "Accenture Ltd" or the "Company" shall hereinafter refer to Accenture plc.
4. This Assumption Agreement will become effective on and as of the date hereof.
5. Except as expressly amended hereby, all of the representations, warranties, terms, covenants and conditions of the Voting Agreement will remain unamended and not waived and will continue to be in full force and effect.
6. This Assumption Agreement may be executed in two or more counterparts, each of which will be deemed an original, but all the counterparts will together constitute one and the same instrument.
7. If any provision hereof, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, will to any extent be invalid or unenforceable, the remaining provisions herein, or the application of such provisions to any persons or circumstances other than those to which it is held invalid or unenforceable, will not be affected thereby.
8. This Assumption Agreement and the Voting Agreement represent the entire agreement of parties with respect to the subject matter hereof, and there are no promises, undertakings, representations or warranties by the parties relative to the subject matter hereof not expressly set forth or referred to herein or in the Voting Agreement.
9. THIS ASSUMPTION AGREEMENT AND THE RIGHTS AND OBLIGATIONS OF THE PARTIES UNDER THIS ASSUMPTION AGREEMENT WILL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED AND INTERPRETED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAWS OF BERMUDA.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, Accenture plc has duly executed or caused to be duly executed this Assumption Agreement of the date first above written.
 

Exhibit 10.5
THIS INDEMNIFICATION AGREEMENT is made and effective as of September 1, 2009 (this "") and is between Accenture International Srl, a wholly-owned indirect subsidiary of , a public limited company (the "") (the ""), and ("").
Agreement
Accenture plc
Company
I
ndemnitor
[
Name of director/ secretary
]
Indemnitee
Background
The Company believes that in order to attract and retain highly competent persons to serve as directors or secretary of the Company, it must provide such persons with adequate protection through indemnification against the risks of claims and actions against them arising out of their services to and activities on behalf of the Company.
The Indemnitee has previously served as a [director][secretary] for Accenture Ltd, the publicly-traded holding company for the Accenture group, which, upon the effectiveness of the scheme of arrangement of Accenture Ltd, will become a wholly owned subsidiary of the Company or is expected to become a new [director][secretary] or the Company.
The Company desires and has requested Indemnitee to serve as a [director] [secretary] of the Company and, in order to induce the Indemnitee to serve as a [director] [secretary] of the Company, the Indemnitor has agreed, on request of the Company and for payment of adequate consideration and other benefits received, to grant the Indemnitee the indemnification provided for herein. Indemnitee is willing to so serve on the basis that such indemnification be provided.
The parties by this Agreement desire to set forth their agreement regarding indemnification and the advancement of expenses.
In consideration of Indemnitee's service to the Company and the covenants and agreements set forth below, and for other good and valuable consideration and other benefits received, the receipt and adequacy of which are hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto, intending to be legally bound, hereby agree as follows:
To the fullest extent permitted by the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (the "") every Indemnitee shall be indemnified out of the funds of the Indemnitor against all liabilities, losses, damages or expenses (including but not limited to liabilities under contract, tort and statute or any applicable foreign law or regulation and all legal and other costs and expenses properly payable) arising out of the actual or purported execution or discharge of his duties or the exercise or purported exercise of his powers or otherwise in relation to or in connection with his duties, powers or office as a director or secretary, as applicable, in each case relating to the Company or its subsidiaries.
Section 1.
Indemnification
.
DGCL
To the extent that the Indemnitee is entitled to claim an indemnity pursuant to this Agreement in respect of an amount paid or discharged by him, the relevant indemnity shall take effect as an obligation of the Indemnitor to reimburse the person making such payment (including advance payments of fees or other costs) or effecting such discharge. The Indemnitee hereby undertakes to repay any amounts advanced (without interest) to the extent that it is ultimately determined that Indemnitee is not entitled under this Agreement to be indemnified by the Indemnitor in respect thereof. No other form of undertaking shall be required of Indemnitee other than the execution of this Agreement. This Section 2 shall be subject to Section 3(b).
Section 2.
Reimbursement; Advance Payment of Expenses
.
Section 3. .
Procedure for Indemnification; Notification and Defense of Claim
(a) Promptly after receipt by Indemnitee of notice of the commencement or threatened commencement of any action, suit or proceeding, Indemnitee shall, if a claim in respect thereof is to be made against the Indemnitor hereunder, notify the Indemnitor in writing of the commencement thereof. The failure to promptly notify the Indemnitor of the commencement of the action, suit or proceeding, or of Indemnitee's request for indemnification, will not relieve the Indemnitor from any liability that it may have to Indemnitee hereunder, except to the extent the Indemnitor is actually and materially prejudiced in its defense of such action, suit or proceeding as a result of such failure. To obtain indemnification under this Agreement, Indemnitee shall submit to the Indemnitor a written request therefor including such documentation and information as is reasonably available to Indemnitee and is reasonably necessary to enable the Indemnitor to determine whether and to what extent Indemnitee is entitled to indemnification.
(b) With respect to any action, suit or proceeding of which the Indemnitor is so notified as provided in this Agreement, the Indemnitor shall, subject to the last two sentences of this paragraph, be entitled to assume the defense of such action, suit or proceeding, with counsel reasonably acceptable to Indemnitee, upon the delivery to Indemnitee of written notice of its election to do so. After delivery of such notice, approval of such counsel by Indemnitee and the retention of such counsel by the Indemnitor, the Indemnitor will not be liable to Indemnitee under this Agreement for any subsequently-incurred fees of separate counsel engaged by Indemnitee with respect to the same action, suit or proceeding unless the employment of separate counsel by Indemnitee has been previously authorized in writing by the Indemnitor. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if Indemnitee, based on the advice of his or her counsel, shall have reasonably concluded (with written notice being given to the Indemnitor setting forth the basis for such conclusion) that, in the conduct of any such defense, there is or is reasonably likely to be a conflict of interest or position between the Indemnitor and Indemnitee with respect to a significant issue, then the Indemnitor will not be entitled, without the written consent of Indemnitee, to assume such defense. In addition, the Indemnitor will not be entitled, without the written consent of Indemnitee, to assume the defense of any claim brought by or in the right of the Indemnitor.
(c) To the fullest extent permitted by the DGCL, the Indemnitor's assumption of the defense of an action, suit or proceeding in accordance with paragraph 3(b) will constitute an irrevocable acknowledgement by the Indemnitor that any loss and liability suffered by Indemnitee and expenses (including attorneys' reasonable fees), judgments, fines and amounts paid in settlement by or for the account of Indemnitee incurred in connection therewith are indemnifiable by the Indemnitor under Section 1 of this Agreement.
 
(d) The determination whether to grant Indemnitee's indemnification request shall be made promptly and in any event within 30 days following the Indemnitor's receipt of a request for indemnification in accordance with Section 3(a). If the Indemnitor determines that Indemnitee is entitled to such indemnification or, as contemplated by paragraph 3(c) the Indemnitor has acknowledged such entitlement, the Indemnitor will make payment to Indemnitee of the indemnifiable amount within such 30 day period. If the Indemnitor is not deemed to have so acknowledged such entitlement or the Indemnitor's determination of whether to grant Indemnitee's indemnification request shall not have been made within such 30 day period, the requisite determination of entitlement to indemnification shall nonetheless be deemed to have been made and Indemnitee shall be entitled to such indemnification, absent (i) a misstatement by Indemnitee of a material fact, or an omission of a material fact necessary to make Indemnitee's statement not materially misleading, in connection with the request for indemnification, or (ii) a prohibition of such indemnification under the DGCL.
(e) In the event that (i) the Indemnitor determines in accordance with this Section 3 that Indemnitee is not entitled to indemnification under this Agreement, (ii) the Indemnitor denies a request for indemnification, in whole or in part, or fails to respond or make a determination of entitlement to indemnification within 30 days following receipt of a request for indemnification as described above, (iii) payment of indemnification is not made within such 30 day period, (iv) advancement of expenses is not timely made in accordance with Section 2, or (v) the Indemnitor or any other person takes or threatens to take any action to declare this Agreement void or unenforceable, or institutes any litigation or other action or proceeding designed to deny, or to recover from, the Indemnitee the benefits provided or intended to be provided to Indemnitee hereunder, Indemnitee shall be entitled to an adjudication in any court of competent jurisdiction of his or her entitlement to such indemnification or advancement of expenses. Indemnitee's actual expenses (including attorneys' fees) incurred in connection with successfully establishing Indemnitee's right to indemnification or advancement of expenses, in whole or in part, in any such proceeding or otherwise shall also be indemnified by the Indemnitor to the fullest extent permitted by the DGCL.
(f) Indemnitee shall be presumed to be entitled to indemnification and advancement of expenses under this Agreement upon submission of a request therefor in accordance with Section 2 or Section 3 of this Agreement, as the case may be. The Indemnitor shall have the burden of proof in overcoming such presumption, and such presumption shall be used as a basis for a determination of entitlement to indemnification and advancement of expenses unless the Indemnitor overcomes such presumption by clear and convincing evidence.
Section 4.
Insurance and Subrogation
.
(a) The rights to indemnification and reimbursement of expenses provided by this Agreement are in addition to any other rights to which the Indemnitee may be entitled. The Company or the Indemnitor may purchase and maintain a policy or policies of insurance, providing Indemnitee with coverage for any liability asserted against, and incurred by, Indemnitee or on Indemnitee's behalf in or arising out of the actual or purported execution or discharge of his duties or the exercise or purported exercise of his powers or otherwise in relation to or in connection with his duties, powers or office.
 
(b) In the event of any payment by the Indemnitor under this Agreement, the Indemnitor shall be subrogated to the extent of such payment to all of the rights of recovery of Indemnitee with respect to any insurance policy. Indemnitee shall execute all papers required and take all action necessary to secure such rights, including execution of such documents as are necessary to enable the Indemnitor to bring suit to enforce such rights in accordance with the terms of such insurance policy. The Indemnitor shall pay or reimburse all expenses actually and reasonably incurred by Indemnitee in connection with such subrogation.
(c) The Indemnitor shall not be liable under this Agreement to make any payment of amounts otherwise indemnifiable hereunder (including, but not limited to, judgments, fines and amounts paid in settlement, and ERISA excise taxes or penalties) if and to the extent that Indemnitee has otherwise actually received such payment under this Agreement or any insurance policy, contract, agreement or otherwise.
For purposes of this Agreement, the following definitions shall apply:
Section 5. .
Certain Definitions
(a) The term "" shall be broadly construed and shall include, without limitation, the investigation, preparation, prosecution, defense, settlement, arbitration and appeal of, and the giving of testimony in, any threatened, pending or completed claim, action, suit, arbitration, alternative dispute mechanism or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative or investigative.
action, suit or proceeding
(b) The term "" shall be broadly construed and shall include, without limitation, all direct and indirect costs of any type or nature whatsoever (including, without limitation, all attorneys' fees and related disbursements, appeal bonds, other out-of-pocket costs), actually and reasonably incurred by Indemnitee in connection with either the investigation, defense or appeal of an action, suit or proceeding or establishing or enforcing a right to indemnification under this Agreement or otherwise incurred in connection with a claim that is indemnifiable hereunder.
expenses
(c) The term "" shall be broadly construed and shall include, without limitation, all direct and indirect payments of any type or nature whatsoever, as well as any penalties or excise taxes assessed on a person with respect to an employee benefit plan.
judgments, fines and amounts paid in settlement
The Indemnitor shall have no obligation to indemnify Indemnitee under this Agreement for any amounts paid in settlement of any action, suit or proceeding without the Indemnitor's prior written consent. The Indemnitor shall not settle any action, suit or proceeding in any manner that would impose any fine or other obligation or restriction on Indemnitee or require Indemnitee to admit liability or wrongdoing without Indemnitee's prior written consent. Neither the Indemnitor nor Indemnitee will unreasonably withhold his, her, its or their consent to any proposed settlement.
Section 6. .
Certain Settlement Provisions
 
If any provision or provisions (or portion thereof) of this Agreement shall be invalidated on any ground by any court of competent jurisdiction, then the Indemnitor shall nevertheless indemnify Indemnitee if Indemnitee was or is made or is threatened to be made a party or is otherwise involved in any threatened, pending or completed action, suit or proceeding (brought in the right of the Indemnitor or otherwise), whether civil, criminal, administrative or investigative and whether formal or informal, including appeals, by reason of the fact that Indemnitee is or was or has agreed to serve as a director or secretary of the Company, or while serving as a director or secretary of the Company or by reason of any action alleged to have been taken or omitted in such capacity, from and against all loss and liability suffered and expenses (including attorneys' fees), judgments, fines and amounts paid in settlement reasonably incurred by or on behalf of Indemnitee in connection with such action, suit or proceeding, including any appeals, to the fullest extent permitted by any applicable portion of this Agreement that shall not have been invalidated.
Section 7. .
Savings Clause
. If any provision of this Agreement or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held to be invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any applicable jurisdiction, the parties hereto agree, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, that (i) the validity, legality and enforceability of the other provisions in such jurisdiction shall not be affected or impaired thereby, (ii) any such invalidity, illegality or unenforceability shall not render such provision invalid, illegal, or unenforceable in any other jurisdiction and (iii) they will negotiate an amendment to such provision in such manner that it becomes valid and enforceable without affecting the original intent of the parties or the economic purpose and effect thereof.
Section 8.
Severability
In order to provide for just and equitable contribution in circumstances in which the indemnification provided for herein is held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be unavailable to Indemnitee in whole or in part, it is agreed that, in such event, the Indemnitor shall, to the fullest extent permitted by law, contribute to the payment of all of Indemnitee's loss and liability suffered and expenses (including attorneys' fees), judgments, fines and amounts paid in settlement reasonably incurred by or on behalf of Indemnitee in connection with any action, suit or proceeding, including any appeals, in an amount that is just and equitable in the circumstances; that, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, such contribution shall not be required where such holding by the court is due to any limitation on indemnification set forth in Section 4(c) or Section 6 hereof.
Section 9. .
Contribution
provided
All notices, requests, demands and other communications under this Agreement shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given if (a) delivered by hand, upon receipt by the party to whom such notice or other communication shall have been directed, (b) mailed by certified or registered mail with postage prepaid, upon receipt by the party to whom such notice or other communication shall have been directed, (c) mailed by reputable overnight courier, one day after deposit with such courier and with written verification of receipt, or (d) sent by email or facsimile transmission, with receipt of oral confirmation that such transmission has been received. Notice to the Indemnitor shall be directed to: Accenture International Srl, Attention: Richard Buchband, email:                                     , facsimile:                     , confirmation number:                     , 46A, avenue J-F Kennedy, 1855 Luxembourg and with a copy to: Accenture plc, Attention: Douglas G. Scrivner, General Counsel and Secretary, email:                                     , facsimile:                         , confirmation number:                         , 50 West San Fernando St., San Jose CA 95113 USA. Notice to Indemnitee shall be directed to:                     , email:                             , facsimile:                             , confirmation number:                             .
Section 10. .
Form and Delivery of Communications
 
The provisions for indemnification and advancement of expenses set forth in this Agreement shall not be deemed exclusive of any other rights which Indemnitee may have under any provision of law, in any court in which a proceeding is brought, the Company's articles of association, other agreements or otherwise, and Indemnitee's rights hereunder shall inure to the benefit of the heirs, executors and administrators of Indemnitee. No amendment or alteration of the Company's memorandum of association or articles of association or any other agreement shall adversely affect the rights provided to Indemnitee under this Agreement.
Section 11. .
Non-exclusivity
Nothing contained herein shall be construed as giving Indemnitee any right to be retained as a director of the Company or in the employ of the Company. For the avoidance of doubt, the indemnification and advancement of expenses provided under this Agreement shall continue as to the Indemnitee even though he may have ceased to be a director, secretary, officer, employee or agent of the Company.
Section 12. .
No Construction as Employment Agreement
It is understood that the parties hereto intend this Agreement to be interpreted and enforced so as to provide indemnification to Indemnitee to the fullest extent now or hereafter permitted by the DGCL.
Section 13. .
Interpretation of Agreement
This Agreement and the documents expressly referred to herein constitute the entire agreement between the parties hereto with respect to the matters covered hereby, and any other prior or contemporaneous oral or written understandings or agreements with respect to the matters covered hereby are expressly superseded by this Agreement.
Section 14. .
Entire Agreement
No supplement, modification, waiver or amendment of this Agreement shall be binding unless executed in writing by both of the parties hereto; that either party may modify the notice information related to such party provided in Section 9 by written notice to the other party hereto. No waiver of any of the provisions of this Agreement shall be deemed or shall constitute a waiver of any other provision hereof (whether or not similar) nor shall such waiver constitute a continuing waiver. For the avoidance of doubt, this Agreement may not be terminated by the Indemnitor without Indemnitee's prior written consent. Unless otherwise agreed among the parties hereto, this Agreement shall terminate upon the later of the expiration of (i) the Indemnitee's term of office and (ii) the statutes of limitations applicable to claims covered by Section 1 hereof that may be brought against the Indemnitee (except that with respect to any claims covered by Section 1 hereof that are brought prior to the expiration of the applicable statute of limitations, this Agreement shall not terminate pursuant to this sentence until the extinguishment or satisfaction of such claims).
Section 15. .
Termination, Modification and Waiver
provided
All of the terms and provisions of this Agreement shall be binding upon, shall inure to the benefit of and shall be enforceable by the parties hereto and their respective successors, assigns, heirs, executors, administrators and legal representatives. The Indemnitor shall require and cause any direct or indirect successor (whether by purchase, merger, consolidation or otherwise) to all or substantially all of the business or assets of the Indemnitor, by written agreement in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to Indemnitee, expressly to assume and agree to perform this Agreement in the same manner and to the same extent that the Indemnitor would be required to perform if no such succession had taken place.
Section 16. .
Successor and Assigns
 
The Indemnitor hereby irrevocably and unconditionally (a) agrees that any action or proceeding arising out of or in connection with this Agreement may be brought in the Chancery Court of the State of Delaware (the ""), (b) consents to submit to the non-exclusive jurisdiction of the Delaware Court for purposes of any action or proceeding arising out of or in connection with this Agreement, (c) appoints, to the extent the Indemnitor is not otherwise subject to service of process in the State of Delaware, irrevocably The Corporation Trust Company, 1209 Orange Street, Wilmington, DE 19801, as its agent in the State of Delaware for acceptance of legal process in connection with any such action or proceeding against such party with the same legal force and validity as if served upon the Indemnitor personally within the State of Delaware, (d) waives any objection to the laying of venue of any such action or proceeding in the Delaware Court, and (e) waives, and agrees not to plead or to make, any claim that any such action or proceeding brought in the Delaware Court has been brought in an improper or inconvenient forum.
Section 17. .
Service of Process and Venue
Delaware Court
This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of Delaware. If a court of competent jurisdiction shall make a final determination that the provisions of the law of any jurisdiction other than the State of Delaware govern indemnification by the Indemnitor of Indemnitee, then the indemnification provided under this Agreement shall in all instances be enforceable to the fullest extent permitted under such law, notwithstanding any provision of this Agreement to the contrary.
Section 18. .
Governing Law
This Agreement may be executed in two or more counterparts, each of which shall be deemed to be an original and all of which together shall be deemed to be one and the same instrument, notwithstanding that both parties are not signatories to the original or same counterpart.
Section 19. .
Counterparts
The section and subsection headings contained in this Agreement are for reference purposes only and shall not affect in any way the meaning or interpretation of this Agreement. Section references are to this Agreement unless otherwise specified.
Section 20. .
Headings and Section References
 
This Indemnification Agreement has been duly executed and delivered to be effective as of the date stated above.
 

Exhibit 99.1
NEW YORK; Sept. 1, 2009  Accenture (NYSE: ACN) today completed the change in its place of incorporation to Ireland from Bermuda, following receipt of the required approval from the Supreme Court of Bermuda.
Accenture will continue to be registered with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) and to be subject to SEC reporting requirements. The company's shares will continue to trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the ticker symbol "ACN."
About Accenture
Accenture is a global management consulting, technology services and outsourcing company. Combining unparalleled experience, comprehensive capabilities across all industries and business functions, and extensive research on the world's most successful companies, Accenture collaborates with clients to help them become high-performance businesses and governments. With approximately 177,000 people serving clients in more than 120 countries, the company generated net revenues of US$23.39 billion for the fiscal year ended Aug. 31, 2008. Its home page is www.accenture.com.
Forward-Looking Statements
Except for the historical information and discussions contained herein, statements in this news release may constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve a number of risks, uncertainties and other factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed or implied. These include, without limitation, risks that: the transaction might not achieve the anticipated benefits for Accenture; our results of operations could be adversely affected by economic and political conditions and the effects of these conditions on our clients' businesses and levels of business activity; our global operations are subject to complex risks, some of which might be beyond our control; our ability to attract and retain business may depend on our reputation in the marketplace; as well as the risks, uncertainties and other factors discussed under the "Risk Factors" heading in our most recent annual report on Form 10-K, our quarterly report on Form 10-Q for the period ended May 31, 2009, and other documents filed with or furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission. Statements in this press release speak only as of the date they were made, and Accenture undertakes no duty to update any forward-looking statements made in this news release or to conform such statements to actual results or changes in Accenture's expectations.
Contact:
Roxanne Taylor
Accenture
+1 (917) 452-5106
roxanne.taylor@accenture.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ACN/ACN-8K-20090901092127.txt.gz
TIME:20090901092127
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Unregistered Sales of Equity Securities	Material Modifications to Rights of Security Holders	Changes in Control of Registrant	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Unregistered Sales of Equity Securities
ITEM: Material Modifications to Rights of Security Holders
ITEM: Changes in Control of Registrant
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Assumption and Amendment of Equity Compensation Plans
On September 1, 2009, Accenture plc and Accenture Ltd entered into an Assumption and General Amendment Agreement (the "Assumption Agreement") pursuant to which Accenture Ltd assigned to Accenture plc, and Accenture plc assumed, the following equity incentive plans of Accenture Ltd, including all award or grant documents or agreements thereunder: the 2001 Share Incentive Plan and the 2001 Employee Share Purchase Plan.
All awards or grants under the equity incentive plans continue to be exercisable, issuable, held, available or vest upon the same terms and conditions as under the awards or grants prior to their assumption by Accenture plc, except that upon the exercise, issuance, holding, availability or vesting of those awards or grants, Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares are now issuable or available, or benefits or other amounts determined, in lieu of Accenture Ltd Class A common shares.
This Assumption Agreement is effective as of immediately prior to the effective time of the Transaction (as such term is defined in Item 8.01 below).
The Assumption Agreement is incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Current Report on Form 8-K pursuant to which Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares are deemed registered under Section 12(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act") (the "Form 8-K12B").
Assumption and Amendment of Certain Agreements related to Accenture plc Class X ordinary shares
Accenture plc, as successor to Accenture Ltd, has agreed with the original holders of Accenture SCA Class I common shares and Accenture Canada Holdings Inc. exchangeable shares not to redeem any Class X ordinary share of such holder if the redemption would reduce the number of Class X ordinary shares held by that holder to a number that is less than the number of Accenture SCA Class I common shares or Accenture Canada Holdings Inc. exchangeable shares owned by that holder.
With respect to the Accenture Canada Holdings Inc. exchangeable shares, Accenture plc has entered into the First Supplemental Agreement to Support Agreement with Accenture Ltd and Accenture Canada Holdings Inc., dated September 1, 2009 and the First Supplemental Agreement to Exchange Trust Agreement with Accenture Ltd, Accenture Canada Holdings Inc. and Accenture Inc., dated September 1, 2009, which are incorporated by reference to Exhibits 10.2 and 10.3, respectively, to the Form 8-K12B.
Also related to the exchange of Accenture plc Class X ordinary shares for Accenture SCA Class I common shares and Accenture Canada Holdings Inc. exchangeable shares, Accenture plc entered into an Assumption Agreement of the Amended and Restated Voting Agreement, dated September 1, 2009 (the "Amended Voting Agreement Assumption"), pursuant to which it assumed all rights and obligations of Accenture Ltd under the Amended and Restated Voting Agreement, dated as of February 3, 2005. The Amended Voting Agreement Assumption is incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.4 to the Form 8-K12B.
 
On September 1, 2009, pursuant to the Transaction, each holder of Accenture Ltd Class A common shares outstanding immediately before the Transaction received one Accenture plc Class A ordinary share, in exchange for each outstanding Class A common share of Accenture Ltd (or, in the case of fractional interests in Class A common shares, cash), and each holder of Accenture Ltd Class X common shares outstanding immediately before the Transaction received one Accenture plc Class X ordinary share, in exchange for each outstanding Accenture Ltd Class X common share.
In connection with the Transaction, Accenture plc issued a total of approximately 622,956,209 Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares and 89,918,808 Accenture plc Class X ordinary shares (excluding Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares issued in exchange for Accenture Ltd Class A common shares held by subsidiaries of Accenture Ltd) to the holders of Accenture Ltd Class A common shares and Class X common shares, respectively, immediately prior to the effective time of the Transaction. The terms and conditions of the Scheme of Arrangement (as such term is defined in Item 8.01 below) resulting in the issuance of the securities were sanctioned by the Supreme Court of Bermuda, after a hearing upon that scheme at which all Accenture Ltd shareholders had a right to appear and of which adequate notice had been given. The issuance was exempt from the registration requirements of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Securities Act"), by virtue of Section 3(a)(10) of the Securities Act.
The information included under Item 5.03 and Item 8.01 is incorporated by reference herein.
 
The description of the Transaction under Item 8.01 is incorporated by reference herein.
 
As of September 1, 2009, following the completion of the Transaction, the directors and executive officers of Accenture Ltd immediately prior to the Transaction became the directors and executive officers of Accenture plc. Accenture Ltd's directors carry their terms of office over to the Accenture plc Board of Directors. The Board of Directors of Accenture plc is divided into three classes serving staggered three-year terms. The current class I, II and III terms will expire at the 2011, 2012 and 2010 annual general meetings, respectively.
In connection with the completion of the Transaction, Accenture International Srl, an indirect subsidiary of Accenture plc, has entered into indemnification agreements with each of the directors of Accenture plc that provide for indemnification and expense advancement and include related provisions intended to facilitate the indemnitee's receipt of such benefits. A form of the indemnification agreement is incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.5 to the Form 8-K12B.
 
On September 1, 2009, in connection with and effective upon completion of the Transaction, the rights of shareholders of Accenture plc will be governed by its memorandum and articles of association. The summary of the material terms of the memorandum and articles of association and the comparison of the rights of shareholders under those documents described under the headings "Description of Accenture plc Share Capital" and "Comparison of Rights of Shareholders and Powers of the Board of Directors" in Accenture Ltd's definitive proxy statement dated June 24, 2009 and filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "Commission") on June 24, 2009 is incorporated by reference herein. The complete text of the memorandum and articles of association of Accenture plc is incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to the Form 8-K12B and is incorporated by reference herein. The summary of the memorandum and articles of association of Accenture plc is qualified in its entirety by reference to Exhibit 3.1 of the Form 8-K12B.
 
THE TRANSACTION
On September 1, 2009, Accenture Ltd and Accenture plc completed a transaction effected by way of a scheme of arrangement under Bermuda law (the "Scheme of Arrangement") pursuant to which each holder of Accenture Ltd Class A common shares or Class X common shares outstanding immediately prior to the effectiveness of the Scheme of Arrangement received one Accenture plc Class A ordinary share or Class X ordinary share in exchange for each outstanding Accenture Ltd Class A common share or Class X common share, as applicable, and cash for any fractional shares (the "Transaction"). As a result of the Transaction, Accenture Ltd became a direct, wholly-owned subsidiary of Accenture plc. On September 1, 2009, Accenture plc issued a press release announcing the completion of the Transaction. The press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 of the Form 8-K12B.
Prior to the Transaction, the Accenture Ltd Class A common shares were registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Exchange Act, and listed on the New York Stock Exchange ("NYSE") under the symbol "ACN" and the Accenture Ltd Class X common shares were registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Exchange Act.
As a result of the Transaction, all of the Accenture Ltd Class A and Class X common shares were cancelled and holders thereof received Accenture plc Class A and Class X ordinary shares, as applicable, on a one-for-one basis (or, in the case of fractional interests in Class A common shares, cash). Accordingly, Accenture Ltd requested that the NYSE file with the Commission a Form 25 to remove the Accenture Ltd Class A common shares from listing on the NYSE. Accenture Ltd expects to file a Form 15 with the Commission to terminate the registration of the Accenture Ltd Class A and Class X common shares and suspend its reporting obligations under Sections 13 and 15(d) of the Exchange Act.
Pursuant to Rule 12g-3(a) promulgated under the Exchange Act, the Accenture plc Class X ordinary shares are deemed registered under Section 12(g) of the Exchange Act.
DESCRIPTION OF ACCENTURE PLC SHARE CAPITAL
The following description of our share capital is a summary. For the purposes of the following description, references to the terms "Accenture," "we," "our Company," "our" and "us" refer to Accenture plc and its subsidiaries. This summary is not complete and is subject to the complete text of Accenture plc's memorandum and articles of association, which is incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to the Form 8-K12B. We encourage you to read this document carefully.
Capital Structure
The authorized share capital of Accenture plc is 40,000 and US$517,500 divided into 40,000 ordinary shares with a nominal value of 1 per share, 20,000,000,000 Class A ordinary shares with a nominal value of US$0.0000225 per share, 1,000,000,000 Class X ordinary shares with a nominal value of US$0.0000225 per share and 2,000,000,000 undesignated shares with a nominal value of US$0.0000225 per share. The authorized share capital includes 40,000 ordinary shares with a nominal value of 1 per share in order to satisfy statutory requirements for all Irish public limited companies commencing operations.
Authorized Share Capital.    
Accenture plc has the authority to issue authorized but unissued Class A ordinary shares, Class X ordinary shares or undesignated shares. The undesignated shares may be designated and issued as preferred shares, without further vote or action by our shareholders up to the maximum number authorized.
The authorized share capital may be increased or reduced by way of an ordinary resolution of Accenture plc's shareholders. The shares comprising the authorized share capital of Accenture plc may be divided into shares of such nominal value as the resolution shall prescribe.
As a matter of Irish law, the directors of a company may issue authorized but unissued new ordinary or preferred shares without shareholder approval once authorized to do so by the articles of association of the company or by an ordinary resolution adopted by the shareholders at a general meeting. An ordinary resolution requires over 50% of the votes of a company's shareholders cast at a general meeting. The authority conferred can be granted for a maximum period of five years, at which point it must be renewed by the shareholders of the company by an ordinary resolution. Because of this requirement of Irish law, the articles of association of Accenture plc authorize the Board of Directors of Accenture plc to issue new ordinary or preferred shares without shareholder approval for a period of five years from the date of Accenture plc's incorporation on June 10, 2009.
The rights and restrictions to which the ordinary shares are subject are prescribed in Accenture plc's articles of association. Accenture plc's articles of association entitle the Board of Directors, without shareholder approval, to determine the terms of the undesignated shares issued by Accenture plc. The Accenture plc Board of Directors is authorized, without obtaining any vote or consent of the holders of any class or series of shares unless expressly provided by the terms of that class or series of shares, to provide from time to time for the issuance of other classes or series of preferred shares through the issue of the authorized but unissued undesignated shares and to establish the characteristics of each class or series, including the number of shares, designations, relative voting rights, dividend rights, liquidation and other rights, redemption, repurchase or exchange rights and any other preferences and relative, participating, optional or other rights and limitations not inconsistent with applicable law.
Irish law does not recognize fractional shares held of record; accordingly, Accenture plc's articles of association do not provide for the issuance of fractional Accenture plc shares and the official Irish register of Accenture plc will not reflect any fractional shares.
Under Irish law and the memorandum and articles of association of Accenture plc there are no limitations on the right of nonresidents of Ireland or owners who are not citizens of Ireland to hold or vote shares of Accenture plc.
Immediately prior to the Transaction, the issued share capital of Accenture plc was 40,000, comprised of 40,000 ordinary shares, with nominal value of 1 per share (the "Euro Share Capital"). In connection with the consummation of the Transaction, the Euro Share Capital was acquired by Accenture plc and was then cancelled by Accenture plc. Accenture plc issued approximately 622,956,209 Class A ordinary shares and 89,918,808 Class X ordinary shares (excluding 54,063,554 Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares issued in respect of Accenture Ltd Class A common shares held by subsidiaries of Accenture Ltd), each with a nominal value of US$0.0000225, equal to the number of whole Accenture Ltd Class A and Class X common shares that were cancelled as part of the Transaction. Accenture plc Class A and Class X ordinary shares issued pursuant to the Transaction are fully paid and non-assessable. There are no ordinary shares of 1.00 or undesignated shares of US$0.0000225 in issue.
Issued Share Capital.    
Pre-emption Rights, Share Warrants and Share Options
Certain statutory pre-emption rights apply automatically in favor of Accenture plc shareholders where shares in Accenture plc are to be issued for cash. However, Accenture plc has opted out of these pre-emption rights in its articles of association as permitted under Irish law. Because Irish law requires this opt-out to be renewed every five years by a special resolution of the shareholders, Accenture plc's articles of association provide that this opt-out will lapse five years after the incorporation of Accenture plc on June 10, 2009. A special resolution requires not less than 75% of the votes of Accenture plc shareholders cast at a general meeting. If the opt-out is not renewed, shares issued for cash must be offered to pre-existing shareholders of Accenture plc to their existing shareholding before the shares can be issued to any new shareholders. The statutory pre-emption rights do not apply where shares are issued for non-cash consideration and do not apply to the issue of non-equity shares (that is, shares that have the right to participate only up to a specified amount in any income or capital distribution).
pro rata
The articles of association of Accenture plc provide that, subject to any shareholder approval requirement under any laws, regulations or the rules of any stock exchange to which Accenture plc is subject, the Board of Directors is authorized, from time to time, in its discretion, to grant such persons, for such periods and upon such terms as the Board of Directors deems advisable, options to purchase such number of shares of any class or classes or of any series of any class as the Board of Directors may deem advisable, and to cause warrants or other appropriate instruments evidencing such options to be issued. The Irish Companies Acts provide that directors may issue share warrants or options without shareholder approval once authorized to do so by the articles of association or an ordinary resolution of shareholders. The Board of Directors may issue shares upon exercise of warrants or options without shareholder approval or authorization.
Accenture plc is subject to the rules of the NYSE that require shareholder approval of certain share issuances.
Dividends
Under Irish law, dividends and distributions may only be made from distributable reserves. Distributable reserves, broadly, means the accumulated realized profits of Accenture plc less accumulated realized losses of Accenture plc. At incorporation, there were no "distributable reserves." No dividend may be made unless the net assets of Accenture plc are equal to, or in excess of, the aggregate of Accenture plc's called up share capital plus undistributable reserves and the distribution does not reduce Accenture plc's net assets below such aggregate. Undistributable reserves include the share premium account, the capital redemption reserve fund and the amount by which Accenture plc's accumulated unrealized profits, so far as not previously utilized by any capitalization, exceed Accenture plc's accumulated unrealized losses, so far as not previously written off in a reduction or reorganization of capital.
The determination as to whether or not Accenture plc has sufficient distributable reserves to fund a dividend must be made by reference to "relevant accounts" of Accenture plc. The "relevant accounts" will be either the last set of unconsolidated annual audited financial statements or unaudited financial statements prepared in accordance with the Irish Companies Acts, which give a "true and fair view" of Accenture plc's unconsolidated financial position and accord with accepted accounting practice. The relevant accounts must be filed in the Companies Registration Office (the official public registry for companies in Ireland).
We received the approval of Accenture Ltd's shareholders at the August 5, 2009 shareholder meetings to approve a reduction of the share premium account (similar to additional paid-in capital) of Accenture plc to establish distributable reserves of Accenture plc. Before the transaction, the previous shareholders of Accenture plc (Accenture Ltd and its nominees) passed a resolution to approve the reduction of the share premium account of Accenture plc. We are currently in the process of seeking the approval of the Irish High Court, which is required for the reduction of the share premium account to be effective and for the distributable reserves to be created.
The mechanism as to who declares a dividend and when a dividend shall become payable is governed by the articles of association of Accenture plc. Accenture plc's articles of association authorize the directors to declare such dividends as appear justified from the profits of Accenture plc without the approval of the shareholders at a general meeting. The Board of Directors may also recommend a dividend to be approved and declared by the shareholders at a general meeting. Although the shareholders may direct that the payment be made by distribution of assets, shares or cash, no dividend issued may exceed the amount recommended by the directors. The dividends can be declared and paid in the form of cash or non-cash assets.
The directors of Accenture plc may deduct from any dividend payable to any member all sums of money (if any) payable by such member to Accenture plc in relation to the Accenture plc ordinary shares.
The directors of Accenture plc are also entitled to issue shares with preferred rights to participate in dividends declared by Accenture plc in one or more series and to fix the rights, preferences, privileges and restrictions attaching to those shares, including dividend rights, conversion rights, voting rights, redemption terms and prices, liquidation preferences and the numbers of shares constituting any series and the designation of any series, without further vote or action by the shareholders. The holders of such preferred shares may, depending on their terms, be entitled to claim arrears of a declared dividend out of subsequently declared dividends in priority to ordinary shareholders.
Any series of preferred shares could, as determined by Accenture plc's Board of Directors at the time of issuance, rank senior to the Accenture plc ordinary shares with respect to dividends, voting rights, redemption and/or liquidation rights. These preferred shares are of the type commonly known as "blank-check" preferred stock.
Holders of Accenture plc Class X ordinary shares are not entitled to receive dividends and are not entitled to be paid any amount upon a winding-up of Accenture plc.
Share Repurchases, Redemptions and Conversions
Overview
Article 5(b)(iv) of Accenture plc's articles of association provides that any ordinary share which Accenture plc has acquired or agreed to acquire shall be deemed to be a redeemable share. Accordingly, for Irish law purposes, the repurchase of ordinary shares by Accenture plc will technically be effected as a redemption of those shares as described below under "Repurchases and Redemptions by Accenture plc." If the articles of association of Accenture plc did not contain Article 5(b)(iv), repurchases by Accenture plc would be subject to many of the same rules that apply to purchases of Accenture plc shares by subsidiaries described below under "Purchases by Subsidiaries of Accenture plc," including the shareholder approval requirements described below and the requirement that any on-market purchases be effected on a "recognized stock exchange." Except where otherwise noted, when we refer elsewhere in this Description of Accenture plc Share Capital to repurchasing or buying back Accenture plc Class A or Class X ordinary shares, we are referring to the redemption of ordinary shares by Accenture plc pursuant to Article 5(b)(iv) of the articles of association or the purchase of Accenture plc ordinary shares by a subsidiary of Accenture plc, in each case in accordance with the Accenture plc articles of association and Irish law as described below.
Repurchases and Redemptions by Accenture plc
Under Irish law, a company can issue redeemable shares and redeem them out of distributable reserves (which are described above under "Dividends") or the proceeds of a new issue of shares for that purpose. The issue of redeemable shares may only be made by Accenture plc where the nominal value of the issued share capital that is not redeemable is not less than 10% of the nominal value of the total issued share capital of Accenture plc. All redeemable shares must also be fully paid and the terms of redemption of the shares must provide for payment on redemption. Redeemable shares may, upon redemption, be cancelled or held in treasury. Shareholder approval will not be required to redeem Accenture plc shares, and these shares are redeemable at the option of Accenture plc.
The Board of Directors of Accenture plc will also be entitled to issue preferred shares which may be redeemed at the option of either Accenture plc or the shareholder, depending on the terms of such preferred shares.
Repurchased and redeemed Class A ordinary shares may be cancelled or held as treasury shares. The nominal value of treasury shares held by Accenture plc at any time must not exceed 10% of the nominal value of the issued share capital of Accenture plc. While Accenture plc holds shares as treasury shares, it cannot exercise any voting rights in respect of those shares. Treasury shares may be cancelled by Accenture plc or re-issued subject to certain conditions.
Purchases by Subsidiaries of Accenture plc
Under Irish law, it may be permissible for an Irish or non-Irish subsidiary to purchase Accenture plc shares either on-market or off-market. A general authority of the shareholders of Accenture plc is required to allow a subsidiary of Accenture plc to make on-market purchases of Accenture plc shares; however, as long as this general authority has been granted, no specific shareholder authority for a particular on-market purchase by a subsidiary of Accenture plc shares is required. We expect that Accenture plc will seek to renew such general authority, which must expire no later than 18 months after the date on which it was granted, at the first annual general meeting of Accenture plc in 2010 and at subsequent annual general meetings. In order for a subsidiary of Accenture plc to make an on-market purchase of Accenture plc's shares, such shares must be purchased on a "recognized stock exchange."
The NYSE, on which the Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares are listed, is not currently specified as a recognized stock exchange for this purpose by Irish law. We understand, however, that it is likely that the Irish authorities will take appropriate steps in the near future to add the NYSE to the list of recognized stock exchanges. For an off-market purchase by a subsidiary of Accenture plc, the proposed purchase contract must be authorized by special resolution of the shareholders of Accenture plc before the contract is entered into. The person whose shares are to be bought back cannot vote in favor of the special resolution and, for at least 21 days prior to the special resolution, the purchase contract must be on display or must be available for inspection by shareholders at the registered office of Accenture plc.
The number of shares held by the subsidiaries of Accenture plc at any time will count as treasury shares for the purposes of the permitted treasury share threshold of 10% of the nominal value of the issued share capital of Accenture plc. While a subsidiary holds Accenture plc shares, it cannot exercise any voting rights in respect of those shares. The acquisition of the Accenture plc shares by a subsidiary must be funded out of distributable reserves of the subsidiary.
Existing Share Repurchase Program
Because repurchases of Accenture plc shares by Accenture plc will technically be effected as a redemption of those shares pursuant to Article 5(b)(iv) of the articles of association, separate shareholder approval for such repurchases will not be required.
However, because purchases of Accenture plc shares by subsidiaries of Accenture plc may be made only on a "recognized stock exchange" and only if the required shareholder approval has been obtained, we expect that the shareholder authorization for purchases by subsidiaries of Accenture plc described above will be effective as of the date on which the NYSE becomes a recognized stock exchange for this purpose.
Bonus Shares
Under Accenture plc's articles of association, the Board of Directors may resolve to capitalize any amount credited to any reserve or fund available for distribution or the share premium account of Accenture plc for issuance and distribution to shareholders as fully paid bonus shares on the same basis of entitlement as would apply in respect of a dividend distribution.
Consolidation and Division; Subdivision
Under its articles of association, Accenture plc may by ordinary resolution of its Class A and Class X ordinary shareholders, voting as a single class, consolidate and divide all or any of its share capital into shares of larger nominal value than its existing shares or subdivide its shares into smaller amounts than is fixed by its articles of association.
Reduction of Share Capital
Accenture plc may, by ordinary resolution, reduce its authorized share capital. Accenture plc also may, by special resolution and subject to confirmation by the Irish High Court, reduce or cancel its issued share capital.
Meetings of Shareholders
Accenture plc is required to hold an annual general meeting within eighteen months of incorporation and at intervals of no more than fifteen months thereafter, provided that an annual general meeting is held in each calendar year following the first annual general meeting, no more than nine months after Accenture plc's fiscal year-end. The first annual general meeting of Accenture plc may be held outside Ireland. Thereafter, any annual general meeting may be held outside Ireland if a resolution so authorizing has been passed at the preceding annual general meeting. Because of the fifteen-month requirement described in this paragraph, Accenture plc's articles of association include a provision reflecting this requirement of Irish law. At any annual general meeting only such business shall be conducted as shall have been brought before the meeting (a) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or (b) by any member entitled to vote at such meeting who complies with the procedures set forth in the articles of association.
Extraordinary general meetings of Accenture plc may be convened by (i) the Board of Directors, (ii) on requisition of the shareholders holding not less than 10% of the paid up share capital of Accenture plc carrying voting rights or (iii) on requisition of Accenture plc's auditors. Extraordinary general meetings are generally held for the purposes of approving shareholder resolutions of Accenture plc as may be required from time to time. At any extraordinary general meeting only such business shall be conducted as is set forth in the notice thereof.
Notice of a general meeting must be given to all shareholders of Accenture plc and to the auditors of Accenture plc. The minimum notice periods under Irish law are 21 days' notice in writing for an annual general meeting or an extraordinary general meeting to approve a special resolution and 14 days' notice in writing for any other extraordinary general meeting. Accenture plc's articles of association provide a minimum notice period of 30 days for an annual general meeting and 21 days for an extraordinary general meeting to approve a special resolution to approximate the equivalent provisions of Accenture Ltd's bye-laws. Accenture plc's articles of association provide for a minimum notice period of 14 days' notice for all other extraordinary general meetings reflecting these requirements of Irish law.
In the case of an extraordinary general meeting convened by shareholders of Accenture plc, the proposed purpose of the meeting must be set out in the requisition notice. The requisition notice can contain any resolution. Upon receipt of this requisition notice, the Board of Directors has 21 days to convene a meeting of Accenture plc's shareholders to vote on the matters set out in the requisition notice. This meeting must be held within two months of the receipt of the requisition notice. If the Board of Directors does not convene the meeting within such 21-day period, the requisitioning shareholders, or any of them representing more than one half of the total voting rights of all of them, may themselves convene a meeting, which meeting must be held within three months of the receipt of the requisition notice.
The only matters which must, as a matter of Irish law, be transacted at an annual general meeting are the presentation of the annual accounts, balance sheet and reports of the directors and auditors, the appointment of auditors and the fixing of the auditor's remuneration (or delegation of same). If no resolution is made in respect of the reappointment of an auditor at an annual general meeting, the previous auditor will be deemed to have continued in office.
If the directors become aware that the net assets of Accenture plc are half or less of the amount of Accenture plc's share capital and share premium, the directors of Accenture plc must convene an extraordinary general meeting of Accenture plc's shareholders not later than 28 days from the date that they learn of this fact. This meeting must be convened for the purposes of considering whether any, and if so what, measures should be taken to address the situation.
Directors
The articles of association of Accenture plc provide for a Board of Directors that is divided into three classes serving staggered three-year terms. Directors are elected by the affirmative vote of a majority of the votes cast by shareholders. Shareholders do not have cumulative voting rights. Accordingly, the holders of a majority of the voting rights attaching to the Accenture plc Class A and Class X ordinary shares will, as a practical matter, be entitled to control the election of all directors. At each annual general meeting, directors will be elected for a full term of three years to succeed those directors of the relevant class whose terms are expiring. Any nominee for director who does not receive a majority of the votes cast is not elected to the Board of Directors. Holders of Class A and Class X ordinary shares are entitled to one vote per each such share at all meetings at which directors are elected. Accenture plc's articles of association provide for a minimum number of directors of eight. If at any time the number of directors falls below the minimum, the remaining directors may act only for the purposes of appointing additional directors to satisfy the requirements of the articles of association with respect to the minimum number of directors.
Accenture plc's articles of association provide that a director may be removed with or without cause at the request of not less than 75% of the other directors.
Voting
All votes at a general meeting will be decided by way of poll. Every shareholder shall on a poll have one vote for each Class A or Class X ordinary share that he or she holds as of the record date for the meeting (and, except as otherwise provided by the Irish Companies Acts or Accenture plc's memorandum and articles of association, the holders of Class A and Class X ordinary shares shall vote as a single class). Voting rights on a poll may be exercised by shareholders registered in Accenture plc's share register as of the record date for the meeting or by a duly appointed proxy of such a registered shareholder, which proxy need not be a shareholder. All proxies must be appointed in the manner prescribed by Accenture plc's articles of association. The articles of association of Accenture plc permit the appointment of proxies by the shareholders to be notified to Accenture plc electronically.
Except where a greater majority is required by Irish law or Accenture plc's memorandum and articles of association, any question proposed for consideration at any general meeting of Accenture plc or of any class of shareholders shall be decided by a simple majority of the votes cast by shareholders entitled to vote at such meeting.
In accordance with the articles of association of Accenture plc, the directors of Accenture plc may from time to time cause Accenture plc to issue preferred shares. These preferred shares may have such voting rights as may be specified in the terms of such preferred shares (e.g., they may carry more votes per share than ordinary shares or may entitle their holders to a class vote on such matters as may be specified in the terms of the preferred shares).
Treasury shares and shares of Accenture plc held by subsidiaries of Accenture plc will not be entitled to vote at general meetings of shareholders.
Irish law requires "special resolutions" of the shareholders at a general meeting to approve certain matters. A special resolution requires not less than 75% of the votes cast of Accenture plc's shareholders at a general meeting. This may be contrasted with "ordinary resolutions," which require a simple majority of the votes of Accenture plc's shareholders cast at a general meeting. Examples of matters requiring special resolutions include:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
A scheme of arrangement with one or more classes of shareholders requires a court order from the Irish High Court and the approval of: (1) not less than 75% by value of the voting members of each class of shares participating in the scheme of arrangement; and (2) more than 50% in number of the voting members of each class of shares participating in the scheme of arrangement, at a meeting called to approve the scheme.
Variation of Rights Attaching to a Class or Series of Shares
Variation of all or any special rights attached to any class of Accenture plc shares is addressed in the articles of association of Accenture plc as well as the Irish Companies Acts. Any variation by Accenture plc of class rights attaching to the issued Accenture plc shares must also be approved by a special resolution of the shareholders of the class affected or by the written consent of the holders of not less than 75% of the shareholders of the class affected.
Amendment of Governing Documents
Irish companies may only alter their memorandum and articles of association by the passing of a special resolution of shareholders. In addition, Paragraph 6 of the memorandum of association of Accenture plc provides that any amendment to that paragraph and to the provisions of Accenture plc's articles of association relating to mergers, any sale, lease or exchange by Accenture plc of all or substantially all of its property or assets and the appointment and removal of directors, which are not approved by Accenture plc's Board of Directors, must be approved by shareholders holding not less than 80% of Accenture plc's issued and outstanding voting shares
.
Quorum for General Meetings
The presence of two shareholders, in person or by proxy and having the right to attend and vote at the meeting, and of the holders of more than 50% of the Accenture plc ordinary shares outstanding constitutes a quorum for the conduct of business (provided that, if Accenture plc has only one shareholder, one shareholder present in person or by proxy will constitute a quorum). No business may take place at a general meeting of Accenture plc if a quorum is not present in person or by proxy. The Board of Directors has no authority to waive quorum requirements stipulated in the articles of association of Accenture plc. Abstentions and broker "non-votes" will be counted as present for purposes of determining whether there is a quorum in respect of the proposals. A broker "non-vote" occurs when a nominee (such as a broker) holding shares for a beneficial owner abstains from voting on a particular proposal because the nominee does not have discretionary voting power for that proposal and has not received instructions from the beneficial owner on how to vote those shares.
Inspection of Books and Records
Under Irish law, shareholders have the right to: (i) receive a copy of the memorandum and articles of association of Accenture plc and any act of the Irish Government which alters the memorandum of association of Accenture plc; (ii) inspect and obtain copies of the minutes of general meetings and resolutions of Accenture plc; (iii) inspect and receive a copy of the register of shareholders, register of directors and secretaries, register of directors' interests and other statutory registers maintained by Accenture plc; (iv) receive copies of balance sheets and directors' and auditors' reports which have previously been sent to shareholders prior to an annual general meeting; and (v) receive balance sheets of a subsidiary company of Accenture plc which have previously been sent to shareholders prior to an annual general meeting for the preceding ten years. The auditors of Accenture plc will also have the right to inspect all books, records and vouchers of Accenture plc. The auditors' report must be circulated to the shareholders with Accenture plc's Irish Financial Statements 21 days before the annual general meeting and must be read to the shareholders at Accenture plc's annual general meeting.
Accenture plc's Board of Directors has adopted a resolution providing that its shareholders have the right to inspect, at a principal place of business in the United States, copies of certain of our books and records, including shareholder names, addresses, and shareholdings in accordance with the terms set forth in the Model Business Corporation Act, as that act may be amended from time to time. If the Model Business Corporation Act does not provide access to the shareholder names, addresses, and shareholdings, these books and records will be made available for inspection by our shareholders for purposes properly related to their status as shareholders.
Acquisitions
There are a number of mechanisms for acquiring an Irish public limited company, including:
 
 
 
Under Irish law, there is no requirement for a company's shareholders to approve a sale, lease or exchange of all or substantially all of a company's property and assets. However, Accenture plc's articles of association provide that the approval of (i) the Board of Directors by a resolution passed with the approval of a majority of those directors then in office and eligible to vote on that resolution and (ii) a shareholder resolution passed by a majority of votes cast on the relevant record date is required to approve a sale, lease or exchange of all or substantially all of its property or assets.
Appraisal Rights
Generally, under Irish law, shareholders of an Irish company do not have appraisal rights. Under the EC (Cross-Border Mergers) Regulations 2008 governing the merger of an Irish public limited company and a company incorporated in the European Economic Area, a shareholder (a) who voted against the special resolution approving the merger or (b) of a company in which 90% of the shares is held by the other company the party to the merger of the transferor company, has the right to request that the company acquire its shares for cash.
Disclosure of Interests in Shares
Under the Irish Companies Acts, there is a notification requirement for shareholders who acquire or cease to be interested in 5% of any class of voting shares of an Irish public limited company. A shareholder of Accenture plc must therefore make such a notification to Accenture plc if as a result of a transaction the shareholder will be interested in 5% or more of the Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares or 5% or more of the Accenture plc Class X ordinary shares; or if as a result of a transaction a shareholder who was interested in more than 5% of the relevant class of Accenture plc shares ceases to be so interested. Where a shareholder is interested in more than 5% of the Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares or 5% or more of the Accenture plc Class X ordinary shares, any alteration of his or her interest that brings his or her total holding through the nearest whole percentage number, whether an increase or a reduction, must be notified to Accenture plc. The relevant percentage figure is calculated by reference to the aggregate nominal value of the shares in which the shareholder is interested as a proportion of the entire nominal value of the relevant class of share capital. Where the percentage level of the shareholder's interest does not amount to a whole percentage this figure may be rounded down to the next whole number. All such disclosures should be notified to Accenture plc within 5 business days of the transaction or alteration of the shareholder's interests that gave rise to the requirement to notify. Where a person fails to comply with the notification requirements described above no right or interest of any kind whatsoever in respect of any shares in Accenture plc concerned, held by such person, shall be enforceable by such person, whether directly or indirectly, by action or legal proceeding. However, such person may apply to the court to have the rights attaching to the shares concerned reinstated.
In addition to the above disclosure requirement, Accenture plc, under the Irish Companies Acts, may by notice in writing require a person whom Accenture plc knows or has reasonable cause to believe to be, or at any time during the three years immediately preceding the date on which such notice is issued, to have been interested in shares comprised in Accenture plc's relevant share capital to: (a) indicate whether or not it is the case, and (b) where such person holds or has during that time held an interest in the Accenture plc shares, to give such further information as may be required by Accenture plc including particulars of such person's own past or present interests in Accenture plc shares. Any information given in response to the notice is required to be given in writing within such reasonable time as may be specified in the notice.
 
Where such a notice is served by Accenture plc on a person who is or was interested in Accenture plc shares and that person fails to give Accenture plc any information required within the reasonable time specified, Accenture plc may apply to court for an order directing that the affected shares be subject to certain restrictions. Under the Irish Companies Acts, the restrictions that may be placed on the shares by the court are as follows:
 
 
 
 
Where shares in Accenture plc are subject to these restrictions, the court may order the shares to be sold and may also direct that the shares shall cease to be subject to these restrictions.
Anti-Takeover Provisions
Accenture plc's articles of association provide that any merger of Accenture plc and another company requires the approval of (i) the Board of Directors by a resolution passed with the approval of a majority of those directors then in office and eligible to vote on that resolution and (ii) an ordinary resolution of shareholders in addition to any other sanction required by applicable law, such as the EC (Cross-Border Mergers) Regulations 2008 described above.
Irish Takeover Rules and Substantial Acquisition Rules
A transaction by virtue of which a third party is seeking to acquire 30% or more of the voting rights of Accenture plc will be governed by the Irish Takeover Panel Act 1997 and the Irish Takeover Rules made thereunder and will be regulated by the Irish Takeover Panel. The "General Principles" of the Irish Takeover Rules and certain important aspects of the Irish Takeover Rules are described below.
General Principles
The Irish Takeover Rules are built on the following General Principles which will apply to any transaction regulated by the Irish Takeover Panel:
 
 
 
 
 
 
Mandatory Offer
If an acquisition of shares were to increase the aggregate holding of an acquirer and its concert parties to shares carrying 30% or more of the voting rights in Accenture plc, the acquirer and, depending on the circumstances, its concert parties would be mandatorily required (except with the consent of the Irish Takeover Panel) to make a cash offer for the remaining outstanding shares at a price not less than the highest price paid for the shares by the acquirer or its concert parties during the previous 12 months. This requirement would also be triggered by an acquisition of shares by a person holding (together with its concert parties) shares carrying between 30% and 50% of the voting rights in Accenture plc if the effect of such acquisition were to increase the percentage of the voting rights held by that person (together with its concert parties) by 0.05% within a 12 month period. A single holder (that is, a holder excluding any parties acting in concert with the holder) holding more than 50% of the voting rights of a company is not subject to this rule.
Voluntary Offer; Requirements to Make a Cash Offer and Minimum Price Requirements
A voluntary offer is an offer that is not a mandatory offer. If a bidder or any of its concert parties acquire Accenture plc shares of the same class as the shares the subject of the voluntary offer within the period of three months prior to the commencement of the offer period, the offer price must be not less than the highest price paid for Accenture plc shares of that class by the bidder or its concert parties during that period. The Irish Takeover Panel has the power to extend the "look back" period to 12 months if the Irish Takeover Panel, having regard to the General Principles, believes it is appropriate to do so.
If the bidder or any of its concert parties has acquired Accenture plc shares of the same class as the shares the subject of the voluntary offer (i) during the period of 12 months prior to the commencement of the offer period which represent more than 10% of the total shares the subject of the voluntary offer or (ii) at any time after the commencement of the offer period, the offer shall be in cash (or accompanied by a full cash alternative) and the price per share shall be not less than the highest price paid by the bidder or its concert parties for shares (of the class of shares the subject of the voluntary offer) during, in the case of (i), the period of 12 months prior to the commencement of the offer period and, in the case of (ii), the offer period. The Irish Takeover Panel may apply this rule to a bidder who, together with its concert parties, has acquired less than 10% of the total shares of the class of shares the subject of the offer in the 12 month period prior to the commencement of the offer period if the Panel, having regard to the General Principles, considers it just and proper to do so.
An offer period will generally commence from the date of the first announcement of the offer or proposed offer.
Substantial Acquisition Rules
The Irish Takeover Rules also contain rules governing substantial acquisitions of shares which restrict the speed at which a person may increase his or her holding of shares and rights over shares to an aggregate of between 15% and 30% of the voting rights of Accenture plc. Except in certain circumstances, an acquisition or series of acquisitions of shares or rights over shares representing 10% or more of the voting rights of Accenture plc is prohibited, if such acquisition(s), when aggregated with shares or rights already held, would result in the acquirer holding 15% or more but less than 30% of the voting rights of Accenture plc and such acquisitions are made within a period of seven days. These rules also require accelerated disclosure of acquisitions of shares or rights over shares relating to such holdings.
Frustrating Action
Under the Irish Takeover Rules, the Board of Directors of Accenture plc is not permitted to take any action which might frustrate an offer for the Accenture plc shares once the Board of Directors has received an approach which may lead to an offer or has reason to believe an offer is imminent except as noted below. Potentially frustrating actions such as (i) the issue of shares, options or convertible securities, (ii) material disposals, (iii) entering into contracts other than in the ordinary course of business or (iv) any action, other than seeking alternative offers, which may result in frustration of an offer, are prohibited during the course of an offer or at any time during which the Board of Directors has reason to believe an offer is imminent. Exceptions to this prohibition are available where:
 
 
 
 
 
Corporate Governance
The articles of association of Accenture plc allocate authority over the management of Accenture plc to the Board of Directors. The Board of Directors may then delegate management of Accenture plc to committees of the Board of Directors, executives or to a management team, but regardless, the directors will remain responsible, as a matter of Irish law, for the proper management of the affairs of Accenture plc. Accenture plc's Board of Directors includes an Audit Committee, a Compensation Committee, a Nominating & Governance Committee and a Finance Committee. Accenture plc's Board of Directors has also adopted Corporate Governance Guidelines from its predecessor Accenture Ltd. The Board of Directors may create new committees or change the responsibilities of existing committees from time to time.
Accenture plc's Board of Directors has adopted resolutions, providing, among other things, that:
 
 
 
Notwithstanding the passing of these resolutions, all substantive and procedural requirements of Irish law would have to be satisfied for any derivative proceedings or other legal actions to be brought in Ireland by a shareholder against Accenture plc or any of its directors or officers. In addition, there can be no assurance that Irish courts or courts in other jurisdictions would enforce court judgments obtained in the United States against Accenture plc or its directors in Ireland or in other countries where Accenture plc has assets.
Legal Name; Formation; Fiscal Year; Registered Office
The legal and commercial name of Accenture plc is Accenture public limited company. Accenture plc was incorporated in Ireland, as a public limited company on June 10, 2009 with company registration number 471706. Accenture plc's fiscal year ends on August 31 and Accenture plc's registered address is 1 Grand Canal Square, Grand Canal Harbour, Dublin 2, Ireland.
Duration; Dissolution; Rights upon Liquidation
Accenture plc's duration is unlimited. Accenture plc may be dissolved at any time by way of either a voluntary winding up or a creditors' voluntary winding up. In the case of a voluntary winding up, the approval is required by (i) the Board of Directors by a resolution passed with the approval of a majority of those directors then in office and eligible to vote on that resolution and (ii) a special resolution of shareholders. Accenture plc may also be dissolved by way of court order on the application of a creditor, or by the Companies Registration Office as an enforcement measure where Accenture plc has failed to file certain returns.
The rights of the shareholders to a return of Accenture plc's assets on dissolution or winding up, following the settlement of all claims of creditors, may be prescribed in Accenture plc's articles of association or the terms of any preferred shares issued by the directors of Accenture plc from time to time. The holders of preferred shares in particular may have the right to priority in a dissolution or winding up of Accenture plc. If the articles of association contain no specific provisions in
respect of a dissolution or winding up then, subject to the priorities of any creditors, the assets will be distributed to shareholders in proportion to the paid-up nominal value of the shares held. Accenture plc's articles provide that the Class A ordinary shareholders of Accenture plc are entitled to participate in a winding up, but their right to do so may be subject to the rights of any preferred shareholders to participate under the terms of any series or class of preferred shares. Class X ordinary shareholders of Accenture plc are not entitled to participate in a winding up.
pro rata
Uncertificated Shares
Holders of Accenture plc ordinary shares will not have the right to require Accenture plc to issue certificates for their shares. Accenture plc currently intends to issue only uncertificated ordinary shares unless certificated shares are required by any stock exchange, a recognized depository, any operator of any clearance, settlement system or law.
Stock Exchange Listing
The Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares are listed on the NYSE under the symbol "ACN." We do not intend to list the Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares on the Irish Stock Exchange or any other stock exchange. We do not intend to list the Accenture plc Class X ordinary shares on any stock exchange.
No Sinking Fund
The ordinary shares have no sinking fund provisions.
No Liability for Further Calls or Assessments
All issued and outstanding ordinary shares are duly and validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
Transfer and Registration of Shares
Accenture plc's share register are maintained by its transfer agent. Registration in this share register will be determinative of membership in Accenture plc. A shareholder of Accenture plc who holds shares beneficially will not be the holder of record of such shares. Instead, the depository (for example, Cede & Co., as nominee for DTC) or other nominee will be the holder of record of such shares. Accordingly, a transfer of shares from a person who holds such shares beneficially to a person who also holds such shares beneficially through a depository or other nominee will not be registered in Accenture plc's official share register, as the depository or other nominee will remain the record holder of such shares.
A written instrument of transfer is required under Irish law in order to register on Accenture plc's official share register any transfer of shares (i) from a person who holds such shares directly to any other person, (ii) from a person who holds such shares beneficially to a person who holds such shares directly, or (iii) from a person who holds such shares beneficially to another person who holds such shares beneficially where the transfer involves a change in the depository or other nominee that is the record owner of the transferred shares. An instrument of transfer also is required for a shareholder who directly holds shares to transfer those shares into his or her own broker account (or vice versa). Such instruments of transfer may give rise to Irish stamp duty, which must be paid prior to registration of the transfer on Accenture plc's official Irish share register.
Accenture plc does not intend to pay any stamp duty. However, Accenture plc's articles of association allow Accenture plc, in its absolute discretion, to pay any stamp duty payable by a buyer. In the event of any such payment, Accenture plc may (i) seek reimbursement from the transferor or transferee (at our discretion), (ii) set-off the amount of the stamp duty against future dividends payable to the transferor or transferee (at our discretion), and (iii) impose a lien against the Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares on which we have paid stamp duty. Any transfer of Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares that is subject to Irish stamp duty will not be registered in the name of the buyer unless an instrument of transfer is executed by or on behalf of the seller, is duly stamped and is provided to our transfer agent.
Class X ordinary shares are not transferable by their holders, unless the Class X ordinary shareholder has received the prior written consent of Accenture plc to the proposed transfer to the proposed transferee.
The directors of Accenture plc have general discretion to decline to register an instrument of transfer unless the transfer is in respect of one class of share only or, as in the case of Class X ordinary shares, such transfer would violate the terms of an agreement to which Accenture plc or any of its subsidiaries and the transferor are subject.
Enforcement of Civil Liabilities Against Foreign Persons
Accenture plc has been advised by its Irish counsel that a judgment for the payment of money rendered by a court in the United States based on civil liability would not be automatically enforceable in Ireland. There is no treaty between Ireland and the United States providing for the reciprocal enforcement of foreign judgments. The following requirements must be met before the foreign judgment will be deemed to be enforceable in Ireland:
 
 
 
An Irish court will also exercise its right to refuse judgment if the foreign judgment was obtained by fraud, if the judgment violated Irish public policy, if the judgment is in breach of natural justice or if it is irreconcilable with an earlier foreign judgment.
Transfer Agent and Registrar
National City Bank serves as transfer agent and branch registrar for the Class A ordinary shares in the United States. Arthur Cox serves as transfer agent and principal registrar for the Class A ordinary shares in Ireland.
RISK FACTORS
As a result of the Transaction, we have updated our risk factors to include the following additional risk factors listed below. Any references in the "Risk Factors" in our predecessor's Annual Report on Form 10-K, for the year ended August 31, 2008, our predecessor's Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q filed for the most recent fiscal year and the additional risk factors listed below to the terms "Accenture," "we," "our Company," "our" and "us" refer to Accenture plc and its subsidiaries.
Legislative or regulatory action could materially and adversely affect us.
Our tax position could be adversely impacted by changes in tax laws, tax treaties or tax regulations or the interpretation or enforcement thereof by any tax authority. For example, legislative proposals have been introduced in the U.S. Congress which, if enacted, could override tax treaties upon which we expect to rely, or could change the circumstances under which we would be treated as a U.S. person for U.S. federal income tax purposes, each of which could materially and adversely affect our effective tax rate and require us to take further action, at potentially significant expense, to seek to preserve our effective tax rate. We cannot predict the outcome of any specific legislative proposals. However, if proposals were enacted limiting our ability as an Irish company to take advantage of the tax treaties between Ireland and the United States, we could be subjected to increased taxation and/or potentially significant expense. In addition, any future amendments to the current income tax treaties between Ireland and other jurisdictions (including the United States) could subject us to increased taxation and/or potentially significant expense. Also, various U.S. federal and state legislative proposals have been introduced and/or enacted in recent years that deny government contracts to certain U.S. companies that reincorporate or have reincorporated outside the United States. While Accenture was not a U.S. company that reincorporated outside the United States, our reincorporation from Bermuda to Ireland may not eliminate the risk that these contract bans and other legislative proposals could be enacted in a way to affect Accenture.
As an Irish company we are required to comply with numerous Irish and EU legal requirements. Compliance with EU and Irish laws and regulations may have a material and adverse effect on Accenture's financial condition and results of operations.
We may be subject to criticism and negative publicity related to the Transaction.
There continues to be negative publicity regarding, and criticism of, companies that conduct business in the United States but are domiciled in countries like Bermuda. While we were never a U.S. company, some former U.S. companies that have undertaken expatriation transactions to offshore jurisdictions, such as Bermuda, have been criticized as improperly avoiding U.S. taxes or creating an unfair competitive advantage over U.S. companies. We could become subject to criticism in connection with the Transaction.
Our effective tax rate may increase.
While the Transaction is not anticipated to have any material impact on our effective tax rate, there is uncertainty regarding the tax policies of the jurisdictions where we operate (which include the potential legislative actions described above), and our effective tax rate may increase and any such increase may be material. Additionally, the tax laws of Ireland and other jurisdictions could change in the future, and such changes could cause a material change in our effective tax rate.
A future transfer of your Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares may be subject to Irish stamp duty.
Transfers by shareholders who hold their Accenture plc shares beneficially through banks, brokers, trustees, custodians or other nominees, which in turn hold those shares through DTC, will not be subject to Irish stamp duty where such transfers are to holders who also hold through DTC. If you hold your Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares directly rather than beneficially, any purchase of your shares will be subject to Irish stamp duty. Irish stamp duty is currently at the rate of 1% of the price paid or the market value of the Class A ordinary shares acquired, if higher. Any transfer of Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares which is subject to Irish stamp duty will not be registered in the name of the buyer unless an instrument of transfer is executed by or on behalf of the seller, is duly stamped and is provided to our transfer agent. The potential for stamp duty could adversely affect the price of Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares.
Dividends you receive may be subject to Irish dividend withholding tax.
In certain circumstances, as an Irish tax resident company, we may be required to deduct Irish dividend withholding tax (currently at the rate of 20%) from dividends paid to our shareholders. Shareholders resident in "relevant territories" (including countries that are European Union member states (other than Ireland), the United States and other countries with which Ireland has a tax treaty) will generally not be subject to Irish withholding tax provided that, in each case, they complete certain tax forms. However, shareholders residing in other countries will generally be subject to withholding tax.
 
(d)  Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
Date: September 1, 2009


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ACN/ACN-8K-20090925085337.txt.gz
TIME:20090925085337
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On September 24, 2009, the Irish High Court approved the reduction of share premium (similar to additional paid-in capital) to establish distributable reserves on the unconsolidated balance sheet of Accenture plc. The establishment of distributable reserves was required to enable Accenture plc to pay dividends and buy back shares in the future.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ACN/ACN-8K-20091001160552.txt.gz
TIME:20091001160552
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition
On October 1, 2009, Accenture issued a press release announcing financial results for its fourth quarter and full fiscal year ended August 31, 2009.
A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1. All information in the press release is furnished but not filed.
Non-GAAP Financial Information
In the attached press release Accenture discloses the following non-GAAP financial measures:
 
 
 
Reconciliations of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable financial measures calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP are included in the press release. While Accenture's management believes that this non-GAAP financial information is useful in evaluating Accenture's operations, this information should be considered as supplemental in nature and not as a substitute for the related financial information prepared in accordance with GAAP.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) Exhibits
99.1   Press Release of Accenture, dated October 1, 2009
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
NEW YORK; Oct. 1, 2009  Accenture (NYSE: ACN) reported financial results for the fourth quarter and full 2009 fiscal year, ended Aug. 31, including fourth-quarter net revenues in line with the company's previously guided range. As previously announced on Aug. 20, the company recorded a restructuring charge in the fourth quarter, of $253 million, which reduced earnings per share, operating income and operating margin for both the quarter and full year. The restructuring charge was related to the realignment of the company's workforce, primarily at the senior-executive level, and to global real-estate consolidation.
For the fourth quarter, revenues before reimbursements ("net revenues") were $5.15 billion, a decrease of 14 percent in U.S. dollars and 7 percent in local currency. Diluted earnings per share for the quarter were $0.39, compared with $0.67 in the same period last year, and reflect a negative $0.24 impact from the restructuring charge. New bookings for the quarter were $5.54 billion. Operating income for the quarter was $420 million, and operating margin was 8.2 percent. Absent the restructuring charge, operating income for the quarter was $672 million and operating margin was 13.1 percent.
For the full fiscal year, net revenues were $21.58 billion, a decrease of 8 percent in U.S. dollars and flat in local currency, in line with the company's previously guided range. Diluted earnings per share for the full year were $2.44, compared with $2.65 in fiscal 2008, and reflect a negative $0.24 impact from the restructuring charge. New bookings for the full year were $23.90 billion. Operating income for the full year was $2.64 billion, and operating margin was 12.3 percent. Absent the restructuring charge, annual operating income was $2.90 billion and annual operating margin was 13.4 percent.
Accenture also announced several actions as part of its long-term commitment to return cash to shareholders. Its Board of Directors has declared an annual cash dividend of $0.75 per share, an increase of $0.25 per share, or 50 percent, over its previous annual dividend, and has approved moving from an annual to a semi-annual schedule for the payment of dividends starting in the third quarter of fiscal 2010. The Board has also approved $4.0 billion in additional share repurchase authority.
William D. Green, Accenture's chairman & CEO, said, "Our fourth-quarter and full-year results clearly show that we continued managing our business well in challenging economic conditions. We delivered on revenue, we generated exceptional cash flow, we are pleased with our operating-margin expansion for the year, and our balance sheet remains rock-solid. We continue to return cash to shareholders through a 50 percent increase in our annual cash dividend, declared today, and through the repurchase of $1.9 billion of our shares during the year.
"We remain focused on operational discipline and superior execution to ensure that we continue to deliver value to our clients and shareholders. Importantly, this has allowed us to take proactive steps  including refreshing our core business and investing in new high-growth areas  that have positioned us very well for the upturn."
Financial Review  Fourth Quarter Fiscal 2009
Net revenues for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2009 were $5.15 billion, compared with $6.00 billion for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2008, a decrease of 14 percent in U.S. dollars and 7 percent in local currency. Net revenues for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2009 reflect a foreign-exchange impact of negative 7 percent compared with the fourth quarter of fiscal 2008.
 
 
Diluted EPS for the fourth quarter were $0.39, compared with $0.67 in the fourth quarter of fiscal 2008, a decrease of $0.28. The restructuring charge had a negative $0.24 impact on EPS for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2009. Absent the restructuring charge, EPS for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2009 were $0.63, a decrease of $0.04 from the fourth quarter of fiscal 2008, broken down as:
 
offset by:
 
Operating income for the fourth quarter was $420 million, or 8.2 percent of net revenues, compared with $785 million, or 13.1 percent of net revenues, for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2008. Excluding the restructuring charge, operating income for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2009 was $672 million, or 13.1 percent of net revenues.
Gross margin (gross profit as a percentage of net revenues) was 32.3 percent, compared with 31.7 percent for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2008, an expansion of 60 basis points. The increase was driven primarily by improved outsourcing contract margins.
Selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses for the fourth quarter were $985 million, or 19.1 percent of net revenues, compared with $1.12 billion, or 18.6 percent of net revenues, for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2008. The increase in SG&A as a percentage of net revenues was primarily due to higher selling costs as a percentage of net revenues.
The company's effective tax rate for the fourth quarter was 27.6 percent, compared with 31.8 percent for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2008. The lower rate compared with the fourth quarter of fiscal 2008 was primarily a result of final determinations of prior-year tax liabilities recorded in the fourth quarter of fiscal 2009.
Income before minority interest for the fourth quarter was $306 million, compared with $550 million for the same period of fiscal 2008, and reflects the $253 million impact of the restructuring charge.
 
Operating cash flow for the fourth quarter was $1.05 billion, and property and equipment additions were $75 million. Free cash flow, defined as operating cash flow net of property and equipment additions, was $971 million, an increase of $27 million over the fourth quarter of fiscal 2008. For the same period of fiscal 2008, operating cash flow was $1.03 billion, property and equipment additions were $87 million, and free cash flow was $944 million.
Days services outstanding, or DSOs, were 28 at Aug. 31, 2009, compared with 37 at Aug. 31, 2008.
Accenture's total cash balance at Aug. 31, 2009 was $4.54 billion, compared with $3.60 billion at Aug. 31, 2008 and $4.00 billion at May 31, 2009.
Utilization for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2009 was 86 percent, compared with 84 percent in the fourth quarter the prior year. Attrition was 10 percent, compared with 15 percent in the same period of fiscal 2008.
New Bookings
New bookings for the fourth quarter were $5.54 billion. This reflects a negative 6 percent foreign-currency impact compared with the fourth quarter of fiscal 2008.
 
 
Net Revenues by Operating Group
Accenture's business continues to be affected by global economic conditions. All of the company's operating groups with the exception of Public Service experienced a decline in consulting revenues in local currency compared with the fourth quarter last year. The company's Products, Public Service and Resources operating groups grew outsourcing revenues in local currency compared with the fourth quarter last year.
Net revenues by operating group for the fourth quarter were as follows:
 
 
 
 
 
Net Revenues by Geographic Region
Net revenues by geographic region in the fourth quarter of fiscal 2009 were as follows:
 
 
 
Financial Review  Full Year Fiscal 2009
Net revenues for fiscal 2009 were $21.58 billion, compared with $23.39 billion for fiscal 2008, a decrease of 8 percent in U.S. dollars and flat in local currency. Net revenues for fiscal 2009 reflect a foreign-exchange impact of negative 8 percent compared with fiscal 2008.
 
 
Diluted EPS for the full fiscal year were $2.44, compared with $2.65 for fiscal 2008, a decrease of $0.21. The restructuring charge in the fourth quarter had a negative $0.24 impact on EPS for fiscal 2009. Absent the restructuring charge, EPS for fiscal 2009 were $2.68, an increase of $0.03 over fiscal 2008, broken down as:
 
offset by:
 
 
Operating income for the full fiscal year was $2.64 billion, or 12.3 percent of net revenues, compared with $3.01 billion, or 12.9 percent of net revenues, for fiscal 2008. Excluding the restructuring charge, operating income for fiscal 2009 was $2.90 billion, or 13.4 percent of net revenues, representing operating-margin expansion of 50 basis points over fiscal 2008.
Gross margin (gross profit as a percentage of net revenues) for the full fiscal year was 31.7 percent, compared with 30.7 percent for fiscal 2008, an expansion of 100 basis points, due primarily to improved outsourcing contract margins.
Selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses for the full fiscal year were $3.95 billion, or 18.3 percent of net revenues, compared with $4.15 billion, or 17.7 percent of net revenues, for fiscal 2008. The increase in SG&A as a percentage of net revenues was due to the provision for bad debt in the first quarter of fiscal 2009 as a reserve for collection risks and to higher selling costs as a percentage of net revenues.
Accenture's annual effective tax rate for the full fiscal year was 27.6 percent, compared with 29.3 percent for fiscal 2008, and in line with the company's previously guided range of 27 percent to 29 percent.
Income before minority interest for the full fiscal year was $1.94 billion, compared with $2.20billion for fiscal 2008, and reflects the $253 million impact of the restructuring charge.
 
For the year ended Aug. 31, 2009, operating cash flow was $3.16 billion and property and equipment additions were $243million. Free cash flow, defined as operating cash flow net of property and equipment additions, was $2.92 billion, exceeding the company's previously guided range of $2.4 billion to $2.6 billion. For the prior fiscal year, ended Aug. 31, 2008, operating cash flow was $2.80 billion, property and equipment additions were $320 million, and free cash flow was $2.48 billion.
 
Utilization for the full fiscal year 2009 was 84 percent, consistent with fiscal 2008. Attrition for the full year was 10 percent, compared with 16 percent for fiscal 2008.
New Bookings
New bookings for the full fiscal year were $23.90 billion, a decrease of 11 percent in U.S. dollars and 3 percent in local currency from fiscal 2008. New bookings for fiscal 2009 reflect a negative 8 percent foreign-currency impact compared with fiscal 2008.
 
 
 
Net Revenues by Operating Group
Accenture's business continues to be affected by global economic conditions. The company's Public Service and Resources operating groups grew consulting revenues in local currency in fiscal 2009 compared with fiscal 2008, while the other three operating groups experienced a decline in consulting revenues. All of the company's operating groups grew outsourcing revenues in local currency in fiscal 2009 compared with fiscal 2008.
Net revenues by operating group for the full fiscal year were as follows:
 
 
 
 
 
Net Revenues by Geographic Region
Net revenues by geographic region for the full fiscal year were as follows:
 
 
 
 
Dividend
Accenture plc* has declared a cash dividend of $0.75 per share on Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares for shareholders of record at the close of business on Oct. 16, 2009, and Accenture SCA will declare a cash dividend of $0.75 per share on Accenture SCA Class I common shares for shareholders of record at the close of business on Oct. 13, 2009. These dividends, both payable on Nov. 16, 2009, represent an increase of $0.25, or 50 percent, over the $0.50 per share dividend the company paid on both classes of shares last year.
Additionally, while the company has historically declared and paid dividends on an annual basis, the Board of Directors has approved a move to declare and pay cash dividends on a semi-annual basis beginning in the third quarter of fiscal 2010.
* On Sept. 1, 2009, Accenture plc replaced Accenture Ltd as Accenture's parent company.
Share Repurchase Activity
During the fourth quarter of fiscal 2009, Accenture repurchased or redeemed 15.3 million shares for a total of $525 million, including $27 million for 0.8 million shares repurchased on the open market. During the full fiscal year 2009, Accenture repurchased or redeemed 58.0 million shares for a total of $1.9 billion, including $571 million for 18.9 million shares repurchased in the open market.
The company's Board of Directors has approved $4.0 billion in additional share repurchase authority, bringing Accenture's total outstanding authority to approximately $4.9 billion.
At Aug. 31, 2009, Accenture had approximately 731 million total shares outstanding, including 623 million Accenture Ltd Class A common shares and minority holdings of 108 million shares (Accenture SCA Class I common shares and Accenture Canada Holding, Inc. exchangeable shares).
Business Outlook
First Quarter Fiscal 2010
Accenture expects net revenues for the first quarter of fiscal 2010 to be in the range of $5.3 billion to $5.5 billion, which assumes a foreign-exchange impact of 0 percent compared with the first quarter of fiscal 2009.
Fiscal Year 2010
For the full fiscal year 2010, Accenture expects net revenue growth to be in the range of negative 3 percent to positive 1 percent in local currency. The company expects diluted EPS for the full fiscal year to be in the range of $2.64 to $2.72. Accenture expects operating margin for the full fiscal year to be 13.4 percent.
The company expects operating cash flow to be $2.39 billion to $2.59 billion; property and equipment additions to be $290 million; and free cash flow to be in the range of $2.1 billion to $2.3 billion. The annual effective tax rate is expected to be in the range of 30 percent to 32 percent.
Accenture is targeting new bookings for fiscal 2010 in the range of $23 billion to $26 billion.
 
Conference Call and Webcast Details
Accenture will host a conference call at 4:30 p.m. EDT today to discuss its fourth-quarter and full-year 2009 financial results. To participate, please dial +1 (800) 230-1092 [+1 (612) 234-9959 outside the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada] approximately 15 minutes before the scheduled start of the call. The conference call will also be accessible live on the Investor Relations section of the Accenture Web site at www.accenture.com.
A replay of the conference call will be available online at www.accenture.com beginning at 7:00 p.m. EDT today, Thursday, Oct. 1, and continuing until Thursday, Dec. 17. A podcast of the conference call will be available online at www.accenture.com beginning approximately 24 hours after the call. The replay will also be available via telephone by dialing +1 (800) 475-6701 [+1 (320) 365-3844 outside the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada] and entering access code 115041 from 7:00 p.m. EDT Thursday, Oct. 1 through 11:59 p.m. EDT Thursday, Dec. 17.
About Accenture
Accenture is a global management consulting, technology services and outsourcing company. Combining unparalleled experience, comprehensive capabilities across all industries and business functions, and extensive research on the world's most successful companies, Accenture collaborates with clients to help them become high-performance businesses and governments. With approximately 177,000 people serving clients in more than 120 countries, the company generated net revenues of US$21.58 billion for the fiscal year ended Aug. 31, 2009. Its home page is www.accenture.com.
Non-GAAP Financial Information
This press release includes certain non-GAAP financial information as defined by Securities and Exchange Commission Regulation G. Pursuant to the requirements of this regulation, reconciliations of this non-GAAP financial information to Accenture's financial statements as prepared under generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) are included in this press release. Accenture's management believes providing investors with this information gives additional insights into Accenture's results of operations. While Accenture's management believes that these non-GAAP financial measures are useful in evaluating Accenture's operations, this information should be considered as supplemental in nature and not as a substitute for the related financial information prepared in accordance with GAAP.
Forward-Looking Statements
Except for the historical information and discussions contained herein, statements in this news release may constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve a number of risks, uncertainties and other factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed or implied. These include, without limitation, risks that: our results of operations could be adversely affected by economic and political conditions and the effects of these conditions on our clients' businesses and levels of business activity; our results of operations could be negatively affected if we cannot expand and develop our services and solutions in response to changes in technology and client demand; the consulting, systems integration and technology and outsourcing markets are highly competitive and we might not be able to compete effectively; our work with government clients exposes us to additional risks in the government contracting environment; clients may not be satisfied with our services; liabilities could arise if our subcontractors or other third parties cannot deliver their project contributions on time or at all; our results of operations could be adversely affected if our clients terminate their contracts with us on short notice; our outsourcing services subject us to operational and financial risk; our results of operations may be adversely affected by the type and level of technology spending by our clients; our profitability may suffer if we are not able to maintain favorable pricing rates and utilization rates, if we cannot control our costs, or if we cannot anticipate the cost and complexity of performing
 
our work; our business could be negatively affected by legal liability that results from our providing solutions or services; our global operations are subject to complex risks, some of which might be beyond our control; our growth and our ability to compete may be adversely affected if we cannot attract, retain and motivate our employees or efficiently utilize their skills; our business may be adversely affected if we cannot manage the organizational challenges associated with the size of our company; legislative or regulatory action could materially and adversely affect us; we may be subject to criticism and negative publicity related to our change in place of incorporation; consolidation in the industries that we serve could adversely affect our business; our ability to attract and retain business may depend on our reputation in the marketplace; our share price could fluctuate due to numerous factors, including variability in revenues, operating results and profitability; as well as the risks, uncertainties and other factors discussed under the "Risk Factors" heading in our most recent annual report on Form 10-K, our quarterly report on Form 10-Q for the period ended May 31, 2009, and other documents filed with or furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission. Statements in this news release speak only as of the date they were made, and Accenture undertakes no duty to update any forward-looking statements made in this news release or to conform such statements to actual results or changes in Accenture's expectations.
Contact:
Roxanne Taylor
Accenture
+1 (917) 452-5106
roxanne.taylor@accenture.com
 
 
 
 
 
n/m = not meaningful
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ACN/ACN-8K-20091217161634.txt.gz
TIME:20091217161634
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition
On December 17, 2009, Accenture issued a press release announcing financial results for its first quarter of fiscal year 2010, which fiscal quarter ended on November 30, 2009.
A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1. All information in the press release is furnished but not filed.
Non-GAAP Financial Information
In the attached press release Accenture discloses the following non-GAAP financial measures:
 
 
Reconciliations of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable financial measures calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP are included in the press release. While Accenture's management believes that this non-GAAP financial information is useful in evaluating Accenture's operations, this information should be considered as supplemental in nature and not as a substitute for the related financial information prepared in accordance with GAAP.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) Exhibits
99.1   Press Release of Accenture, dated December 17, 2009
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
NEW YORK; Dec. 17, 2009  Accenture (NYSE: ACN) reported financial results for the first quarter of fiscal 2010, ended Nov. 30, 2009, with net revenues of $5.38 billion, a decrease of 11 percent in U.S. dollars and 12 percent in local currency from the same period last year and within the company's guided range. Diluted earnings per share were $0.67.
Operating income was $746 million, and operating margin was 13.9 percent.
New bookings for the quarter were $5.53 billion, with consulting bookings of $3.51 billion and outsourcing bookings of $2.02 billion.
William D. Green, Accenture's chairman & CEO, said, "We continued to drive our business with discipline and a focus on execution, as well as with an eye to the future. We generated revenue within our expected range, delivered strong operating margin, ended the quarter with a cash balance of $4 billion after paying our annual dividend, and maintained our solid balance sheet.
"We are seeing building momentum in key areas of our business. Consulting bookings of $3.5 billion, growing pipelines and broadly heightened levels of activity are encouraging signs. We have mobilized to capture this opportunity. The demand for high performance from our clients is accelerating."
Financial Review
Revenues before reimbursements ("net revenues") for the first quarter of fiscal 2010 were $5.38 billion, compared with $6.02 billion in the first quarter of fiscal 2009, a decrease of 11 percent in U.S. dollars and 12 percent in local currency. Net revenues for the first quarter of fiscal 2010 reflect a foreign-exchange impact of positive 1 percent.
 
 
Diluted EPS for the first quarter of fiscal 2010 were $0.67, a decrease of $0.07 from the first quarter of fiscal 2009, broken down as:
 
    offset by:
 
Operating income for the first quarter was $746 million, or 13.9 percent of net revenues, compared with $815 million, or 13.5 percent of net revenues, for the first quarter of fiscal 2009. Gross margin (gross profit as a percentage of net revenues) for the first quarter was 33.1 percent, compared with 31.4 percent for the first quarter last year. Selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses for the first quarter were $1.03 billion, or 19.2 percent of net revenues, compared with $1.07 billion, or 17.8 percent of net revenues, for the first quarter last year. SG&A expenses in the first quarter last year included a $72 million provision for bad debt. The change in gross margin and in SG&A as a percentage of net revenues compared with the first quarter last year was primarily due to a change related to the recent implementation of the company's sales-effectiveness model. This reclassification had no overall impact on operating expense or operating margin.
The company's effective tax rate for the first quarter was 30.5 percent, compared with 26.6 percent for the first quarter last year, which was lower primarily as a result of final determinations of prior-year tax liabilities recorded in that quarter.
Net income before noncontrolling interests (previously "Income before minority interest") for the first quarter was $525 million, compared with $593 million for the same period of fiscal 2009, a decrease of 12 percent.
Operating cash flow for the first quarter was $219 million, and property and equipment additions were $35 million. Free cash flow, defined as operating cash flow net of property and equipment additions, was $184 million. For the same period last year, operating cash flow was $468 million; property and equipment additions were $72 million; and free cash flow was $396 million. The reduction in free cash flow compared with the first quarter last year was driven primarily by an increase in days services outstanding from Aug. 31, 2009.
Days services outstanding, or DSOs, were 32 at Nov. 30, 2009, compared with 28 at Aug. 31, 2009, and 36 at Nov. 30, 2008.
Accenture's total cash balance at Nov. 30, 2009 was $4.00 billion, compared with $4.54 billion at Aug. 31, 2009. The company paid a cash dividend to shareholders in November totaling more than $550 million.
Utilization for the first quarter of fiscal 2010 was 88 percent, compared with 83 percent for the first quarter last year. Attrition for the quarter was 12 percent, compared with 13 percent for the same period last year.
 
New Bookings
New bookings for the first quarter were $5.53 billion. This reflects a positive 3 percent foreign-currency impact when compared to new bookings in the first quarter last year.
 
 
Net Revenues by Operating Group
Accenture's business continues to be affected by global economic conditions, with all operating groups except Health & Public Service experiencing local-currency revenue declines during the first quarter. Accenture's strong results in the first quarter last fiscal year  which included local-currency revenue growth of 9 percent  were achieved prior to the company feeling the effects, beginning in January, of the global economic downturn.
Net revenues by operating group for the first quarter were as follows:
 
 
 
 
 
*On Sept. 1, 2009, the Company formed the Health & Public Service operating group by combining various healthcare-related components of its Products operating group with its Public Service operating group. Prior-period amounts have been reclassified to conform to the current-period presentation.
Net Revenues by Geographic Region
Net revenues by geographic region for the first quarter were as follows:
 
 
 
 
Share Repurchase Activity
During the first quarter of fiscal 2010, Accenture repurchased or redeemed 11.8 million shares for a total of $451 million, including 250,000 shares repurchased in the open market. Accenture's total remaining share repurchase authority at Nov. 30, 2009, was approximately $4.5 billion.
At Nov. 30, 2009, Accenture had approximately 730 million total shares outstanding, including 632 million Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares and 98 million Accenture SCA Class I common shares and Accenture Canada Holding, Inc. exchangeable shares.
Dividend
On Nov. 16, 2009, a cash dividend of $0.75 per share was paid on Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares to shareholders of record at the close of business on Oct. 16, 2009. On Nov. 16, 2009, a cash dividend of $0.75 per share was also paid on Accenture SCA Class I common shares to shareholders of record at the close of business on Oct. 13, 2009.
As previously announced, the company plans to declare and pay cash dividends on a semi-annual basis beginning in the third quarter of fiscal 2010.
Business Outlook
Second Quarter Fiscal 2010
Accenture expects net revenues for the second quarter of fiscal 2010 to be in the range of $5.1 billion to $5.3 billion. This range assumes a foreign-exchange impact of positive 7 percent compared with the second quarter of fiscal 2009.
Full Fiscal Year 2010
The company's revised business outlook for the full fiscal year assumes a foreign-exchange impact of positive 5 percent compared with fiscal 2009. The company's previous business outlook for the year assumed a foreign-exchange impact of positive 4 percent.
Accenture continues to target new bookings for fiscal 2010 in the range of $23 billion to $26 billion.
For the full fiscal year 2010, Accenture continues to expect net revenue growth to be in the range of negative 3 percent to positive 1 percent in local currency. The company has increased its outlook for diluted EPS for the full fiscal year by $0.03, reflecting the updated foreign-currency assumption, and now expects diluted EPS to be in the range of $2.67 to $2.75. Accenture continues to expect operating margin for the full fiscal year to be 13.4 percent.
The company continues to expect operating cash flow to be $2.39 billion to $2.59 billion; property and equipment additions to be $290 million; and free cash flow to be in the range of $2.1 billion to $2.3 billion. The company also continues to expect the annual effective tax rate to be in the range of 30 percent to 32 percent.
 
Conference Call and Webcast Details
Accenture will host a conference call at 4:30 p.m. EST today to discuss its first-quarter fiscal 2010 financial results. To participate, please dial +1 (800) 288-8960 [+1 (612) 332-0530 outside the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada] approximately 15 minutes before the scheduled start of the call. The conference call will also be accessible live on the Investor Relations section of the Accenture Web site at www.accenture.com.
A replay of the conference call will be available online at www.accenture.com beginning at 7:00 p.m. EST on Thursday, Dec. 17, and continuing until Wednesday, March 24, 2010. A podcast of the conference call will be available online at www.accenture.com beginning approximately 24 hours after the call and continuing until Wednesday, March 24, 2010. The replay will also be available via telephone by dialing +1 (800) 475-6701 [+1 (320) 365-3844 outside the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada] and entering access code 120395 from 7:00 p.m. EST Thursday, Dec. 17 through Wednesday, March 24, 2010.
About Accenture
Accenture is a global management consulting, technology services and outsourcing company, with more than 176,000 people serving clients in more than 120 countries. Combining unparalleled experience, comprehensive capabilities across all industries and business functions, and extensive research on the world's most successful companies, Accenture collaborates with clients to help them become high-performance businesses and governments. The company generated net revenues of US$21.58 billion for the fiscal year ended Aug. 31, 2009. Its home page is www.accenture.com.
Non-GAAP Financial Information
This press release includes certain non-GAAP financial information as defined by Securities and Exchange Commission Regulation G. Pursuant to the requirements of this regulation, reconciliations of this non-GAAP financial information to Accenture's financial statements as prepared under generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) are included in this press release. Accenture's management believes providing investors with this information gives additional insights into Accenture's results of operations. While Accenture's management believes that these non-GAAP financial measures are useful in evaluating Accenture's operations, this information should be considered as supplemental in nature and not as a substitute for the related financial information prepared in accordance with GAAP.
Forward-Looking Statements
Except for the historical information and discussions contained herein, statements in this news release may constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve a number of risks, uncertainties and other factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed or implied. These include, without limitation, risks that: our results of operations could be adversely affected by economic and political conditions and the effects of these conditions on our clients' businesses and levels of business activity; our results of operations could be negatively affected if we cannot expand and develop our services and solutions in response to changes in technology and client demand; the consulting, systems integration and technology and outsourcing markets are highly competitive and we might not be able to compete effectively; our work with government clients exposes us to additional risks in the government contracting environment; clients may not be satisfied with our services; our results of operations could be adversely affected if our clients terminate their contracts with us; our outsourcing services subject us to operational and financial risk; our results of operations may be adversely affected by the type and level of technology spending by our clients; our profitability may suffer if we are not able to maintain favorable pricing rates and utilization rates; our business could be negatively affected by legal liability that results from our providing solutions or services; our profitability may suffer if we cannot anticipate the cost and complexity of performing our work or if we are not able to control our costs; our global operations are subject to complex risks, some of which might be beyond our control;
 
our business and financial results may be adversely affected if we are unable to keep our supply of skills and resources in balance with client demand; liabilities could arise if our subcontractors or other third parties cannot deliver their project contributions on time or at all; legislative or regulatory action could materially and adversely affect us; we may be subject to criticism and negative publicity related to our incorporation in Ireland; we might be unable to achieve our business objectives if we are unable to manage the organizational challenges associated with our size; consolidation in the industries that we serve could adversely affect our business; our ability to attract and retain business may depend on our reputation in the marketplace; our share price could fluctuate due to numerous factors, including variability in revenues, operating results and profitability; as well as the risks, uncertainties and other factors discussed under the "Risk Factors" heading in our most recent annual report on Form 10-K and other documents filed with or furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission. Statements in this news release speak only as of the date they were made, and Accenture undertakes no duty to update any forward-looking statements made in this news release or to conform such statements to actual results or changes in Accenture's expectations.
Contact:
Roxanne Taylor
Accenture
+1 (917) 452 5106
roxanne.taylor@accenture.com
 
 
 
 
 
n/m = not meaningful
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ACN/ACN-8K-20100204170207.txt.gz
TIME:20100204170207
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
(e)           On February 4, 2010, Accenture plc ("Accenture") held its 2010 annual general meeting of shareholders (the "Annual Meeting"). At the Annual Meeting, Accenture's shareholders approved the Accenture plc 2010 Share Incentive Plan (the "2010 SIP") and the Accenture plc 2010 Employee Share Purchase Plan (the "2010 ESPP"), both of which the Board of Directors of Accenture approved on December 10, 2009, subject to the approval of Accenture's shareholders.
The 2010 SIP is similar to the current Accenture 2001 Share Incentive Plan (the "2001 SIP"), but with updates to plan provisions generally intended to reflect changes in tax and accounting rules. No new grants will be made under the 2001 SIP.
The 2010 ESPP is similar to the current Accenture 2001 Employee Share Purchase Plan (the "2001 ESPP"), but with updates to plan provisions generally intended to reflect changes in tax and accounting rules and to update the terms under which shares may be offered for purchase under the plan. The share issuance in May 2010 for the current offering period will be satisfied under the 2001 ESPP. No new purchase offers will be made under the 2001 ESPP and no new shares will be issued under the 2001 ESPP following the May 2010 issuance
.
The material features of each of the plans are described in Accenture's definitive Proxy Statement for the Annual Meeting filed on December 21, 2009 (the "Proxy Statement"), and the descriptions of each of the plans are incorporated herein by reference. The above descriptions of the 2010 SIP and the 2010 ESPP are qualified in their entirety by reference to the copies of such documents found as annexes to the Proxy Statement.
Item 8.01 Other Events.
As indicated above, on February 4, 2010, Accenture held its Annual Meeting described in the Proxy Statement. A quorum was present at the meeting as required by Accenture's Articles of Association. Set forth below is the number of votes cast for and against/withheld, and the number of abstention votes and broker non-votes, with respect to each matter voted upon by the shareholders:
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ACN/ACN-8K-20100325160752.txt.gz
TIME:20100325160752
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition
On March 25, 2010, Accenture issued a press release announcing financial results for its second quarter of fiscal year 2010, which fiscal quarter ended on February 28, 2010.
A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1. All information in the press release is furnished but not filed.
Non-GAAP Financial Information
In the attached press release Accenture discloses the following non-GAAP financial measures:
 
 
 
Reconciliations of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable financial measures calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP are included in the press release. While Accenture's management believes that this non-GAAP financial information is useful in evaluating Accenture's operations, this information should be considered as supplemental in nature and not as a substitute for the related financial information prepared in accordance with GAAP.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) Exhibits
99.1   Press Release of Accenture, dated March 25, 2010
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
NEW YORK; March 25, 2010  Accenture (NYSE: ACN) reported financial results for the second quarter of fiscal 2010, ended Feb. 28, 2010, with net revenues of $5.18 billion, a decrease of 2 percent in U.S. dollars and 8 percent in local currency from the same period last year and within the company's guided range. Diluted earnings per share were $0.60.
Operating income was $651 million and operating margin was 12.6 percent, compared with operating income of $677 million and operating margin of 12.9 percent in the second quarter last year. Operating margin of 12.9 percent in the second quarter last year included a 30-basis-point benefit resulting from a reduction in reorganization liabilities in that quarter.
New bookings for the quarter were $6.52 billion, with consulting bookings of $3.39 billion and outsourcing bookings of $3.13 billion, bringing total new bookings for the first half of fiscal 2010 to more than $12 billion.
In addition, Accenture's Board of Directors has declared a semi-annual cash dividend of 37.5 cents per share, to be paid on May 14, 2010. In October, the company said that it would move from an annual to a semi-annual schedule for the payment of dividends starting in the third quarter of fiscal 2010.
William D. Green, Accenture's chairman & CEO, said, "Our second-quarter results demonstrate that we continue to manage our business very well in a challenging economic environment and that clients value our knowledge, experience and skills, as well as our focus on execution excellence and value delivered. Revenues were within our expected range, we delivered solid operating margin and generated significant free cash flow, and our balance sheet remains strong.
"We are seeing increasing momentum in many areas of our business, as clients are starting to look to the future and to focus on growth and revenue enhancement along with continued improvements in operating efficiency. Our strong $6.5 billion in bookings  with more than $3 billion each in consulting and outsourcing  coupled with our growing pipeline, show heightened demand for our services and a positive trajectory for our business. We are well positioned to drive profitable growth and, as always, remain focused on delivering value to our clients and shareholders."
Financial Review
Revenues before reimbursements ("net revenues") for the second quarter of fiscal 2010 were $5.18 billion, compared with $5.27 billion in the second quarter of fiscal 2009, a decrease of 2 percent in U.S. dollars and 8 percent in local currency. Net revenues for the second quarter of fiscal 2010 reflect a foreign-exchange impact of positive 6 percent.
 
 
Diluted EPS for the second quarter of fiscal 2010 were $0.60, a decrease of $0.03 from the second quarter of fiscal 2009, broken down as:
 
    offset by:
 
Operating income for the second quarter was $651 million, or 12.6 percent of net revenues, compared with $677 million, or 12.9 percent of net revenues, for the second quarter of fiscal 2009. Operating margin of 12.9 percent in the second quarter last year included a 30-basis-point benefit resulting from a reduction in reorganization liabilities in that quarter. Absent that benefit, operating margin in the second quarter last year would have been 12.6 percent.
Gross margin (gross profit as a percentage of net revenues) for the second quarter was 32.7 percent, compared with 30.8 percent for the second quarter last year. Selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses for the second quarter were $1.04 billion, or 20.0 percent of net revenues, compared with $958 million, or 18.2 percent of net revenues, for the second quarter last year. The change in gross margin and in SG&A as a percentage of net revenues compared with the second quarter last year was primarily due to the implementation of the company's sales-effectiveness model, which the company described last quarter. This had no overall impact on reported operating expenses or operating margin.
The company's effective tax rate for the second quarter was 27.8 percent, compared with 28.1 percent for the second quarter last year.
Net income (previously "Net income before noncontrolling interests" and "Income before minority interest") for the second quarter was $462 million, compared with $502 million for the same period of fiscal 2009.
Operating cash flow for the second quarter was $660 million, and property and equipment additions were $44 million. Free cash flow, defined as operating cash flow net of property and equipment additions, was $616 million. For the same period last year, operating cash flow was $631 million; property and equipment additions were $53 million; and free cash flow was $578 million.
Days services outstanding, or DSOs, were 30 at Feb. 28, 2010, compared with 28 at Aug. 31, 2009.
Accenture's total cash balance at Feb. 28, 2010 was $4.11 billion, compared with $4.54 billion at Aug. 31, 2009.
Utilization for the second quarter of fiscal 2010 was 88 percent, compared with 88 percent for the first quarter and 83 percent for the second quarter last year. Attrition for the quarter was 15 percent, compared with 12 percent for the first quarter and 9 percent for the second quarter last year.
New Bookings
New bookings for the second quarter were $6.52 billion and reflect a positive 6 percent foreign-currency impact when compared to new bookings in the second quarter last year.
 
 
Net Revenues by Operating Group
Net revenues by operating group for the second quarter were as follows:
 
 
 
 
 
*On Sept. 1, 2009, the Company formed the Health & Public Service operating group by combining various healthcare-related components of its Products operating group with its Public Service operating group. Prior-period amounts have been reclassified to conform to the current-period presentation.
Net Revenues by Geographic Region
Net revenues by geographic region for the second quarter were as follows:
 
 
 
Share Repurchase Activity
During the second quarter of fiscal 2010, Accenture repurchased or redeemed 10.4 million shares for a total of $434 million, including 2.4 million shares repurchased in the open market. Accenture's total remaining share repurchase authority at Feb. 28, 2010, was approximately $4.1 billion.
At Feb. 28, 2010, Accenture had approximately 726 million total shares outstanding, including 636 million Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares and 90 million Accenture SCA Class I common shares and Accenture Canada Holding, Inc. exchangeable shares.
Dividend
Accenture plc has declared a semi-annual cash dividend of 37.5 cents per share on Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares for shareholders of record at the close of business on April 16, 2010, and Accenture SCA will declare a semi-annual cash dividend of 37.5 cents per share on Accenture SCA Class I common shares for shareholders of record at the close of business on April 13, 2010. These dividends are both payable on May 14, 2010.
Business Outlook
Third Quarter Fiscal 2010
Accenture expects net revenues for the third quarter of fiscal 2010 to be in the range of $5.5 billion to $5.7 billion. This range assumes a foreign-exchange impact of positive 5 percent compared with the third quarter of fiscal 2009.
Full Fiscal Year 2010
The company's business outlook for the full fiscal year now assumes a foreign-exchange impact of positive 3 percent compared with fiscal 2009. The annual business outlook provided in the company's first-quarter earnings announcement in October assumed a foreign-exchange impact of positive 5 percent.
Accenture continues to target new bookings for fiscal 2010 in the range of $23 billion to $26 billion.
Accenture now expects net revenue growth for the full fiscal year to be at the low end of its guided range of negative 3 percent to positive 1 percent in local currency.
Reflecting its updated foreign-currency assumption, the company has lowered its outlook for diluted EPS for the full fiscal year by $0.06 and now expects diluted EPS to be in the range of $2.61 to $2.69. Accenture continues to expect operating margin for the full fiscal year to be 13.4 percent.
The company continues to expect operating cash flow to be in the range of $2.39 billion to $2.59 billion, property and equipment additions to be $290 million, and free cash flow to be in the range of $2.1 billion to $2.3 billion. The company also continues to expect the annual effective tax rate to be in the range of 30 percent to 32 percent.
Conference Call and Webcast Details
Accenture will host a conference call at 4:30 p.m. EDT today to discuss its second-quarter fiscal 2010 financial results. To participate, please dial +1 (800) 230-1059 +1 (612) 332-0107 outside the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada approximately 15 minutes before the scheduled start of the call. The conference call will also be accessible live on the Investor Relations section of the Accenture Web site at www.accenture.com.
A replay of the conference call will be available online at www.accenture.com beginning at 7:00 p.m. EDT today and continuing until Wednesday, June 23, 2010. A podcast of the conference call will be available online at www.accenture.com beginning approximately 24 hours after the call and continuing until Wednesday, June 23. The replay will also be available via telephone by dialing +1 (800) 475-6701 +1 (320) 365-3844 outside the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada and entering access code 148470 from 7:00 p.m. EDT today through Wednesday, June 23.
About Accenture
Accenture is a global management consulting, technology services and outsourcing company, with more than 181,000 people serving clients in more than 120 countries. Combining unparalleled experience, comprehensive capabilities across all industries and business functions, and extensive research on the world's most successful companies, Accenture collaborates with clients to help them become high-performance businesses and governments. The company generated net revenues of US$21.58 billion for the fiscal year ended Aug. 31, 2009. Its home page is www.accenture.com.
Non-GAAP Financial Information
This press release includes certain non-GAAP financial information as defined by Securities and Exchange Commission Regulation G. Pursuant to the requirements of this regulation, reconciliations of this non-GAAP financial information to Accenture's financial statements as prepared under generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) are included in this press release. Financial results "in local currency" are calculated by restating current-period activity into U.S. dollars using the comparable prior-year period's foreign-currency exchange rates.
Accenture's management believes providing investors with this information gives additional insights into Accenture's results of operations. While Accenture's management believes that these non-GAAP financial measures are useful in evaluating Accenture's operations, this information should be considered as supplemental in nature and not as a substitute for the related financial information prepared in accordance with GAAP.
Forward-Looking Statements
Except for the historical information and discussions contained herein, statements in this news release may constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve a number of risks, uncertainties and other factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed or implied. These include, without limitation, risks that: our results of operations could be adversely affected by economic and political conditions and the effects of these conditions on our clients' businesses and levels of business activity; our results of operations could be negatively affected if we cannot expand and develop our services and solutions in response to changes in technology and client demand; the consulting, systems integration and technology and outsourcing markets are highly competitive and we might not be able to compete effectively; our work with government clients exposes us to additional risks in the government contracting environment; clients may not be satisfied with our services; our results of operations could be adversely affected if our clients terminate their contracts with us; our outsourcing services subject us to operational and financial risk; our results of operations may be adversely affected by the type and level of technology spending by our clients; our profitability may suffer if we are not able to maintain favorable pricing rates and utilization rates; our business could be negatively affected by legal liability that results from our providing solutions or services; our profitability may suffer if we cannot anticipate the cost and complexity of performing our work or if we are not able to control our costs; our global operations are subject to complex risks, some of which might be beyond our control; our business and financial results may be adversely affected if we are unable to keep our supply of skills and resources in balance with client demand, including if we are unable to hire sufficient employees with the skills and background we require; liabilities could arise if our subcontractors or other third parties cannot deliver their project contributions on time or at all; legislative or regulatory action could materially and adversely affect us; we may be subject to criticism and negative publicity related to our incorporation in Ireland; we might be unable to achieve our business objectives if we are unable to manage the organizational challenges associated with our size; consolidation in the industries that we serve could adversely affect our business; our ability to attract and retain business may depend on our reputation in the marketplace; our share price could fluctuate due to numerous factors, including variability in revenues, operating results and profitability; as well as the risks, uncertainties and other factors discussed under the "Risk Factors" heading in our most recent annual report on Form 10-K and other documents filed with or furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission. Statements in this news release speak only as of the date they were made, and Accenture undertakes no duty to update any forward-looking statements made in this news release or to conform such statements to actual results or changes in Accenture's expectations.
Contact:
Roxanne Taylor
Accenture
+1 (917) 452-5106
roxanne.taylor@accenture.com
 
 
 
 
n/m = not meaningful
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ACN/ACN-8K-20100624160835.txt.gz
TIME:20100624160835
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition
On June 24, 2010, Accenture issued a press release announcing financial results for its third quarter of fiscal year 2010, which fiscal quarter ended on May 31, 2010.
A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1. All information in the press release is furnished but not filed.
Non-GAAP Financial Information
In the attached press release Accenture discloses the following non-GAAP financial measures:
 
 
Reconciliations of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable financial measures calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP are included in the press release. While Accenture's management believes that this non-GAAP financial information is useful in evaluating Accenture's operations, this information should be considered as supplemental in nature and not as a substitute for the related financial information prepared in accordance with GAAP.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
NEW YORK; June 24, 2010  Accenture (NYSE: ACN) reported financial results for the third quarter of fiscal 2010, ended May 31, 2010, with net revenues of $5.57 billion, an increase of 8 percent in U.S. dollars and 4 percent in local currency over the same period last year and within the company's guided range. Diluted earnings per share were $0.73, an increase of $0.05 over the same period last year.
Operating income was $804 million, an increase of 10 percent over the same period last year, and operating margin increased 20 basis points, to 14.4 percent.
New bookings for the quarter were $6.43 billion, with consulting bookings of $3.18 billion and outsourcing bookings of $3.25 billion, bringing total year-to-date new bookings to $18.5 billion.
William D. Green, Accenture's chairman & CEO, said, "We are delighted with our revenue growth, our momentum and our results in the third quarter, with growth led by strong performances from our Products and Financial Services operating groups. The disciplined management of our business also enabled us to grow operating margin and EPS and continue generating significant free cash flow.
"While recovery in the economic environment remains uneven, we continue to see increasing demand for our services, demonstrated by bookings of more than $6.4 billion in the quarter. We're particularly pleased that year-to-date bookings in Financial Services are at a record level. We are also starting to see the positive impact of our growth strategy, with solid performance in our core business and momentum in many new business areas as well as new markets. As always, we remain focused on delivering increasing value to our clients and our shareholders."
Financial Review
Revenues before reimbursements ("net revenues") for the third quarter of fiscal 2010 were $5.57 billion, compared with $5.15 billion in the third quarter of fiscal 2009, an increase of 8 percent in U.S. dollars and 4 percent in local currency. Net revenues for the third quarter of fiscal 2010 were within the company's guided range and reflect a foreign-exchange impact that rounds to positive 5 percent.
 
Diluted EPS for the third quarter of fiscal 2010 were $0.73, an increase of $0.05 over the third quarter of fiscal 2009, broken down as:
 
offset by:
 
Operating income for the third quarter was $804 million, or 14.4 percent of net revenues, compared with $732 million, or 14.2 percent of net revenues, for the third quarter of fiscal 2009.
Gross margin (gross profit as a percentage of net revenues) for the third quarter was 34.7 percent, compared with 32.5 percent for the third quarter last year. Selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses for the third quarter were $1.12 billion, or 20.2 percent of net revenues, compared with $935 million, or 18.2 percent of net revenues, for the third quarter last year. The change in gross margin and in SG&A as a percentage of net revenues compared with the third quarter last year was primarily due to the implementation of the company's sales-effectiveness model, which the company described after its first quarter this year. This had no overall impact on reported operating expenses or operating margin.
The company's effective tax rate for the third quarter was 29.8 percent, compared with 28.2 percent for the third quarter last year. The lower tax rate in the third quarter last year was primarily a result of higher benefits related to final determinations of prior-year tax liabilities recorded in that quarter.
Net income (previously "Net income before noncontrolling interests" and "Income before minority interest") for the third quarter was $564 million, compared with $537 million for the same period of fiscal 2009.
Operating cash flow for the third quarter was $961 million, and property and equipment additions were $58 million. Free cash flow, defined as operating cash flow net of property and equipment additions, was $903 million. For the same period last year, operating cash flow was $1,015 million; property and equipment additions were $44 million; and free cash flow was $971 million.
Days services outstanding, or DSOs, were 28 at May 31, 2010, flat compared with Aug. 31, 2009.
Accenture's total cash balance at May 31, 2010 was $4.31 billion, compared with $4.54 billion at Aug. 31, 2009.
Utilization for the third quarter of fiscal 2010 was 88 percent, compared with 88 percent for the second quarter of fiscal 2010 and 83 percent for the third quarter of fiscal 2009. Attrition for the third quarter of fiscal 2010 was 17 percent, compared with 15 percent for the second quarter of fiscal 2010 and 8 percent for the third quarter of fiscal 2009.
New Bookings
New bookings for the third quarter were $6.43 billion and reflect a positive 5 percent foreign-currency impact when compared to new bookings in the third quarter last year.
 
 
Net Revenues by Operating Group
Net revenues by operating group for the third quarter were as follows:
 
 
 
 
 
*On Sept. 1, 2009, the Company formed the Health & Public Service operating group by combining various healthcare-related components of its Products operating group with its Public Service operating group. Prior-period amounts have been reclassified to conform to the current-period presentation.
Net Revenues by Geographic Region
Net revenues by geographic region for the third quarter were as follows:
 
 
Share Repurchase Activity
During the third quarter of fiscal 2010, Accenture repurchased or redeemed 10.6 million shares for a total of $447 million, including 5.2 million shares repurchased in the open market. Accenture's total remaining share repurchase authority at May 31, 2010, was approximately $3.6 billion.
At May 31, 2010, Accenture had approximately 721 million total shares outstanding, including 636 million Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares and 85 million Accenture SCA Class I common shares and Accenture Canada Holding, Inc. exchangeable shares.
Dividend
On May 14, 2010, a semi-annual cash dividend of 37.5 cents per share was paid on Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares to shareholders of record at the close of business on April 16, 2010 and on Accenture SCA Class I common shares to shareholders of record at the close of business on April 13, 2010.
Business Outlook
Fourth Quarter Fiscal 2010
Accenture expects net revenues for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2010 to be in the range of $5.15 billion to $5.35 billion. This range assumes a foreign-exchange impact of negative 5 percent compared with the fourth quarter of fiscal 2009.
Full Fiscal Year 2010
The company's business outlook for the full fiscal year now assumes a foreign-exchange impact of positive 2 percent compared with fiscal 2009. The annual business outlook provided in the company's second-quarter earnings announcement in March assumed a foreign-exchange impact of positive 3 percent for the full fiscal year.
With $18.5 billion in bookings year-to-date, Accenture now expects new bookings for the full fiscal year to be toward the middle of its previously guided range of $23 billion to $26 billion.
Accenture continues to expect net revenue growth for the full fiscal year to be at the low end of its previously guided range of negative 3 percent to positive 1 percent in local currency.
The company now expects diluted EPS for the full fiscal year to be in the lower half of its previously guided range of $2.61 to $2.69. Accenture now expects operating margin for the full fiscal year to be 13.5 percent, a 10-basis-point increase from its previously guided range.
The company now expects operating cash flow to be in the range of $2.5 billion to $2.7 billion, property and equipment additions to be $240 million, and free cash flow to be in the range of $2.3 billion to $2.5 billion, an increase of $200 million over its previously guided range. The company now expects the annual tax rate to be in the range of 29 percent to 30 percent; its previously guided range was 30 percent to 32 percent.
Conference Call and Webcast Details
Accenture will host a conference call at 4:30 p.m. EDT today to discuss its third-quarter fiscal 2010 financial results. To participate, please dial +1 (800) 230-1059 +1 (612) 234-9959 outside the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada approximately 15 minutes before the scheduled start of the call. The conference call will also be accessible live on the Investor Relations section of the Accenture Web site at www.accenture.com.
A replay of the conference call will be available online at www.accenture.com beginning at 7:00 p.m. EDT on Thursday, June 24, and continuing until Wednesday, Sept. 29, 2010. A podcast of the conference call will be available online at www.accenture.com beginning approximately 24 hours after the call and continuing until Wednesday, Sept. 29. The replay will also be available via telephone by dialing +1 (800) 475-6701 +1 (320) 365-3844 outside the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada and entering access code 158013 from 7:00 p.m. EDT Thursday, June 24 through Wednesday, Sept. 29.
About Accenture
Accenture is a global management consulting, technology services and outsourcing company, with more than 190,000 people serving clients in more than 120 countries. Combining unparalleled experience, comprehensive capabilities across all industries and business functions, and extensive research on the world's most successful companies, Accenture collaborates with clients to help them become high-performance businesses and governments. The company generated net revenues of US$21.58 billion for the fiscal year ended Aug. 31, 2009. Its home page is www.accenture.com.
Non-GAAP Financial Information
This press release includes certain non-GAAP financial information as defined by Securities and Exchange Commission Regulation G. Pursuant to the requirements of this regulation, reconciliations of this non-GAAP financial information to Accenture's financial statements as prepared under generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) are included in this press release. Financial results "in local currency" are calculated by restating current-period activity into U.S. dollars using the comparable prior-year period's foreign-currency exchange rates. Accenture's management believes providing investors with this information gives additional insights into
Accenture's results of operations. While Accenture's management believes that these non-GAAP financial measures are useful in evaluating Accenture's operations, this information should be considered as supplemental in nature and not as a substitute for the related financial information prepared in accordance with GAAP.
Forward-Looking Statements
Except for the historical information and discussions contained herein, statements in this news release may constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve a number of risks, uncertainties and other factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed or implied. These include, without limitation, risks that: our results of operations could be adversely affected by economic and political conditions and the effects of these conditions on our clients' businesses and levels of business activity; our results of operations could be negatively affected if we cannot expand and develop our services and solutions in response to changes in technology and client demand; the consulting, systems integration and technology and outsourcing markets are highly competitive and we might not be able to compete effectively; our reported revenues and earnings could be lower if the U.S. dollar strengthens against other currencies, particularly the Euro and British pound; our work with government clients exposes us to additional risks in the government contracting environment; clients may not be satisfied with our services; our results of operations could be adversely affected if our clients terminate their contracts with us; our outsourcing services subject us to operational and financial risk; our results of operations may be adversely affected by the type and level of technology spending by our clients; the pricing environment continues to remain competitive, particularly in several markets within Europe, and our profitability may suffer if we are not able to maintain favorable pricing rates and utilization rates; our business could be negatively affected by legal liability that results from our providing solutions or services; our profitability may suffer if we cannot anticipate the cost and complexity of performing our work or if we are not able to control our costs; our global operations are subject to complex risks, some of which might be beyond our control; our business and financial results may be adversely affected if we are unable to keep our supply of skills and resources in balance with client demand, including if we are unable to hire sufficient employees with the skills and background where they are needed; liabilities could arise if our subcontractors or other third parties cannot deliver their project contributions on time or at all; legislative or regulatory action could materially and adversely affect us; we may be subject to criticism and negative publicity related to our incorporation in Ireland; we might be unable to achieve our business objectives if we are unable to manage the organizational challenges associated with our size; consolidation in the industries that we serve could adversely affect our business; our ability to attract and retain business may depend on our reputation in the marketplace; our share price could fluctuate due to numerous factors, including variability in revenues, operating results and profitability; as well as the risks, uncertainties and other factors discussed under the "Risk Factors" heading in our most recent annual report on Form 10-K and other documents filed with or furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission. Statements in this news release speak only as of the date they were made, and Accenture undertakes no duty to update any forward-looking statements made in this news release or to conform such statements to actual results or changes in Accenture's expectations.
Contact:
Roxanne Taylor
Accenture
+1 (917) 452-5106
roxanne.taylor@accenture.com
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ACN/ACN-8K-20100913161945.txt.gz
TIME:20100913161945
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
(d) Appointment of New Directors
On September 10, 2010, the Board of Directors (the "Board") of Accenture plc (the "Company") appointed Dennis F. Hightower to join the Board as a new director, upon the recommendation of its Nominating & Governance Committee. Mr. Hightower will serve until the Company's annual general meeting of shareholders in February 2011, when he will be subject to re-appointment by a vote of the Company's shareholders. Mr. Hightower, who first joined the board of directors of the Company's predecessor, Accenture Ltd, in 2003, stepped down from that board effective August 9, 2009 to accept his appointment as U.S. Deputy Secretary of Commerce. Mr. Hightower served as U.S. Deputy Secretary of Commerce from August 2009 until August 2010. Prior thereto, Mr. Hightower was a retired business executive with distinguished careers in both the private and public sectors, including more than 35 years of experience in global marketing, strategic planning, operations and international general management. He had most recently served as CEO of Europe Online Networks S.A., a privately held broadband interactive entertainment company based in Luxembourg.
Mr. Hightower joins the Board as a Class I director, and has been appointed to serve on the Board's Compensation and Nominating & Governance committees. He will receive the pro rata portion of the standard compensation for service on the Board (currently $80,000 per annum) and its various committees (currently $2,500 per annum for each of the Compensation and Nominating & Governance committees), based on the number of days remaining in the current director compensation year. Given his prior service as a director of Accenture Ltd, Mr. Hightower will not receive the standard equity grant customarily made by the Company to directors newly appointed to the Board. Mr. Hightower may elect to receive his compensation in cash or equity.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) Exhibits
99.1 Press Release of Accenture plc, dated September 13, 2010
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
NEW YORK; Sept. 13, 2010  Accenture (NYSE: ACN) has appointed Dennis F. Hightower to the company's board of directors, effective immediately. Mr. Hightower, who first joined Accenture's board of directors in 2003, stepped down from the board last year to accept his appointment as U.S. deputy secretary of commerce.
"We are thrilled to welcome Dennis back to our board of directors," said William D. Green, Accenture's chairman & CEO. "His experience this past year as deputy secretary of commerce is another important attribute he brings to Accenture, on top of his more than 35 years of global business experience and his previous tenure on our board. I speak for all the board members when I say that we are excited to once again benefit from Dennis' invaluable perspective and experience as we remain focused on ensuring that Accenture is well-positioned for growth."
Mr. Hightower's appointment has been approved by Accenture's board of directors. Mr. Hightower joins the board as a Class I director and will serve on the board's Nominating & Governance and Compensation committees. He will be up for re-appointment at the Accenture plc annual general meeting of shareholders in February 2011.
Accenture's board now comprises 11 directors, 10 of whom are external and independent. Mr. Green is the board's only internal director.
Prior to serving as U.S. deputy secretary of commerce, Mr. Hightower was a retired business executive with distinguished careers in both the private and public sectors, including more than 35 years of experience in global marketing, strategic planning, operations and international general management. He had most recently served as CEO of Europe Online Networks S.A., a privately held broadband interactive entertainment company based in Luxembourg. From 1996 to 2000, he was a professor of Management and a senior lecturer at Harvard Business School.
From 1987 to 1996 Mr. Hightower was a senior executive with The Walt Disney Company, where he served in various positions, including president of Walt Disney Television & Telecommunications and president of Consumer Products, Europe, Middle East and Africa. Prior to joining Walt Disney, Mr. Hightower was a managing director with Russell Reynolds Associates, Inc.; vice president of corporate planning and a corporate officer at Mattel Inc.; and vice president and general manager with General Electric in Mexico. He also held positions with McKinsey & Company, Inc. and Xerox Corporation.
Before entering the private sector, Mr. Hightower was highly decorated for his service in the U.S. Army, where he rose to the rank of major. He holds an MBA from Harvard Business School and bachelor of science and honorary doctorate degrees from Howard University.
About Accenture
Accenture is a global management consulting, technology services and outsourcing company, with more than 190,000 people serving clients in more than 120 countries. Combining unparalleled experience, comprehensive capabilities across all industries and business functions, and extensive research on the world's most successful companies, Accenture collaborates with
clients to help them become high-performance businesses and governments. The company generated net revenues of US$21.58 billion for the fiscal year ended Aug. 31, 2009. Its home page is .
www.accenture.com
Contact:
Roxanne Taylor
Accenture
+1 (917) 452-5106
roxanne.taylor@accenture.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ACN/ACN-8K-20100930161652.txt.gz
TIME:20100930161652
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition
On September 30, 2010, Accenture issued a press release announcing financial results for its fourth quarter and full fiscal year ended August 31, 2010.
A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1. All information in the press release is furnished but not filed.
Non-GAAP Financial Information
In the attached press release Accenture discloses the following non-GAAP financial measures:
 
 
 
Reconciliations of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable financial measures calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP are included in the press release. While Accenture's management believes that this non-GAAP financial information is useful in evaluating Accenture's operations, this information should be considered as supplemental in nature and not as a substitute for the related financial information prepared in accordance with GAAP.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) Exhibits
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
NEW YORK; Sept. 30, 2010  Accenture (NYSE: ACN) reported strong financial results for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2010, ended Aug. 31, and full-year results in line with the company's expectations.
For the fourth quarter, revenues before reimbursements ("net revenues") were $5.42 billion, an increase of 5 percent in U.S. dollars and 8 percent in local currency compared with the fourth quarter of fiscal 2009. Diluted earnings per share were $0.66. New bookings were $6.5 billion. Operating margin was 13.2 percent. Free cash flow was $1.15 billion.
For the full fiscal year, net revenues were $21.55 billion, flat in U.S. dollars and a decrease of 2 percent in local currency compared with fiscal 2009. Diluted earnings per share were $2.66. New bookings were $25.0 billion. Operating margin was 13.5 percent. Free cash flow was $2.85 billion, which exceeded the top end of the company's expectations by $350 million.
In addition, Accenture's Board of Directors has declared a semi-annual cash dividend of $0.45 per share, an increase of 7.5 cents per share, or 20 percent, over its previous semi-annual dividend, declared in March.
William D. Green, Accenture's chairman & CEO, said, "We're very pleased with our financial results, with our strong fourth-quarter performance demonstrating further evidence of our growth and momentum. We managed our business well and accelerated actions to grow revenue and expand operating margin. And our strong bookings  including consulting bookings of more than $3.5 billion  show increasing demand for our services. We generated significant free cash flow, and our balance sheet remains exceptionally strong. We continued our commitment to return cash to shareholders through an increased semi-annual cash dividend, declared today, and through the repurchase of more than $2 billion of our shares during fiscal 2010.
"We are working at the heart of our clients' businesses, helping them navigate the changing global environment and improve their performance. We will continue to invest in our core business, as well as in new growth areas and markets, to deliver increasing value to both our clients and shareholders. Despite ongoing challenges in the global economy, we are well-positioned for growth and expansion in the year ahead."
Financial Review
Fourth Quarter Fiscal 2010
Net revenues for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2010 were $5.42 billion, compared with $5.15 billion for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2009, an increase of 5 percent in U.S. dollars and 8 percent in local currency. Net revenues for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2010 reflect a foreign-exchange impact of negative 3 percent compared with the fourth quarter of fiscal 2009, less than the negative 5 percent impact the Company had previously assumed. Adjusting for the actual foreign exchange impact in the fourth quarter, the Company's previously expected range for quarterly net revenues would have been $5.25 billion to $5.45 billion. Therefore, Accenture's fourth-quarter fiscal 2010 net revenues of $5.42 billion were at the high end of the previously expected range.
 
 
Diluted EPS for the fourth quarter were $0.66, compared with $0.39 for the fourth quarter last year. The increase in EPS is broken down as:
 
 
 
Offset by:
 
 
Operating income for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2010 was $714 million, or 13.2 percent of net revenues. This compares with fourth-quarter fiscal 2009 operating income of $420 million, or 8.2 percent of net revenues, on a GAAP basis and $672 million, or 13.1 percent of net revenues, excluding the impact of the $253 million restructuring charge recorded in the fourth quarter of fiscal 2009.
Gross margin (gross profit as a percentage of net revenues) for the fourth quarter was 34.0 percent, compared with 32.3 percent for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2009. Selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses for the fourth quarter were $1.13 billion, or 20.9 percent of net revenues, compared with $985 million, or 19.1 percent of net revenues, for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2009. The change in gross margin and in SG&A as a percentage of net revenues compared with the fourth quarter last year was primarily due to the implementation of the company's sales-effectiveness model, which the company described after the first quarter of fiscal 2010. This had no overall impact on reported operating expenses or operating margin.
 
The company's effective tax rate for the fourth quarter was 28.8 percent, compared with 27.6 percent for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2009.
Net income (previously "Income before minority interest") for the fourth quarter was $510 million, compared with $306 million for the same period of fiscal 2009, which included the impact of the restructuring charge in that quarter.
Operating cash flow for the fourth quarter was $1.25 billion, and property and equipment additions were $102 million. Free cash flow, defined as operating cash flow net of property and equipment additions, was $1.15 billion, an increase of $179 million over the fourth quarter of fiscal 2009. For the same period of fiscal 2009, operating cash flow was $1.05 billion, property and equipment additions were $75 million, and free cash flow was $971 million.
Days services outstanding, or DSOs, were 30 days at Aug. 31, 2010, compared with 28 days at Aug. 31, 2009.
Accenture's total cash balance at Aug. 31, 2010 was $4.84 billion, compared with $4.54 billion at Aug. 31, 2009.
Utilization for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2010 was 86 percent, compared with 88 percent for the third quarter of fiscal 2010 and 86 percent for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2009. Attrition for the fourth quarter was 17 percent, compared with 17 percent for the third quarter of fiscal 2010 and 10 percent for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2009.
New Bookings
New bookings for the fourth quarter were $6.5 billion. This reflects a negative 1 percent foreign-currency impact compared with the fourth quarter of fiscal 2009.
 
 
Net Revenues by Operating Group
All of the company's operating groups with the exception of Health & Public Service achieved positive revenue growth in local currency compared with the fourth quarter last year.
Net revenues by operating group for the fourth quarter were as follows:
 
 
 
 
 
 
Net Revenues by Geographic Region
Net revenues by geographic region for the fourth quarter were as follows:
 
 
 
Full Year Fiscal 2010
Net revenues for the full 2010 fiscal year were $21.55 billion, compared with $21.58 billion for fiscal 2009, flat in U.S. dollars and a decrease of 2 percent in local currency. Net revenues for fiscal 2010 reflect a foreign-exchange impact of positive 2 percent compared with fiscal 2009.
 
 
Diluted EPS for the full fiscal year were $2.66, compared with $2.44 for fiscal 2009. The increase in EPS is broken down as:
 
 
 
 
Offset by:
 
 
 
 
Operating income for the full fiscal year was $2.91 billion, or 13.5 percent of net revenues, compared with fiscal 2009 operating income of $2.64 billion, or 12.3 percent of net revenues, on a GAAP basis and $2.90 billion, or 13.4 percent of net revenues, excluding the impact of the $253 million restructuring charge recorded in the fourth quarter of fiscal 2009.
Gross margin (gross profit as a percentage of net revenues) for fiscal 2010 was 33.6 percent, compared with 31.7 percent for fiscal 2009. Selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses for the full fiscal year were $4.33 billion, or 20.1 percent of net revenues, compared with $3.95 billion, or 18.3 percent of net revenues, for fiscal 2009. The change in gross margin and in SG&A as a percentage of net revenues compared with fiscal 2009 was primarily due to the implementation of the company's sales-effectiveness model, which the company described after the first quarter of fiscal 2010. This had no overall impact on reported operating expenses or operating margin.
Accenture's annual effective tax rate for the full fiscal year was 29.3 percent, compared with 27.6 percent for fiscal 2009, in line with the company's guided range of 29 percent to 30 percent.
Net income (previously "Income before minority interest") for the full fiscal year was $2.06 billion, compared with $1.94billion for fiscal 2009, which included the impact of the restructuring charge recorded in the fourth quarter of fiscal 2009.
 
For the year ended Aug. 31, 2010, operating cash flow was $3.09 billion and property and equipment additions were $238million. Free cash flow, defined as operating cash flow net of property and equipment additions, was $2.85 billion, exceeding the company's previously guided range of $2.3 billion to $2.5 billion. For the prior fiscal year, ended Aug. 31, 2009, operating cash flow was $3.16 billion, property and equipment additions were $243 million, and free cash flow was $2.92 billion.
 
Utilization for the full fiscal year 2010 was 87 percent, compared with 84 percent for fiscal 2009. Attrition for the full year was 15 percent, compared with 10 percent for fiscal 2009.
New Bookings
New bookings for the full fiscal year were $25.0 billion, an increase of 5 percent in U.S. dollars and 1 percent in local currency over fiscal 2009. New bookings for fiscal 2010 reflect a positive 3 percent foreign-currency impact compared with fiscal 2009.
 
 
Net Revenues by Operating Group
Accenture's Financial Services and Products operating groups grew revenues in local currency in fiscal 2010 compared with fiscal 2009, while the other three operating groups experienced a decline in revenues in local currency.
Net revenues by operating group for the full fiscal year were as follows:
 
 
 
 
 
 
Net Revenues by Geographic Region
Net revenues by geographic region for the full fiscal year were as follows:
 
 
 
 
Dividend
Accenture plc has declared a semi-annual cash dividend of $0.45 per share on Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares for shareholders of record at the close of business on Oct. 15, 2010, and Accenture SCA will declare a semi-annual cash dividend of $0.45 per share on Accenture SCA Class I common shares for shareholders of record at the close of business on Oct. 12, 2010. Both dividends are payable on Nov. 15. This represents an increase of 7.5 cents per share, or 20 percent, over the company's previous semi-annual dividend, declared in March.
Share Repurchase Activity
During the fourth quarter of fiscal 2010, Accenture repurchased or redeemed 18.9 million shares for a total of $738 million, including $667 million for 17.1 million shares repurchased on the open market. During the full fiscal year 2010, Accenture repurchased or redeemed 51.8 million shares for a total of $2.07 billion, including $986 million for 24.9 million shares repurchased in the open market. Accenture's total remaining share repurchase authority at Aug. 31, 2010 was approximately $2.9 billion.
At Aug. 31, 2010, Accenture had approximately 706 million total shares outstanding, including 625 million Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares and minority holdings of 81 million shares (Accenture SCA Class I common shares and Accenture Canada Holding, Inc. exchangeable shares).
Business Outlook
First Quarter Fiscal 2011
Accenture expects net revenues for the first quarter of fiscal 2011 to be in the range of $5.6 billion to $5.8 billion, which assumes a foreign-exchange impact of negative 3 percent compared with the first quarter of fiscal 2010.
Fiscal Year 2011
Accenture's business outlook for the full 2011 fiscal year assumes a foreign-exchange impact of negative 1 percent compared with fiscal 2010.
For fiscal 2011, the company expects net revenue growth to be in the range of 7 percent to 10 percent in local currency, consistent with the preliminary business outlook the company provided at its Investor & Analyst Conference in April. The company now expects diluted EPS growth to be in the range of 13 percent to 16 percent, or $3.00 to $3.08, an increase from the range of 12 percent to 15 percent the company provided at its Investor & Analyst Conference.
Accenture expects operating margin for the full fiscal year to be in the range of 13.6 percent to 13.7 percent.
The company expects operating cash flow to be $2.7 billion to $2.9 billion; property and equipment additions to be $340 million; and free cash flow to be in the range of $2.4 billion to $2.6 billion. The annual effective tax rate is expected to be in the range of 28 percent to 29 percent.
Accenture is targeting new bookings for fiscal 2011 in the range of $25 billion to $28 billion.
 
Conference Call and Webcast Details
Accenture will host a conference call at 4:30 p.m. EDT today to discuss its fourth-quarter and full-year 2010 financial results. To participate, please dial +1 (888) 423-3272 [+1 (612) 332-0802 outside the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada] approximately 15 minutes before the scheduled start of the call. The conference call will also be accessible live on the Investor Relations section of the Accenture Web site at www.accenture.com.
A replay of the conference call will be available online at www.accenture.com beginning at 7:00 p.m. EDT on Thursday, Sept. 30, and continuing until Monday, Dec. 20, 2010. A podcast of the conference call will be available online at www.accenture.com beginning approximately 24 hours after the call and continuing until Monday, Dec. 20. The replay will also be available via telephone by dialing +1 (800) 475-6701 [+1 (320) 365-3844 outside the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada] and entering access code 169878 from 7:00 p.m. EDT Thursday, Sept. 30 through Monday, Dec. 20.
About Accenture
Accenture is a global management consulting, technology services and outsourcing company, with approximately 204,000 people serving clients in more than 120 countries. Combining unparalleled experience, comprehensive capabilities across all industries and business functions, and extensive research on the world's most successful companies, Accenture collaborates with clients to help them become high-performance businesses and governments. The company generated net revenues of US$21.6 billion for the fiscal year ended Aug. 31, 2010. Its home page is www.accenture.com.
Non-GAAP Financial Information
This press release includes certain non-GAAP financial information as defined by Securities and Exchange Commission Regulation G. Pursuant to the requirements of this regulation, reconciliations of this non-GAAP financial information to Accenture's financial statements as prepared under generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) are included in this press release. Financial results "in local currency" are calculated by restating current-period activity into U.S. dollars using the comparable prior-year period's foreign-currency exchange rates. Accenture's management believes providing investors with this information gives additional insights into Accenture's results of operations. While Accenture's management believes that these non-GAAP financial measures are useful in evaluating Accenture's operations, this information should be considered as supplemental in nature and not as a substitute for the related financial information prepared in accordance with GAAP.
Forward-Looking Statements
Except for the historical information and discussions contained herein, statements in this news release may constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve a number of risks, uncertainties and other factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed or implied. These include, without limitation, risks that: our results of operations could be adversely affected by economic and political conditions and the effects of these conditions on our clients' businesses and levels of business activity; the pricing environment continues to remain competitive, and our profitability may suffer if we are not able to improve our pricing and maintain favorable utilization rates; our profitability may suffer if we cannot anticipate the cost and complexity of performing our work or if we are not able
 
to control our costs; our business and financial results may be adversely affected if we are unable to keep our supply of skills and resources in balance with client demand, including if we are unable to hire sufficient employees with the skills and background where they are needed; our results of operations could be negatively affected if we cannot expand and develop our services and solutions in response to changes in technology and client demand; the consulting, systems integration and technology and outsourcing markets are highly competitive and we might not be able to compete effectively; our revenues, revenue growth and earnings in U.S. dollars may be lower if the U.S. dollar strengthens against other currencies, particularly the Euro and British pound; our work with government clients exposes us to additional risks in the government contracting environment; clients may not be satisfied with our services; our results of operations could be adversely affected if our clients terminate their contracts with us; our outsourcing services subject us to operational and financial risk; our results of operations may be adversely affected by the type and level of technology spending by our clients; our business could be negatively affected by legal liability that results from our providing solutions or services; our global operations, including our global delivery network, are subject to complex risks, some of which might be beyond our control; liabilities could arise if our subcontractors or other third parties cannot deliver their project contributions on time or at all; legislative or regulatory action could materially and adversely affect us; we may be subject to criticism and negative publicity related to our incorporation in Ireland; we might be unable to achieve our business objectives if we are unable to manage the organizational challenges associated with our size; consolidation in the industries that we serve could adversely affect our business; our ability to attract and retain business may depend on our reputation in the marketplace; our share price could fluctuate due to numerous factors, including variability in revenues, operating results and profitability; as well as the risks, uncertainties and other factors discussed under the "Risk Factors" heading in our most recent annual report on Form 10-K and other documents filed with or furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission. Statements in this news release speak only as of the date they were made, and Accenture undertakes no duty to update any forward-looking statements made in this news release or to conform such statements to actual results or changes in Accenture's expectations.
Contact:
Roxanne Taylor
Accenture
+1 (917) 452-5106
roxanne.taylor@accenture.com
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ACN/ACN-8K-20101020185535.txt.gz
TIME:20101020185535
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions ( General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On October 20, 2010, Accenture plc (the "Company") announced that Pierre Nanterme has been appointed as the Company's Chief Executive Officer, effective January 1, 2011, and, in connection with his appointment, has been appointed as a member of the Board of Directors of the Company, effective immediately. William D. Green, currently Chairman of the Board of Directors & Chief Executive Officer, will continue as the Company's Chief Executive Officer until January 1, 2011 and will continue to serve as Chairman of the Company's Board of Directors after January 1, 2011.
Mr. Nanterme, 51, is based in Paris. He currently serves as group chief executive of Accenture's Financial Services operating group, which serves clients in the banking, capital markets and insurance industries. Prior to assuming his current role in September 2007, Mr. Nanterme served as Accenture's chief leadership officer.
Prior to being appointed chief leadership officer in 2006, Mr. Nanterme served as managing director of the company's Financial Services practice in Europe, Africa and Latin America; managing director of the company's Financial Services Core Europe operating unit; managing director of Accenture's Insurance industry group globally; and managing director of the company's Strategy practice in West Europe. Mr. Nanterme also served as Accenture's country managing director for France from November 2005 through August 2007.
Mr. Nanterme joined Accenture in 1983 and became a partner in 1993. He graduated from ESSEC (cole Suprieure des Sciences conomiques et Commerciales) Business School in Paris.
No determination regarding compensation arrangements relating to Mr. Nanterme's promotion to Chief Executive Officer has been made as of the date of filing of this Current Report on Form 8-K.
 
A copy of the press release announcing the election of Mr. Nanterme as a member of the Board of Directors of the Company and appointment as the Company's Chief Executive Officer has been furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
 
(d) Exhibits
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
DUBLIN; Oct. 20, 2010  Accenture's (NYSE: ACN) Board of Directors today named Pierre Nanterme chief executive officer, effective Jan. 1, 2011. Nanterme will join the company's Board of Directors, effective immediately. William D. Green, currently chairman & CEO, will continue as chairman.
"This is the right time to further strengthen Accenture's global leadership. Accenture is on a solid growth trajectory and is better positioned for the future than at any time in our history," Green said. "Pierre's significant involvement in both developing and delivering our growth strategy  and his tenure as a senior leader in our company  all point to a seamless transition. I look forward to working closely with Pierre as he accelerates the execution of our business strategy and guides Accenture through our next phase of growth."
Nanterme currently serves as group chief executive of Accenture's global Financial Services operating group, a position he has held since 2007. During his 27 years with Accenture he has held a wide variety of leadership positions across many operating dimensions of the company's business. In addition, he served as chief leadership officer, with responsibility for the company's human capital strategy and for the design and implementation of its global operating model.
"Pierre is a proven leader whose track record of successfully running key parts of our business, ability to forge major client relationships, experience building outstanding teams and commitment to our people make him the perfect choice for our next chief executive officer," Green said.
Sir Mark Moody-Stuart, lead director of the Accenture board, said, "Pierre possesses all the qualifications that we believe are critical to lead Accenture  including a keen understanding of the global marketplace and competitive landscape, a deep-seated commitment to serving clients and delivering value to shareholders, and true passion for Accenture's people. Speaking on behalf of the board, we look forward to working closely with Pierre in his role as chief executive officer.
"At the same time, we are delighted that we will continue to benefit from Bill's insights and experience in his active role as chairman. He has been an exceptional chairman and CEO, and through his leadership  including his innate ability to energize, motivate and inspire the people around him  Bill truly embodies the values at the core of Accenture's success. The combination of these two seasoned executives will give Accenture a true advantage in the marketplace."
Green will continue to play a key role and be actively involved in Accenture's business. He will continue to chair the board of directors, act as an advisor to Nanterme, and be involved in planning Accenture's long-term business strategy. He will also continue to represent Accenture with clients around the world, as well as represent Accenture with business and government leaders, champion Accenture's Skills to Succeed corporate citizenship efforts, and represent Accenture with key external groups.
 
"I am proud and truly honored to be selected as Accenture's chief executive officer," Nanterme said. "I look forward to continuing to work closely with Bill and our exceptional leadership team as we remain focused on our business and financial objectives for fiscal year 2011 and beyond. I am committed to continuing our strategy of helping clients become high-performance businesses and to delivering on our commitments to Accenture's shareholders. I believe that our more than 200,000 people are the best professionals in our industry and that our leadership team is unmatched in experience, capability and depth. I am very excited about our future and about the opportunity to lead this great company."
Accenture said that there is no change to the business outlook for fiscal 2011 that the company provided as part of its fourth-quarter and full-year fiscal 2010 earnings announcement on Sept. 30.
Pierre Nanterme
Pierre Nanterme, 51, is based in Paris. He currently serves as group chief executive of Accenture's Financial Services operating group, which serves clients in the banking, capital markets and insurance industries. Prior to assuming his current role in September 2007, Mr. Nanterme served as Accenture's chief leadership officer, with primary responsibility for Accenture's human capital strategy as well as the design and implementation of its highly regarded global operating model. In that role he was also actively involved in framing Accenture's client-service model and global strategy.
Prior to being appointed chief leadership officer in 2006, Mr. Nanterme led many areas of Accenture's business, including its Financial Services practice in Europe, Africa and Latin America; its Financial Services Core Europe operating unit; its Insurance industry group globally; and its Strategy practice in West Europe. Mr. Nanterme also served as Accenture's country managing director for France from November 2005 through August 2007.
Outside of Accenture, Mr. Nanterme is chairman of the French Consulting Association (SYNTEC) and has been chairman of the French Employers Association's Commission for Economic Affairs (MEDEF) since September 2005.
Mr. Nanterme joined Accenture in 1983 and became a partner in 1993. He graduated from ESSEC (Ecole Superieure des Sciences Economiques et Commerciales) Business School in Paris.
William D. Green
William D. Green, 57, has served on Accenture's board of directors since its inception in 2001, has been CEO since September 2004, and assumed the additional role of chairman in September 2006. Prior to becoming CEO, Mr. Green was Accenture's chief operating officerClient Services, with overall management responsibility for all of the company's operating groups. He also previously served as group chief executive of the Communications & High Tech operating group and as group chief executive of the Resources operating group. In addition, he has served as managing director for Accenture's business in the United States. Mr. Green joined Accenture in 1977.
 
Conference Call Tomorrow
Accenture will host a conference call with William D. Green and Pierre Nanterme at 8:00 a.m. EDT [1:00 p.m. GMT] tomorrow, Thursday, Oct. 21. To participate, please dial +1 (800) 401-8436 [+1 (612) 332-0632 outside the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada] approximately 15 minutes before the scheduled start of the call. The conference call will also be accessible live on the Investor Relations section of Accenture's website at www.accenture.com.
A replay of the conference call will be available online at www.accenture.com beginning at 11:00 a.m. EDT on Thursday, Oct. 21. The replay will also be available via telephone by dialing +1 (800) 475-6701 [+1 (320) 365-3844 outside the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada] and entering access code 175162.
About Accenture
Accenture is a global management consulting, technology services and outsourcing company, with approximately 204,000 people serving clients in more than 120 countries. Combining unparalleled experience, comprehensive capabilities across all industries and business functions, and extensive research on the world's most successful companies, Accenture collaborates with clients to help them become high-performance businesses and governments. Through its Skills to Succeed corporate citizenship focus, Accenture is committed to equipping 250,000 people around the world by 2015 with the skills to get a job or build a business. The company generated net revenues of US$21.6 billion for the fiscal year ended Aug. 31, 2010. Its home page is www.accenture.com.
Forward-Looking Statements
Except for the historical information and discussions contained herein, statements in this news release may constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve a number of risks, uncertainties and other factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed or implied. These include, without limitation, risks that: our results of operations could be adversely affected by economic and political conditions and the effects of these conditions on our clients' businesses and levels of business activity; the pricing environment continues to remain competitive, and our profitability may suffer if we are not able to improve our pricing and maintain favorable utilization rates; our profitability may suffer if we cannot anticipate the cost and complexity of performing our work or if we are not able to control our costs; our business and financial results may be adversely affected if we are unable to keep our supply of skills and resources in balance with client demand, including if we are unable to hire sufficient employees with the skills and background where they are needed; our results of operations could be negatively affected if we cannot expand and develop our services and solutions in response to changes in technology and client demand; the consulting, systems integration and technology and outsourcing markets are highly competitive and we might not be able to compete effectively; our revenues, revenue growth and earnings in U.S. dollars may be lower if the U.S. dollar strengthens against other currencies, particularly the Euro and British pound; our work with government clients exposes us to additional risks in the government contracting environment; clients may not be satisfied with our services; our results of operations could be adversely affected if our clients terminate their contracts with us; our outsourcing services subject us to operational and financial risk; our results of operations may be adversely affected by the type and level of technology spending by our clients; our business could be negatively affected by legal liability that results from our providing solutions or services; our global operations, including our global delivery network, are subject to complex risks, some of which might be beyond our control; liabilities could arise if our subcontractors or other third parties cannot deliver their project contributions on time or at all; legislative or regulatory action could materially and adversely affect us; we may be subject to criticism and negative publicity related to our incorporation in Ireland; we might be unable to achieve our business objectives if we are unable to manage the organizational challenges associated with our size; consolidation in the industries that we serve could adversely affect our business; our ability to attract and retain business may depend on our reputation in the marketplace; our share price could fluctuate due to numerous factors, including variability in revenues, operating results and profitability; as well as the risks, uncertainties and other factors discussed under the Risk Factors heading in our most recent annual report on Form 10-K and other documents filed with or furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission. Statements in this news release speak only as of the date they were made, and Accenture undertakes no duty to update any forward-looking statements made in this news release or to conform such statements to actual results or changes in Accenture's expectations.
High-resolution, publication-ready photos of Pierre Nanterme and William D. Green are available for editorial use at: http://newsroom.accenture.com/photo.
PHOTOS AVAILABLE:
Contact:
Fred Hawrysh
Accenture
+1 (917) 452-4398
fred.hawrysh@accenture.com
Alex Pachetti
Accenture
+1 (917) 452-5519
alex.pachetti@accenture.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ACN/ACN-8K-20101123162933.txt.gz
TIME:20101123162933
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
As reported on a Form 8-K filed by Accenture plc (the "Company") on October 21, 2010, Pierre Nanterme has been appointed as the Company's Chief Executive Officer, effective January 1, 2011, and William D. Green, currently Chairman of the Board of Directors & Chief Executive Officer, will leave the position of Chief Executive Officer effective January 1, 2011 but will continue to serve as Chairman of the Company's Board of Directors.
On November 23, 2010, the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of the Company (the "Committee") approved the compensation for Mr. Nanterme in his new role. Mr. Nanterme's cash compensation will be composed of a base salary, effective January 1, 2011, of approximately $1,200,000; a target annual bonus for fiscal 2011 of approximately $700,000 (with a maximum of approximately $1,056,000); and a target individual performance bonus for fiscal 2011 of approximately $1,600,000 (with a maximum of approximately $2,880,000), each to be paid in Euros. In addition, the Committee approved equity awards totaling $5,225,000, composed of a target number of restricted share units ("RSUs") with a fair market value of $3,000,000 as of the date of grant (with a maximum number of RSUs equal to 150% of that number) under the Company's Key Executive Performance Share Program; RSUs with a fair market value of $2,000,000 as of the date of grant under the Company's Senior Officer Performance Equity Award Program; and RSUs with a fair market value of $225,000 under the Company's Performance Equity Award Program, each to be granted in January 2011.
On November 23, 2010, the Committee also approved the compensation for Mr. Green effective January 1, 2011. Mr. Green's cash compensation will be composed of a base salary, which will remain at $1,250,000; a target annual bonus for fiscal 2011 of $500,000 (with a maximum of approximately $750,000); and a target individual performance bonus for fiscal 2011 of $1,125,000 (with a maximum of approximately $2,025,000). In addition, the Committee approved equity awards totaling $12,125,000, composed of a target number of RSUs with a fair market value of $6,625,000 as of the date of grant (with a maximum number of RSUs equal to 150% of that number) under the Company's Key Executive Performance Share Program and RSUs with a fair market value of $5,500,000 as of the date of grant under the Company's Senior Officer Performance Equity Award Program, each to be granted in January 2011.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ACN/ACN-8K-20101216160537.txt.gz
TIME:20101216160537
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition
On December 16, 2010, Accenture issued a press release announcing financial results for its first quarter of fiscal year 2011, which fiscal quarter ended on November 30, 2010.
A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1. All information in the press release is furnished but not filed.
Non-GAAP Financial Information
In the attached press release Accenture discloses the following non-GAAP financial measures:
 
 
Reconciliations of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable financial measures calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP are included in the press release. While Accenture's management believes that this non-GAAP financial information is useful in evaluating Accenture's operations, this information should be considered as supplemental in nature and not as a substitute for the related financial information prepared in accordance with GAAP.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
NEW YORK; Dec. 16, 2010  Accenture (NYSE: ACN) reported strong financial results for the first quarter of fiscal 2011, ended Nov. 30, 2010, with net revenues of $6.05 billion, an increase of 12 percent in U.S. dollars and 14 percent in local currency over the same period last year and exceeding the company's guided range of $5.6 billion to $5.8 billion. Diluted earnings per share were $0.81, an increase of $0.14, or 20 percent, over the same period last year.
Operating income was $827 million, an increase of 11 percent over the same period last year, and operating margin was 13.7 percent.
New bookings for the quarter were $6.31 billion, with consulting bookings of $3.72 billion and outsourcing bookings of $2.59 billion.
William D. Green, Accenture's chairman & CEO, said, "We are delighted with our exceptional top- and bottom-line results in the first quarter, which demonstrate not only continued, but increasing, momentum across our business. We delivered very strong revenue growth  including double-digit local-currency growth in four of our five operating groups  as well as 20 percent EPS growth.
"We continue to see strong demand for our services, demonstrated by bookings of more than $6.3 billion in the quarter, including our highest consulting bookings in more than two years. Accenture continues on a solid growth trajectory; we've raised our revenue outlook for the full year and are well positioned for the future. We remain focused on driving the business to capture growth and market share  and to deliver strong results for our clients and our shareholders alike."
Financial Review
Revenues before reimbursements ("net revenues") for the first quarter of fiscal 2011 were $6.05 billion, compared with $5.38 billion in the first quarter of fiscal 2010, an increase of 12 percent in U.S. dollars and 14 percent in local currency. Net revenues for the first quarter of fiscal 2011 exceeded the company's guided range of $5.6 billion to $5.8 billion, which assumed a foreign-exchange impact of negative 3 percent. Adjusting for the actual foreign-exchange impact of negative 1 percent in the first quarter, the Company's previously guided range for quarterly net revenues would have been $5.7 billion to $5.9 billion. Net revenues of $6.05 billion for the quarter also exceeded this adjusted range.
 
 
Diluted EPS for the quarter were $0.81, an increase of $0.14, or 20 percent, compared with the first quarter of fiscal 2010. The components of the increase were:
 
offset by:
 
Operating income for the quarter was $827 million, or 13.7 percent of net revenues, compared with $746 million, or 13.9 percent of net revenues, for the first quarter of fiscal 2010.
Gross margin (gross profit as a percentage of net revenues) for the quarter was 32.2 percent, compared with 33.1 percent for the first quarter last year. The change in gross margin as a percentage of net revenues compared with the first quarter last year reflects the return of strong growth in the business, which resulted in higher subcontractor costs and in higher recruiting and training costs from the addition of new employees to meet demand. Gross margin for the first quarter of fiscal 2011 also includes the impact of higher annual compensation increases that were effective at the beginning of the quarter.
Selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses for the first quarter were $1.12 billion, or 18.5 percent of net revenues, compared with $1.03 billion, or 19.2 percent of net revenues, for the first quarter last year. Sales and marketing costs as a percentage of net revenues increased 50 basis points. General and administrative costs as a percentage of net revenues decreased 130 basis points, with 50 basis points of the decrease due to a reduction in the company's bad debt reserve.
The company's effective tax rate for the quarter was 28.3 percent, compared with 30.5 percent for the first quarter last year. The lower rate in the first quarter of fiscal 2011 was due to a number of factors that affect the geographic distribution of income.
Net income for the quarter was $606 million, compared with $525 million for the same period of fiscal 2010, an increase of 15 percent.
Operating cash flow for the quarter was $106 million, and property and equipment additions were $75 million. Free cash flow, defined as operating cash flow net of property and equipment additions, was $31 million. For the same period last year, operating cash flow was $219 million; property and equipment additions were $35 million; and free cash flow was $184 million. In addition to the higher property and equipment additions in the first quarter of fiscal 2011, the reduction in free cash flow compared with the first quarter last year reflects an increase in working capital as the company's revenue grew during the quarter.
Days services outstanding, or DSOs, were 33 days, compared with 30 days at Aug. 31, 2010 and 32 days at Nov. 30, 2009.
Accenture's total cash balance at Nov. 30, 2010 was $4.16 billion, compared with $4.84 billion at Aug. 31, 2010.
Utilization for the quarter was 87 percent, compared with 86 percent for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2010 and 88 percent for the first quarter of fiscal 2010. Attrition for the first quarter of fiscal 2011 was 15 percent, compared with 17 percent for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2010 and 12 percent for the first quarter of fiscal 2010.
New Bookings
New bookings for the first quarter were $6.31 billion and reflect a negative 1 percent foreign-currency impact when compared to new bookings in the first quarter last year.
 
 
Net Revenues by Operating Group
Four of the five operating groups achieved double-digit revenue growth in both U.S. dollars and local currency compared with the first quarter last year. Net revenues by operating group were as follows:
 
 
 
 
 
Net Revenues by Geographic Region
Net revenues by geographic region for the first quarter were as follows:
 
 
 
Returning Cash to Shareholders
Accenture continues to return cash to shareholders through cash dividends and share repurchases.
Dividend
On Nov. 15, 2010, a semi-annual cash dividend of $0.45 per share was paid to Accenture plc Class A ordinary shareholders of record at the close of business on Oct. 15, 2010 and to Accenture SCA Class I common shareholders of record at the close of business on Oct. 12, 2010. These cash dividend payments totaled $321 million.
Share Repurchase Activity
During the first quarter of fiscal 2011, Accenture repurchased or redeemed 14.6 million shares for a total of $620 million, including 3.2 million shares repurchased in the open market. Accenture's total remaining share repurchase authority at Nov. 30, 2010, was approximately $2.5 billion.
At Nov. 30, 2010, Accenture had approximately 711 million total shares outstanding, including 639 million Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares and 72 million Accenture SCA Class I common shares and Accenture Canada Holding, Inc. exchangeable shares.
Business Outlook
Second Quarter Fiscal 2011
Accenture expects net revenues for the second quarter of fiscal 2011 to be in the range of $5.6 billion to $5.8 billion. This range assumes a foreign-exchange impact of negative 2 percent compared with the second quarter of fiscal 2010.
Full Fiscal Year 2011
Accenture's business outlook for the full 2011 fiscal year now assumes a foreign-exchange impact of zero percent compared with fiscal 2010. The annual business outlook provided in the company's fourth-quarter fiscal 2010 earnings announcement in September assumed a foreign-exchange impact of negative 1 percent for the full fiscal year.
For fiscal 2011, the company has raised its outlook for net revenue growth to the range of 8 percent to 11 percent in local currency from its previous range of 7 percent to 10 percent in local currency. The company has also raised its outlook for diluted EPS to the range of $3.08 to $3.16 from its previous range of $3.00 to $3.08.
Accenture continues to expect operating margin for the full fiscal year to be in the range of 13.6 percent to 13.7 percent.
The company continues to expect operating cash flow to be $2.7 billion to $2.9 billion; property and equipment additions to be $340 million; and free cash flow to be in the range of $2.4 billion to $2.6 billion. The company continues to expect its annual effective tax rate to be in the range of 28 percent to 29 percent.
Accenture continues to target new bookings for fiscal 2011 in the range of $25 billion to $28 billion.
Conference Call and Webcast Details
Accenture will host a conference call at 4:30 p.m. EST today to discuss its first-quarter fiscal 2011 financial results. To participate, please dial +1 (800) 230-1059 +1 (612) 332-0226 outside the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada approximately 15 minutes before the scheduled start of the call. The conference call will also be accessible live on the Investor Relations section of the Accenture Web site at www.accenture.com.
A replay of the conference call will be available online at www.accenture.com beginning at 7:00 p.m. EST today, Thursday, Dec. 16, and continuing until Wednesday, March 23, 2011. A podcast of the conference call will be available online at www.accenture.com beginning approximately 24 hours after the call and continuing until Wednesday, March 23, 2011. The replay will also be available via telephone by dialing +1 (800) 475-6701 +1 (320) 365-3844 outside the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada and entering access code 178235 from 7:00 p.m. EST Thursday, Dec. 16 through Wednesday, March 23, 2011.
About Accenture
Accenture is a global management consulting, technology services and outsourcing company, with approximately 211,000 people serving clients in more than 120 countries. Combining unparalleled experience, comprehensive capabilities across all industries and business functions, and extensive research on the world's most successful companies, Accenture collaborates with clients to help them become high-performance businesses and governments. The company generated net revenues of US$21.6 billion for the fiscal year ended Aug. 31, 2010. Its home page is www.accenture.com.
Non-GAAP Financial Information
This press release includes certain non-GAAP financial information as defined by Securities and Exchange Commission Regulation G. Pursuant to the requirements of this regulation, reconciliations of this non-GAAP financial information to Accenture's financial statements as prepared under generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) are included in this press release. Financial results "in local currency" are calculated by restating current-period activity into U.S. dollars using the comparable prior-year period's foreign-currency exchange rates. Accenture's management believes providing investors with this information gives additional insights into Accenture's results of operations. While Accenture's management believes that these non-GAAP financial measures are useful in evaluating Accenture's operations, this information should be considered as supplemental in nature and not as a substitute for the related financial information prepared in accordance with GAAP.
Forward-Looking Statements
Except for the historical information and discussions contained herein, statements in this news release may constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve a number of risks, uncertainties and other factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed or implied. These include, without limitation, risks that: the company's results of operations could be adversely affected by negative or uncertain economic conditions and the effects of these conditions on the company's clients' businesses and levels of business activity; the company's results of operations and ability to grow could be materially negatively affected if the company cannot adapt and expand its services and solutions in response to changes in technology and client demand; the consulting and outsourcing markets are highly competitive and the company might not be able to compete effectively; work with government clients exposes the company to additional risks inherent in the government contracting environment; clients may not be satisfied with the company's services; results of operations could be materially adversely affected if clients terminate their contracts with the company; outsourcing services are a significant part of the company's business and subject the company to additional operational and financial risk; results of operations could materially suffer if the company is not able to obtain favorable pricing; if the company is unable to keep its supply of skills and resources in balance with client demand around the world, the company's business, the utilization rate of the company's professionals and the company's results of operations may be materially adversely affected; the company's business could be materially adversely affected if it incurs legal liability in connection with providing its services and solutions; if the company's pricing estimates do not accurately anticipate the cost and complexity of performing work, then the company's contracts could be unprofitable; many of the company's contracts include performance payments that link some of the company's fees to the attainment of performance or business targets and this could increase the variability of the company's revenues and margins; the company's ability to attract and retain business may depend on its reputation in the marketplace; the company's alliance relationships may not be successful or may change, which could adversely affect the company's results of operations; the company's Global Delivery Network is increasingly concentrated in India and the Philippines, which may expose it to operational risks; as a result of the company's geographically diverse operations and its growth strategy to continue geographic expansion, the company is more susceptible to certain risks; revenues, revenue growth and earnings in U.S. dollars may be lower if the U.S. dollar strengthens against other currencies, particularly the Euro and British pound; the company could have liability or the company's reputation could be damaged if the company fails to protect client data and company data or information systems as obligated by law or contract or if the company's information systems are breached; the company could be subject to liabilities or damage to its relationships with clients if subcontractors or the third parties with whom the company partners cannot meet their commitments on time or at all; the company's services or solutions could infringe upon the intellectual property rights of others or the company might lose its ability to utilize the intellectual property of others; the company has only a limited ability to protect its intellectual property rights, which are important to the company's success; changes in the company's level of taxes, and audits, investigations and tax proceedings, could have a material adverse effect on the company's results of operations and financial condition; the company's profitability could suffer if its cost-management strategies are unsuccessful; if the company is unable to collect its receivables or unbilled services, the company's results of operations, financial condition and cash flows could be adversely affected; the company may be subject to criticism, negative publicity
and legislative or regulatory action related to its incorporation in Ireland; if the company is unable to manage the organizational challenges associated with its size, the company might be unable to achieve its business objectives; the company may not be successful at identifying, acquiring or integrating other businesses; consolidation in the industries the company serves could adversely affect its business; the company's share price could fluctuate and be difficult to predict; as well as the risks, uncertainties and other factors discussed under the "Risk Factors" heading in Accenture plc's most recent annual report on Form 10-K and other documents filed with or furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission. Statements in this news release speak only as of the date they were made, and Accenture undertakes no duty to update any forward-looking statements made in this news release or to conform such statements to actual results or changes in Accenture's expectations.
Contact:
Roxanne Taylor
Accenture
+1 (917) 452-5106
roxanne.taylor@accenture.com
 
 
 
 
n/m = not meaningful
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ACN/ACN-8K-20110120163736.txt.gz
TIME:20110120163736
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On January 20, 2011, Accenture plc issued a press release announcing certain leadership changes, including the retirement of Mark Foster, group chief executiveGlobal Markets & Management Consulting. Mr. Foster's retirement will take effect on March 1, 2011.
A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) Exhibits
99.1 Press Release, dated January 20, 2011
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
NEW YORK; January 20, 2011 Accenture (NYSE: ACN) today announced the following changes to its executive leadership, effective March 1:
 
 
 
"Sander, Jean-Marc and Shawn bring significant expertise and skills to their new roles. They all have outstanding leadership experience with Accenture, track records of success, and strong commitment to providing the highest level of service to our clients," said Pierre Nanterme, Accenture's chief executive officer. "I look forward to working closely with them as we accelerate the execution of our growth strategy, while delivering value to our clients and shareholders.
"On behalf of Accenture, I want to recognize both Mark and Karl-Heinz for their significant accomplishments and thank them for their many years of service to the company. Each has demonstrated true dedication and commitment to the success of our company and our clients."
 
About Accenture
Accenture is a global management consulting, technology services and outsourcing company, with approximately 211,000 people serving clients in more than 120 countries. Combining unparalleled experience, comprehensive capabilities across all industries and business functions, and extensive research on the world's most successful companies, Accenture collaborates with clients to help them become high-performance businesses and governments. The company generated net revenues of US$21.6 billion for the fiscal year ended Aug. 31, 2010. Its home page is .
www.accenture.com
Contact:
Fred Hawrysh
Accenture
+1 (917) 452-4398
fred.hawrysh@accenture.com
Alex Pachetti
Accenture
+1 (917) 452-5519
alex.pachetti@accenture.com
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ACN/ACN-8K-20110204160153.txt.gz
TIME:20110204160153
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On February 3, 2011, Accenture plc ("Accenture") held its 2011 annual general meeting of shareholders (the "Annual Meeting") as described in Accenture's definitive Proxy Statement for the Annual Meeting filed on December 20, 2010. A quorum was present at the meeting as required by Accenture's Articles of Association. The immediately following chart sets forth the number of votes cast for and against, and the number of abstention votes and broker non-votes, with respect to each matter voted upon by the shareholders:
 
Additionally, set forth below are the voting results on the following matter:
 
In light of the voting results with respect to the frequency of shareholder votes on executive compensation, Accenture's Board of Directors has decided that Accenture will hold an annual advisory vote on the compensation of named executive officers until the next required vote on the frequency of shareholder votes on the compensation of executives. Accenture is required to hold votes on frequency every six years.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ACN/ACN-8K-20110324160946.txt.gz
TIME:20110324160946
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition
On March 24, 2011, Accenture issued a press release announcing financial results for its second quarter of fiscal year 2011, which second quarter ended on February 28, 2011.
A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1. All information in the press release is furnished but not filed.
Non-GAAP Financial Information
In the attached press release Accenture discloses the following non-GAAP financial measures:
 
 
Reconciliations of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable financial measures calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP are included in the press release. While Accenture's management believes that this non-GAAP financial information is useful in evaluating Accenture's operations, this information should be considered as supplemental in nature and not as a substitute for the related financial information prepared in accordance with GAAP.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
NEW YORK; March 24, 2011  Accenture (NYSE: ACN) reported strong financial results for the second quarter of fiscal 2011, ended Feb. 28, 2011, with net revenues of $6.05 billion, an increase of 17 percent in U.S. dollars and 18 percent in local currency over the same period last year and exceeding the company's guided range of $5.6 billion to $5.8 billion. Diluted earnings per share were $0.75, an increase of $0.15, or 25 percent, over the same period last year.
Operating income was $772 million, an increase of 19 percent over the same period last year, and operating margin was 12.7 percent.
New bookings for the quarter were $6.98 billion, with consulting bookings of $3.80 billion and outsourcing bookings of $3.18 billion.
In addition, Accenture's Board of Directors has declared a semi-annual cash dividend of $0.45 per share, to be paid on May 13, 2011.
Pierre Nanterme, Accenture's chief executive officer, said, "We are very pleased with the continued momentum in our business, which enabled us to achieve strong results in the second quarter. We saw very strong revenue growth in both U.S. dollars and local currency across our operating groups and geographic regions. We also achieved significant EPS growth of 25 percent, and we continue to maintain an exceptionally strong balance sheet.
"With quarterly bookings of $7 billion, including our second-highest consulting bookings ever, demand for our services remains strong, and our growth trajectory demonstrates that we continue to execute our business strategy extremely well. We remain focused on growing market share and, as always, on delivering value to our clients as well as our shareholders."
Financial Review
Revenues before reimbursements ("net revenues") for the second quarter of fiscal 2011 were $6.05 billion, compared with $5.18 billion in the second quarter of fiscal 2010, an increase of 17 percent in U.S. dollars and 18 percent in local currency. Net revenues for the second quarter of fiscal 2011 exceeded the company's guided range of $5.6 billion to $5.8 billion, which assumed a foreign-exchange impact of negative 2 percent. Adjusting for the actual foreign-exchange impact of negative 1 percent in the second quarter, the Company's guided range for
quarterly net revenues would have been $5.65 billion to $5.85 billion. Net revenues of $6.05 billion for the quarter also exceeded this adjusted range.
 
 
Diluted EPS for the quarter were $0.75, an increase of $0.15, or 25 percent, compared with the second quarter of fiscal 2010. The components of the increase were:
 
offset by:
 
Operating income for the quarter was $772 million, or 12.7 percent of net revenues, compared with $651 million, or 12.6 percent of net revenues, for the second quarter of fiscal 2010, an expansion of 10 basis points over the second quarter last year.
Gross margin (gross profit as a percentage of net revenues) for the quarter was 31.7 percent, compared with 32.7 percent for the second quarter last year. The change in gross margin as a percentage of net revenues compared with the second quarter last year reflects the impact of the return of strong growth in the business, which resulted in higher annual compensation increases, higher subcontractor costs, and higher recruiting and training costs from the addition of a larger number of new employees to meet demand.
Selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses for the second quarter were $1.15 billion, or 18.9 percent of net revenues, compared with $1.04 billion, or 20.0 percent of net revenues, for the second quarter last year.
The company's effective tax rate for the quarter was 26.9 percent, compared with 27.8 percent for the second quarter last year. The lower rate in the second quarter of fiscal 2011 was due to a number of factors that affect the geographic distribution of income.
Net income for the quarter was $566 million, compared with $462 million for the same period of fiscal 2010, an increase of 22 percent.
Operating cash flow for the quarter was $601 million, and property and equipment additions were $79 million. Free cash flow, defined as operating cash flow net of property and equipment additions, rounded to $523 million. For the same period last year, operating cash flow was $660 million; property and equipment additions were $44 million; and free cash flow was $616 million.
Days services outstanding, or DSOs, were 32 days at Feb. 28, 2011, compared with 30 days at Aug. 31, 2010.
Accenture's total cash balance at Feb. 28, 2011 was $4.68 billion, compared with $4.84 billion at Aug. 31, 2010.
Utilization for the quarter was 86 percent, compared with 88 percent for the second quarter of fiscal 2010. Attrition for the second quarter of fiscal 2011 was 14 percent, compared with 15 percent for the second quarter of fiscal 2010.
New Bookings
New bookings for the second quarter were $6.98 billion and reflect a negative 1 percent foreign-currency impact compared with new bookings in the second quarter last year.
 
 
Net Revenues by Operating Group
Net revenues by operating group were as follows:
 
 
 
 
 
Net Revenues by Geographic Region
Net revenues by geographic region for the second quarter were as follows:
 
 
 
Returning Cash to Shareholders
Accenture continues to return cash to shareholders through cash dividends and share repurchases.
Dividend
Accenture plc has declared a semi-annual cash dividend of $0.45 per share on Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares for shareholders of record at the close of business on April 15, 2011, and Accenture SCA will declare a semi-annual cash dividend of $0.45 per share on Accenture SCA Class I common shares for shareholders of record at the close of business on April 12, 2011. These dividends are both payable on May 13, 2011.
Combined with the semi-annual cash dividend of $0.45 per share paid on Nov. 15, 2010, this brings the total dividend payments for the fiscal year to $0.90 per share, for total projected cash dividend payments of approximately $640 million.
Share Repurchase Activity
During the second quarter of fiscal 2011, Accenture repurchased or redeemed 3.6 million shares for a total of $177 million, including 0.1 million shares repurchased in the open market. This brings Accenture's total share repurchases and redemptions for the first half of fiscal 2011 to 18.3 million shares, for a total of $797 million, including 3.3 million shares repurchased in the open market.
Accenture's total remaining share repurchase authority at Feb. 28, 2011, was approximately $2.4 billion.
At Feb. 28, 2011, Accenture had approximately 716 million total shares outstanding, including 649 million Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares and 67 million Accenture SCA Class I common shares and Accenture Canada Holding, Inc. exchangeable shares.
Business Outlook
Third Quarter Fiscal 2011
Accenture expects net revenues for the third quarter of fiscal 2011 to be in the range of $6.3 billion to $6.5 billion. This range assumes a foreign-exchange impact of positive 4 percent compared with the third quarter of fiscal 2010.
Full Fiscal Year 2011
Accenture's business outlook for the full 2011 fiscal year now assumes a foreign-exchange impact of positive 2 percent compared with fiscal 2010. The annual business outlook provided in the company's first-quarter fiscal 2011 earnings announcement in December assumed a foreign-exchange impact of zero percent for the full fiscal year.
For fiscal 2011, the company has raised its outlook for net revenue growth to the range of 11 percent to 14 percent in local currency from its previous range of 8 percent to 11 percent in local currency. The company has also raised its outlook for diluted EPS to the range of $3.22 to $3.30 from its previous range of $3.08 to $3.16.
Accenture continues to expect operating margin for the full fiscal year to be in the range of 13.6 percent to 13.7 percent.
The company now expects operating cash flow to be $2.8 billion to $3.0 billion; now expects property and equipment additions to be $420 million; and continues to expect free cash flow to be in the range of $2.4 billion to $2.6 billion. The company continues to expect its annual effective tax rate to be in the range of 28 percent to 29 percent.
Accenture continues to target new bookings for fiscal 2011 in the range of $25 billion to $28 billion.
Conference Call and Webcast Details
Accenture will host a conference call at 4:30 p.m. EDT today to discuss its second-quarter fiscal 2011 financial results. To participate, please dial +1 (800) 230-1059 [+1 (612) 288-0337 outside the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada] approximately 15 minutes before the scheduled start of the call. The conference call will also be accessible live on the Investor Relations section of the Accenture Web site at www.accenture.com.
A replay of the conference call will be available online at www.accenture.com beginning at 7:00 p.m. EDT on Thursday, March 24, and continuing until Wednesday, June 22, 2011. A podcast of the conference call will be available online at www.accenture.com beginning approximately 24 hours after the call and continuing until Wednesday, June 22. The replay will also be available via telephone by dialing +1 (800) 475-6701 [+1 (320) 365-3844 outside the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada] and entering access code 192444 from 7:00 p.m. EDT Thursday, March 24 through Wednesday, June 22.
About Accenture
Accenture is a global management consulting, technology services and outsourcing company, with more than 215,000 people serving clients in more than 120 countries. Combining unparalleled experience, comprehensive capabilities across all industries and business functions, and extensive research on the world's most successful companies, Accenture collaborates with clients to help them become high-performance businesses and governments. The company generated net revenues of US$21.6 billion for the fiscal year ended Aug. 31, 2010. Its home page is www.accenture.com.
Non-GAAP Financial Information
This press release includes certain non-GAAP financial information as defined by Securities and Exchange Commission Regulation G. Pursuant to the requirements of this regulation, reconciliations of this non-GAAP financial information to Accenture's financial statements as prepared under generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) are included in this press release. Financial results "in local currency" are calculated by restating current-period activity into U.S. dollars using the comparable prior-year period's foreign-currency exchange rates. Accenture's management believes providing investors with this information gives additional insights into Accenture's results of operations. While Accenture's management believes that these non-GAAP financial measures are useful in evaluating Accenture's operations, this information should be considered as supplemental in nature and not as a substitute for the related financial information prepared in accordance with GAAP.
Forward-Looking Statements
Except for the historical information and discussions contained herein, statements in this news release may constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve a number of risks, uncertainties and other factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed or implied. These include, without limitation, risks that: the company's results of operations could be adversely affected by negative or uncertain economic or geopolitical conditions and the effects of these conditions on the company's clients' businesses and levels of business activity; the company's results of operations and ability to grow could be materially negatively affected if the company cannot adapt and expand its services and solutions in response to changes in technology and client demand; the consulting and outsourcing markets are highly competitive and the company might not be able to compete effectively; work with government clients exposes the company to additional risks inherent in the government contracting environment, including risks related to the U.S. Federal budget; clients may not be satisfied with the company's services; results of operations could be materially adversely affected if clients terminate their contracts with the company; outsourcing services are a significant part of the company's business and subject the company to additional operational and financial risk; results of operations could materially suffer if the company is not able to obtain favorable pricing; if the company is unable to keep its supply of skills and resources in balance with client demand around the world, the company's business, the utilization rate of the company's professionals and the company's results of operations may be materially adversely affected; the company's business could be materially adversely affected if it incurs legal liability in connection with providing its services and solutions; if the company's pricing estimates do not accurately anticipate the cost and complexity of performing work, then the company's contracts could be unprofitable; many of the company's contracts include performance payments that link some of the company's fees to the attainment of performance or business targets and this could increase the variability of the company's revenues and margins; the company's ability to attract and retain business may depend on its reputation in the marketplace; the company's alliance relationships may not be successful or may change, which could adversely affect the company's results of operations; the company's Global Delivery Network is increasingly concentrated in India and the Philippines, which may expose it to operational risks; as a result of the company's geographically diverse operations and its growth strategy to continue geographic expansion, the company is more susceptible to certain risks; revenues, revenue growth and earnings in U.S. dollars may be lower if the U.S. dollar strengthens against other currencies, particularly the Euro and British pound; the company could have liability or the company's reputation could be damaged if the company fails to protect client data and company data or information systems as obligated by law or contract or if
the company's information systems are breached; the company could be subject to liabilities or damage to its relationships with clients if subcontractors or the third parties with whom the company partners cannot meet their commitments on time or at all; the company's services or solutions could infringe upon the intellectual property rights of others or the company might lose its ability to utilize the intellectual property of others; the company has only a limited ability to protect its intellectual property rights, which are important to the company's success; changes in the company's level of taxes, and audits, investigations and tax proceedings, could have a material adverse effect on the company's results of operations and financial condition; the company's profitability could suffer if its cost-management strategies are unsuccessful; if the company is unable to collect its receivables or unbilled services, the company's results of operations, financial condition and cash flows could be adversely affected; the company may be subject to criticism, negative publicity and legislative or regulatory action related to its incorporation in Ireland; if the company is unable to manage the organizational challenges associated with its size, the company might be unable to achieve its business objectives; the company may not be successful at identifying, acquiring or integrating other businesses; consolidation in the industries the company serves could adversely affect its business; the company's share price could fluctuate and be difficult to predict; as well as the risks, uncertainties and other factors discussed under the "Risk Factors" heading in Accenture plc's most recent annual report on Form 10-K and other documents filed with or furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission. Statements in this news release speak only as of the date they were made, and Accenture undertakes no duty to update any forward-looking statements made in this news release or to conform such statements to actual results or changes in Accenture's expectations.
Contact:
Fred Hawrysh
Accenture
+1 (917) 452-4398
fred.hawrysh@accenture.com
Alex Pachetti
Accenture
+1 (917) 452-5519
alex.pachetti@accenture.com
 
 
 
 
n/m = not meaningful


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ACN/ACN-8K-20110623160639.txt.gz
TIME:20110623160639
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition
On June 23, 2011, Accenture issued a press release announcing financial results for its third quarter of fiscal year 2011, which third quarter ended on May 31, 2011.
A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1. All information in the press release is furnished but not filed.
Non-GAAP Financial Information
In the attached press release Accenture discloses the following non-GAAP financial measures:
 
 
Reconciliations of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable financial measures calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP are included in the press release. While Accenture's management believes that this non-GAAP financial information is useful in evaluating Accenture's operations, this information should be considered as supplemental in nature and not as a substitute for the related financial information prepared in accordance with GAAP.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
NEW YORK; June 23, 2011  Accenture (NYSE: ACN) reported strong financial results for the third quarter of fiscal 2011, ended May 31, 2011, with net revenues of $6.7 billion, an increase of 21 percent in U.S. dollars and 15 percent in local currency over the same period last year. Diluted earnings per share were $0.93, an increase of $0.20, or 27 percent, over the same period last year.
Operating income was $949 million, an increase of 18 percent over the same period last year, and operating margin was 14.1 percent.
New bookings for the quarter were $7.1 billion, with consulting bookings of $3.7 billion and outsourcing bookings of $3.4 billion.
Pierre Nanterme, Accenture's chief executive officer, said, "We are very pleased with our third-quarter results. The continued momentum in our business and the focused execution of our growth strategy enabled us to achieve our highest quarterly revenues ever, of more than $6.7 billion. Four of our five operating groups, and all three geographic regions, saw double-digit revenue growth in both U.S. dollars and local currency. We also achieved record quarterly EPS of $0.93, and we have a very strong balance sheet.
"We continue to gain market share, and demand for our services remains robust, as demonstrated by third-quarter bookings in excess of $7 billion. Our focus remains on driving sustainable and profitable growth through technology leadership and industry differentiation, and delivering superior value to our clients and shareholders."
Financial Review
Revenues before reimbursements ("net revenues") for the third quarter of fiscal 2011 were $6.7 billion, compared with $5.6 billion in the third quarter of fiscal 2010, an increase of 21 percent in U.S. dollars and 15 percent in local currency. Net revenues for the third quarter of fiscal 2011 exceeded the company's guided range of $6.3 billion to $6.5 billion, which assumed a foreign-exchange impact of positive 4 percent. Adjusting for the actual foreign-exchange impact of positive 6 percent in the third quarter, the Company's guided range for quarterly net revenues would have been $6.4 billion to $6.6 billion. Net revenues of $6.7 billion for the quarter also exceeded this adjusted range.
 
Diluted EPS for the quarter were $0.93, an increase of $0.20, or 27 percent, compared with the third quarter of fiscal 2010. The components of the increase were:
 
Operating income for the quarter was $949 million, or 14.1 percent of net revenues, compared with $804 million, or 14.4 percent of net revenues, for the third quarter of fiscal 2010.
Gross margin (gross profit as a percentage of net revenues) for the quarter was 34.4 percent, compared with 34.7 percent for the third quarter last year.
Selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses for the third quarter were $1.36 billion, or 20.2 percent of net revenues, compared with $1.12 billion, or 20.2 percent of net revenues, for the third quarter last year. Sales and marketing costs as a percentage of net revenues decreased 40 basis points. General and administrative costs as a percentage of net revenues increased 40 basis points and included a $75 million provision for litigation matters (an impact of 110 basis points), partially offset by management of other general and administrative costs at a growth rate lower than that of net revenues.
The company's effective tax rate for the quarter was 27.0 percent, compared with 29.8 percent for the third quarter last year. The lower rate in the third quarter of fiscal 2011 was primarily due to a number of factors that affect the geographic mix of income, partially offset by a net increase in reserves related to ongoing tax audits.
Net income for the quarter was $699 million, compared with $564 million for the same period of fiscal 2010, an increase of 24 percent.
Operating cash flow for the quarter was $1.35 billion, and property and equipment additions were $113 million. Free cash flow, defined as operating cash flow net of property and equipment additions, was $1.24 billion. For the same period last year, operating cash flow was $961 million; property and equipment additions were $58 million; and free cash flow was $903 million.
Days services outstanding, or DSOs, were 32 days at May 31, 2011, compared with 30 days at Aug. 31, 2010.
Accenture's total cash balance at May 31, 2011 was $5.3 billion, compared with $4.8 billion at Aug. 31, 2010.
Utilization for the quarter was 85 percent. Attrition for the quarter was 15 percent, compared with 17 percent for the third quarter last year.
New Bookings
New bookings for the third quarter were $7.1 billion and reflect a positive 6 percent foreign-currency impact compared with new bookings in the third quarter last year.
 
 
Net Revenues by Operating Group
Net revenues by operating group were as follows:
 
 
 
 
 
Net Revenues by Geographic Region
Net revenues by geographic region for the third quarter were as follows:
 
 
Returning Cash to Shareholders
Accenture continues to return cash to shareholders through cash dividends and share repurchases.
Dividend
On May 13, 2011, a semi-annual cash dividend of $0.45 per share was paid on Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares to shareholders of record at the close of business on April 15, 2011 and on Accenture SCA Class I common shares to shareholders of record at the close of business on April 12, 2011.
Combined with the semi-annual cash dividend of $0.45 per share paid on Nov. 15, 2010, this brings the total dividend payments for the fiscal year to $0.90 per share, for total cash dividend payments of $644 million.
Share Repurchase Activity
During the third quarter of fiscal 2011, Accenture repurchased or redeemed 11.4 million shares for a total of $644 million, including 9.7 million shares repurchased in the open market. This brings Accenture's total share repurchases and redemptions for the first three quarters of fiscal 2011 to 29.7 million shares, including 13.1 million shares repurchased in the open market, for a total of approximately $1.4 billion.
Accenture's total remaining share repurchase authority at May 31, 2011, was approximately $1.7 billion.
At May 31, 2011, Accenture had approximately 711 million total shares outstanding, including 646 million Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares and 65 million Accenture SCA Class I common shares and Accenture Canada Holding, Inc. exchangeable shares.
Business Outlook
Fourth Quarter Fiscal 2011
Accenture expects net revenues for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2011 to be in the range of $6.4 billion to $6.6 billion. This range assumes a foreign-exchange impact of positive 8 percent compared with the fourth quarter of fiscal 2010.
Full Fiscal Year 2011
Accenture's business outlook for the full 2011 fiscal year now assumes a foreign-exchange impact of positive 3 percent compared with fiscal 2010. The annual business outlook provided in the company's second-quarter fiscal 2011 earnings announcement in March assumed a foreign-exchange impact of positive 2 percent for the full fiscal year.
For fiscal 2011, the company has raised its outlook for net revenue growth to the range of 14 percent to 15 percent in local currency from its previous range of 11 percent to 14 percent in local currency. The company has also raised its outlook for annual diluted EPS to the range of $3.36 to $3.40 from its previous range of $3.22 to $3.30.
Accenture continues to expect operating margin for the full fiscal year to be in the range of 13.6 percent to 13.7 percent.
The company now expects operating cash flow to be in the range of $2.9 billion to $3.1 billion; now expects property and equipment additions to be $400 million; and now expects free cash flow to be in the range of $2.5 billion to $2.7 billion. The company now expects its annual effective tax rate to be in the range of 27 percent to 28 percent.
Accenture now expects new bookings to be at the upper end of its previously guided range of $25 billion to $28 billion for the full fiscal year.
Conference Call and Webcast Details
Accenture will host a conference call at 4:30 p.m. EDT today to discuss its third-quarter fiscal 2011 financial results. To participate, please dial +1 (800) 230-1085 [+1 (612) 288-0329 outside the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada] approximately 15 minutes before the scheduled start of the call. The conference call will also be accessible live on the Investor Relations section of the Accenture Web site at www.accenture.com.
A replay of the conference call will be available online at www.accenture.com beginning at 7:00 p.m. EDT today, Thursday, June 23, and continuing until Monday, Sept. 26, 2011. A podcast of the conference call will be available online at www.accenture.com beginning approximately 24 hours after the call and continuing until Monday, Sept. 26. The replay will also be available via telephone by dialing +1 (800) 475-6701 [+1 (320) 365-3844 outside the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada] and entering access code 204978 from 7:00 p.m. EDT Thursday, June 23 through Monday, Sept. 26.
About Accenture
Accenture is a global management consulting, technology services and outsourcing company, with more than 223,000 people serving clients in more than 120 countries. Combining unparalleled experience, comprehensive capabilities across all industries and business functions, and extensive research on the world's most successful companies, Accenture collaborates with clients to help them become high-performance businesses and governments. The company generated net revenues of US$21.6 billion for the fiscal year ended Aug. 31, 2010. Its home page is www.accenture.com.
Non-GAAP Financial Information
This press release includes certain non-GAAP financial information as defined by Securities and Exchange Commission Regulation G. Pursuant to the requirements of this regulation, reconciliations of this non-GAAP financial information to Accenture's financial statements as prepared under generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) are included in this press release. Financial results "in local currency" are calculated by restating current-period activity into U.S. dollars using the comparable prior-year period's foreign-currency exchange rates. Accenture's management believes providing investors with this information gives additional insights into Accenture's results of operations. While Accenture's management believes that these non-GAAP financial measures are useful in evaluating Accenture's operations, this information should be considered as supplemental in nature and not as a substitute for the related financial information prepared in accordance with GAAP.
Forward-Looking Statements
Except for the historical information and discussions contained herein, statements in this news release may constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve a number of risks, uncertainties and other factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed or implied. These include, without limitation, risks that: the company's results of operations could be adversely affected by negative or uncertain economic or geopolitical conditions and the effects of these conditions on the company's clients' businesses and levels of business activity; the company's results of operations and ability to grow could be materially negatively affected if the company cannot adapt and expand its services and solutions in response to changes in technology and client demand; the consulting and outsourcing markets are highly competitive and the company might not be able to compete effectively; work with government clients exposes the company to additional risks inherent in the government contracting environment, including risks related to governmental budget and debt constraints; clients may not be satisfied with the company's services; results of operations could be materially adversely affected if clients terminate their contracts with the company; outsourcing services are a significant part of the company's business and subject the company to additional operational and financial risk; results of operations could materially suffer if the company is not able to obtain favorable pricing; if the company is unable to keep its supply of skills and resources in balance with client demand around the world, the company's business, the utilization rate of the company's professionals and the company's results of operations may be materially adversely affected; the company's business could be materially adversely affected if it incurs legal liability in connection with providing its services and solutions; if the company's pricing estimates do not accurately anticipate the cost and complexity of performing work, then the company's contracts could be unprofitable; many of the company's contracts include performance payments that link some of the company's fees to the attainment of performance or business targets and this could increase the variability of the company's revenues and margins; the company's ability to attract and retain business may depend on its reputation in the marketplace; the company's alliance relationships may not be successful or may change, which could adversely affect the company's results of operations; the company's Global Delivery Network is increasingly concentrated in India and the Philippines, which may expose it to operational risks; as a result of the company's geographically diverse operations and its growth strategy to continue geographic expansion, the company is more susceptible to certain risks; revenues, revenue growth and earnings in U.S. dollars may be lower if the U.S. dollar strengthens against other currencies, particularly the Euro and British pound; the company could have liability or the company's reputation could be damaged if the company fails to protect client data and company data or information systems as obligated by law or contract or if the company's information systems are breached; the company could be subject to liabilities or damage to its relationships with clients if subcontractors or the third parties with whom the company partners cannot meet their commitments on time or at all; the company's services or solutions could infringe upon the intellectual property rights of others or the company might lose its ability to utilize the intellectual property of others; the company has only a limited ability to protect its intellectual property rights, which are important to the company's success; changes in the company's level of taxes, and audits, investigations and tax proceedings, could have a material adverse effect on the company's results of operations and financial condition; the company's profitability could suffer if its cost-management strategies are unsuccessful; if the company is unable to collect its receivables or unbilled services, the company's results of operations, financial condition and cash flows
could be adversely affected; the company may be subject to criticism, negative publicity and legislative or regulatory action related to its incorporation in Ireland; if the company is unable to manage the organizational challenges associated with its size, the company might be unable to achieve its business objectives; the company may not be successful at identifying, acquiring or integrating other businesses; consolidation in the industries the company serves could adversely affect its business; the company's share price could fluctuate and be difficult to predict; as well as the risks, uncertainties and other factors discussed under the "Risk Factors" heading in Accenture plc's most recent annual report on Form 10-K and other documents filed with or furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission. Statements in this news release speak only as of the date they were made, and Accenture undertakes no duty to update any forward-looking statements made in this news release or to conform such statements to actual results or changes in Accenture's expectations.
Contact:
Fred Hawrysh
Accenture
+1 (917) 452-4398
fred.hawrysh@accenture.com
Alex Pachetti
Accenture
+1 (917) 452-5519
alex.pachetti@accenture.com
 
 
 
 
n/m = not meaningful
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ACN/ACN-8K-20110927160353.txt.gz
TIME:20110927160353
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition
On September 27, 2011, Accenture issued a press release announcing financial results for its fourth quarter and full fiscal year ended August 31, 2011.
A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1. All information in the press release is furnished but not filed.
Non-GAAP Financial Information
In the attached press release Accenture discloses the following non-GAAP financial measures:
 
 
Reconciliations of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable financial measures calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP are included in the press release. While Accenture's management believes that this non-GAAP financial information is useful in evaluating Accenture's operations, this information should be considered as supplemental in nature and not as a substitute for the related financial information prepared in accordance with GAAP.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
NEW YORK; Sept. 27, 2011  Accenture (NYSE: ACN) reported strong financial results for the fourth quarter and full 2011 fiscal year, ended Aug. 31, 2011, with record annual revenues, earnings per share, operating margin, free cash flow and new bookings.
For the fourth quarter, revenues before reimbursements ("net revenues") were $6.7 billion, an increase of 23 percent in U.S. dollars and 14 percent in local currency compared with the fourth quarter of fiscal 2010. Diluted earnings per share were $0.91, an increase of 38 percent. Operating margin was 13.8 percent. Operating cash flow was $1.4 billion and free cash flow was $1.2 billion, both quarterly records. New bookings were $8.4 billion, the company's highest quarterly bookings ever.
For the full fiscal year, net revenues were $25.5 billion, an increase of 18 percent in U.S. dollars and 15 percent in local currency compared with fiscal 2010. Diluted earnings per share were $3.40, an increase of 28 percent. Operating margin was 13.6 percent. Operating cash flow was $3.4 billion and free cash flow was $3.0 billion, which exceeded the top end of the company's expectations by more than $300 million. New bookings were $28.8 billion.
In addition, Accenture's Board of Directors has declared a semi-annual cash dividend of 67.5 cents per share, an increase of 22.5 cents per share, or 50 percent, over its previous semi-annual dividend, declared in March. The Board also approved $5 billion in additional share repurchase authority.
Pierre Nanterme, Accenture's chief executive officer, said, "Our excellent results for the fourth quarter and full fiscal 2011 reflect the continued momentum in our business as we execute our growth strategy. We hit the top end of our range for both revenues and EPS and are particularly pleased with the growth across all dimensions of our business. In addition, we generated free cash flow of $3 billion for the year, which enabled us to return more than $2.8 billion to our shareholders through dividends and share repurchases and still close the year with an exceptionally strong balance sheet.
"While we are closely monitoring the economic environment, we continue to see strong demand for our services  demonstrated by record bookings of $8 billion in the fourth quarter and $29 billion in the full year. We are investing in our core business, in strategic initiatives and in our key geographic growth markets. Our industry expertise and technology leadership remain key differentiators for us, and we continue to run our business with rigor and discipline  with a focus on driving profitable growth, increasing market share and delivering significant value to clients and shareholders."
Financial Review
Fourth Quarter Fiscal 2011
Net revenues for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2011 were $6.7 billion, compared with $5.4 billion for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2010, an increase of 23 percent in U.S. dollars and 14 percent in local currency. Net revenues for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2011 exceeded the company's guided range of $6.4 billion to $6.6 billion, which assumed a foreign-exchange impact of positive 8 percent. Adjusting for the actual foreign-exchange impact of positive 9 percent in the fourth quarter, the company's guided range for quarterly net revenues would have been $6.45 billion to $6.65 billion. Net revenues of $6.7 billion for the quarter were just above this adjusted range.
 
 
Diluted EPS for the fourth quarter were $0.91, compared with $0.66 for the fourth quarter last year. The $0.25 increase in EPS reflects:
 
Operating income for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2011 was $923 million, or 13.8 percent of net revenues, compared with $714 million, or 13.2 percent of net revenues, for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2010, an expansion of 60 basis points.
Gross margin (gross profit as a percentage of net revenues) for the fourth quarter was 33.1 percent, compared with 34.0 percent for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2010. Selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses for the fourth quarter were $1.29 billion, or approximately 19.4 percent of net revenues, compared with $1.13 billion, or 20.9 percent of net revenues, for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2010.
The company's effective tax rate for the fourth quarter was 27.0 percent, compared with 28.8 percent for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2010. The lower rate in the fourth quarter of fiscal 2011 was primarily due to a number of factors that affect the geographic mix of income.
Net income for the fourth quarter was $683 million, compared with $510 million for the same period of fiscal 2010.
Operating cash flow for the fourth quarter was $1.38 billion, and property and equipment additions were $137 million. Free cash flow, defined as operating cash flow net of property and equipment additions, was $1.24 billion. For the same period of fiscal 2010, operating cash flow was $1.25 billion, property and equipment additions were $102 million, and free cash flow was $1.15 billion.
Days services outstanding, or DSOs, were 30 days at Aug. 31, 2011, compared with 30 days at Aug. 31, 2010.
Accenture's total cash balance at Aug. 31, 2011 was $5.7 billion, compared with $4.8 billion at Aug. 31, 2010.
Utilization for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2011 was 85 percent. Attrition for the fourth quarter was 14 percent, compared with 17 percent for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2010.
New Bookings
New bookings for the fourth quarter were approximately $8.4 billion. This reflects a positive 9 percent foreign-currency impact compared with the fourth quarter of fiscal 2010.
 
 
Net Revenues by Operating Group
All of the company's operating groups achieved positive revenue growth in both local currency and U.S. dollars compared with the fourth quarter last year. Net revenues by operating group for the fourth quarter were as follows:
 
 
 
 
 
Net Revenues by Geographic Region
Net revenues by geographic region for the fourth quarter were as follows:
 
 
 
Full Year Fiscal 2011
Net revenues for the full 2011 fiscal year were $25.5 billion, compared with $21.6 billion for fiscal 2010, an increase of 18 percent in U.S. dollars and 15 percent in local currency. Net revenues for fiscal 2011 reflect a foreign-exchange impact of positive 3 percent compared with fiscal 2010.
 
 
Diluted EPS for the full fiscal year were $3.40, compared with $2.66 for fiscal 2010, an increase of 28 percent. The $0.74 increase in EPS reflects:
 
Operating income for the full fiscal year was $3.47 billion, or 13.6 percent of net revenues, compared with $2.91 billion, or 13.5 percent of net revenues, for fiscal 2010, an expansion of 10 basis points.
Gross margin (gross profit as a percentage of net revenues) for fiscal 2011 was 32.9 percent, compared with 33.6 percent for fiscal 2010. Selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses for the full fiscal year were $4.91 billion, or approximately 19.2 percent of net revenues, compared with $4.33 billion, or approximately 20.0 percent of net revenues, for fiscal 2010.
Accenture's annual effective tax rate for the full fiscal year was 27.3 percent, compared with 29.3 percent for fiscal 2010, in line with the company's guided range of 27 percent to 28 percent.
Net income for the full fiscal year was $2.55 billion, compared with $2.06billion for fiscal 2010.
 
For the year ended Aug. 31, 2011, operating cash flow was $3.44 billion and property and equipment additions were $404million. Free cash flow, defined as operating cash flow net of property and equipment additions, was $3.04 billion, exceeding the company's previously guided range of $2.5 billion to $2.7 billion. For the prior fiscal year, ended Aug. 31, 2010, operating cash flow was $3.09 billion, property and equipment additions were $238 million, and free cash flow was $2.85 billion.
 
Utilization for the full fiscal year 2011 was 86 percent. Attrition for the full year was 14 percent, compared with 15 percent for fiscal 2010.
New Bookings
New bookings for the full fiscal year were $28.8 billion, an increase of 15 percent in U.S. dollars and 12 percent in local currency over fiscal 2010. New bookings for fiscal 2011 reflect a positive 3 percent foreign-currency impact compared with fiscal 2010.
 
 
Net Revenues by Operating Group
All of Accenture's operating groups grew revenues in both local currency and U.S. dollars in fiscal 2011 compared with fiscal 2010. Net revenues by operating group for the full fiscal year were as follows:
 
 
 
 
Net Revenues by Geographic Region
Net revenues by geographic region for the full fiscal year were as follows:
 
 
 
Dividend
Accenture plc has declared a semi-annual cash dividend of 67.5 cents per share on Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares for shareholders of record at the close of business on Oct. 14, 2011, and Accenture SCA will declare a semi-annual cash dividend of 67.5 cents per share on Accenture SCA Class I common shares for shareholders of record at the close of business on Oct. 11, 2011. Both dividends are payable on Nov. 15. This represents an increase of 22.5 cents per share, or 50 percent, over the company's previous semi-annual dividend, declared in March.
Share Repurchase Activity
During the fourth quarter of fiscal 2011, Accenture repurchased or redeemed 13.1 million shares for a total of $731 million, including $621 million for 11.3 million shares repurchased on the open market. During the full fiscal year 2011, Accenture repurchased or redeemed 42.8 million shares for a total of $2.17 billion, including $1.31 billion for 24.3 million shares repurchased in the open market. The Accenture Board of Directors has approved $5 billion in additional share repurchase authority, bringing Accenture's total outstanding authority to approximately $6 billion.
At Aug. 31, 2011, Accenture had approximately 704 million total shares outstanding, including 641 million Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares and minority holdings of 63 million shares (Accenture SCA Class I common shares and Accenture Canada Holdings Inc. exchangeable shares).
Business Outlook
First Quarter Fiscal 2012
Accenture expects net revenues for the first quarter of fiscal 2012 to be in the range of $6.8 billion to $7.0 billion, which assumes a foreign-exchange impact of positive 3 percent compared with the first quarter of fiscal 2011.
Fiscal Year 2012
Accenture's business outlook for the full 2012 fiscal year assumes a foreign-exchange impact of zero percent compared with fiscal 2011.
For fiscal 2012, the company expects net revenue growth to be in the range of 7 percent to 10 percent in local currency. The company expects diluted EPS growth to be in the range of 12 percent to 14 percent, or $3.80 to $3.88. These ranges for revenue and EPS growth are consistent with the preliminary business outlook the company provided at its Investor & Analyst Conference in April.
Accenture expects operating margin for the full fiscal year to be in the range of 13.7 percent to 13.9 percent, an expansion of 10 to 30 basis points.
The company expects operating cash flow to be $3.6 billion to $3.9 billion; property and equipment additions to be $490 million; and free cash flow to be in the range of $3.1 billion to $3.4 billion. The annual effective tax rate is expected to be in the range of 27 percent to 28 percent.
Accenture is targeting new bookings for fiscal 2012 in the range of $28 billion to $31 billion.
Conference Call and Webcast Details
Accenture will host a conference call at 4:30 p.m. EDT today to discuss its fourth-quarter and full-year fiscal 2011 financial results. To participate, please dial +1 (800) 230-1092 [+1 (612) 288-0340 outside the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada] approximately 15 minutes before the scheduled start of the call. The conference call will also be accessible live on the Investor Relations section of the Accenture Web site at www.accenture.com.
A replay of the conference call will be available online at www.accenture.com beginning at 7:00 p.m. EDT today, Tuesday, Sept. 27, and continuing until Wednesday, Dec. 14, 2011. A podcast of the conference call will be available online at www.accenture.com beginning approximately 24 hours after the call and continuing until Wednesday, Dec. 14. The replay will also be available via telephone by dialing +1 (800) 475-6701 [+1 (320) 365-3844 outside the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada] and entering access code 214430 from 7:00 p.m. EDT today, Tuesday, Sept. 27, through Wednesday, Dec. 14.
About Accenture
Accenture is a global management consulting, technology services and outsourcing company, with approximately 236,000 people serving clients in more than 120 countries. Combining unparalleled experience, comprehensive capabilities across all industries and business functions, and extensive research on the world's most successful companies, Accenture collaborates with clients to help them become high-performance businesses and governments. The company generated net revenues of US$25.5 billion for the fiscal year ended Aug. 31, 2011. Its home page is www.accenture.com.
Non-GAAP Financial Information
This press release includes certain non-GAAP financial information as defined by Securities and Exchange Commission Regulation G. Pursuant to the requirements of this regulation, reconciliations of this non-GAAP financial information to Accenture's financial statements as prepared under generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) are included in this press release. Financial results "in local currency" are calculated by restating current-period activity into U.S. dollars using the comparable prior-year period's foreign-currency exchange rates. Accenture's management believes providing investors with this information gives additional insights into Accenture's results of operations. While Accenture's management believes that the non-GAAP financial measures herein are useful in evaluating Accenture's operations, this information should be considered as supplemental in nature and not as a substitute for the related financial information prepared in accordance with GAAP.
Forward-Looking Statements
Except for the historical information and discussions contained herein, statements in this news release may constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve a number of risks, uncertainties and other factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed or implied. These include, without limitation, risks that: the company's results of operations could be adversely affected by volatile, negative or uncertain economic or geopolitical conditions and the effects of these conditions on the company's clients' businesses and levels of business activity; if the company is unable to keep its supply of skills and resources in balance with client demand around the world, the company's business, the utilization rate of the company's professionals and the company's results of operations may be materially adversely affected; the company's results of operations and ability to grow could be materially negatively affected if the company cannot adapt and expand its services and solutions in response to changes in technology and client demand; the consulting and outsourcing markets are highly competitive and the company might not be able to compete effectively; work with government clients exposes the company to additional risks inherent in the government contracting environment, including risks related to governmental budget and debt constraints; clients may not be satisfied with the company's services; results of operations could be materially adversely affected if clients terminate their contracts with the company; outsourcing services subject the company to additional risks; results of operations could materially suffer if the company is not able to obtain favorable pricing; the company's business could be materially adversely affected if it incurs legal liability in connection with providing its services and solutions; if the company's pricing estimates do not accurately anticipate the cost and complexity of performing work, then the company's contracts could be unprofitable; many of the company's contracts include performance payments that link some of the company's fees to the attainment of performance or business targets and this could increase the variability of the company's revenues and margins; the company's ability to attract and retain business may depend on its reputation in the marketplace; the company's alliance relationships may not be successful or may change, which could adversely affect the company's results of operations; the company's Global Delivery Network is increasingly concentrated in India and the Philippines, which may expose it to operational risks; as a result of the company's geographically diverse operations and its growth strategy to continue geographic expansion, the company is more susceptible to certain risks; the company's results of operations could be materially adversely affected by unfavorable fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates; the company could have liability or the company's reputation could be damaged if the company fails to protect client data and company data or information systems as obligated by law or contract or if the company's information systems are breached; the company could be subject to liabilities or damage to its relationships with clients if subcontractors or the third parties with whom the
company partners cannot meet their commitments on time or at all; the company's services or solutions could infringe upon the intellectual property rights of others or the company might lose its ability to utilize the intellectual property of others; the company has only a limited ability to protect its intellectual property rights, which are important to the company's success; changes in the company's level of taxes, and audits, investigations and tax proceedings, could have a material adverse effect on the company's results of operations and financial condition; the company's profitability could suffer if its cost-management strategies are unsuccessful; if the company is unable to collect its receivables or unbilled services, the company's results of operations, financial condition and cash flows could be adversely affected; the company may be subject to criticism, negative publicity and legislative or regulatory action related to its incorporation in Ireland; if the company is unable to manage the organizational challenges associated with its size, the company might be unable to achieve its business objectives; the company may not be successful at identifying, acquiring or integrating other businesses; consolidation in the industries the company serves could adversely affect its business; the company's share price could fluctuate and be difficult to predict; as well as the risks, uncertainties and other factors discussed under the "Risk Factors" heading in Accenture plc's most recent annual report on Form 10-K and other documents filed with or furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission. Statements in this news release speak only as of the date they were made, and Accenture undertakes no duty to update any forward-looking statements made in this news release or to conform such statements to actual results or changes in Accenture's expectations.
Contact:
Roxanne Taylor
Accenture
+1 (917) 452-5106
roxanne.taylor@accenture.com
 
 
 
 
n/m = not meaningful
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ACN/ACN-8K-20111215161723.txt.gz
TIME:20111215161723
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition
On December 15, 2011, Accenture issued a press release announcing financial results for its first quarter of fiscal year 2012, which fiscal quarter ended on November 30, 2011.
A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1. All information in the press release is furnished but not filed.
Non-GAAP Financial Information
In the attached press release Accenture discloses the following non-GAAP financial measures:
 
 
Reconciliations of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable financial measures calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP are included in the press release. While Accenture's management believes that this non-GAAP financial information is useful in evaluating Accenture's operations, this information should be considered as supplemental in nature and not as a substitute for the related financial information prepared in accordance with GAAP.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
NEW YORK; Dec. 15, 2011  Accenture (NYSE: ACN) reported strong financial results for the first quarter of fiscal 2012, ended Nov. 30, 2011, with net revenues of $7.1 billion, an increase of 17 percent in U.S. dollars and 14 percent in local currency over the same period last year. Diluted earnings per share were $0.96, an increase of $0.15, or 19 percent, over the same period last year.
Operating income was $981 million, an increase of 19 percent over the same period last year, and operating margin was 13.9 percent, a year-over-year expansion of 20 basis points.
New bookings for the quarter were $7.8 billion, with consulting bookings of $4.2 billion and outsourcing bookings of $3.6 billion.
Pierre Nanterme, Accenture's chief executive officer, said, "We are pleased with our strong performance in the first quarter. We generated our highest quarterly revenues ever, with double-digit local-currency growth in all five operating groups and all three geographic regions. We grew EPS by 19 percent, expanded operating margin, delivered strong bookings and continue to have a very strong balance sheet.
"Our excellent results in the first quarter give us confidence that we are executing a growth strategy that resonates with the needs of our clients in the current environment. We remain focused on delivering profitable growth through a relentless focus on industry and technology differentiation and on accelerated geographic expansion in our priority emerging markets."
Financial Review
Revenues before reimbursements ("net revenues") for the first quarter of fiscal 2012 were $7.1 billion, compared with $6.0 billion for the first quarter of fiscal 2011, an increase of 17 percent in U.S. dollars and 14 percent in local currency. Net revenues of $7.1 billion for the first quarter of fiscal 2012 were above the company's guided range of $6.8 billion to $7.0 billion. Net revenues reflect a foreign-exchange impact of positive 3 percent compared with the first quarter of fiscal 2011, consistent with the foreign-exchange assumption the company provided previously.
 
Diluted EPS for the quarter were $0.96, compared with $0.81 for the first quarter last year, an increase of $0.15, or 19 percent. The $0.15 increase in EPS reflects:
 
partially offset by:
 
Operating income for the quarter increased 19 percent, to $981 million, or 13.9 percent of net revenues, compared with $827 million, or 13.7 percent of net revenues, for the first quarter of fiscal 2011.
Gross margin (gross profit as a percentage of net revenues) for the quarter was 31.8 percent, compared with 32.2 percent for the first quarter last year. Selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses for the first quarter were $1.27 billion, or approximately 17.9 percent of net revenues, compared with $1.12 billion, or 18.5 percent of net revenues, for the first quarter last year.
The company's effective tax rate for the quarter was 28.3 percent, flat compared with the first quarter last year.
Net income for the quarter was $712 million, compared with $606 million for the first quarter last year, an increase of 18 percent.
Operating cash flow for the quarter was $475 million, and property and equipment additions were $81 million. Free cash flow, defined as operating cash flow net of property and equipment additions, was $394 million. For the same period last year, operating cash flow was $106 million; property and equipment additions were $75 million; and free cash flow was $31 million. Operating cash flow in the first quarter of fiscal 2012 reflected client prepayments that were higher than in the first quarter of fiscal 2011.
Days services outstanding, or DSOs, were 32 days, compared with 30 days at Aug. 31, 2011 and 33 days at Nov. 30, 2010.
Accenture's total cash balance at Nov. 30, 2011 was $5.1 billion, compared with $5.7 billion at Aug. 31, 2011. The Nov. 30 cash balance includes a negative impact of $257 million from the lower value of most currencies versus the U.S. dollar.
Utilization for the quarter was 87 percent. Attrition for the first quarter of fiscal 2012 was 12 percent, compared with 14 percent for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2011 and 15 percent for the first quarter of fiscal 2011.
New Bookings
New bookings for the first quarter were $7.8 billion and reflect a positive 3 percent foreign-currency impact compared with new bookings in the first quarter last year.
 
 
Net Revenues by Operating Group
All five operating groups achieved double-digit revenue growth in both U.S. dollars and local currency compared with the first quarter last year. Net revenues by operating group were as follows:
 
 
 
 
 
Net Revenues by Geographic Region
All of the company's geographic regions achieved double-digit revenue growth in both local currency and U.S. dollars compared with the first quarter last year. Net revenues by geographic region were as follows:
 
 
Returning Cash to Shareholders
Accenture continues to return cash to shareholders through cash dividends and share repurchases.
Dividend
On Nov. 15, 2011, a semi-annual cash dividend of 67.5 cents per share was paid to Accenture plc Class A ordinary shareholders of record at the close of business on Oct. 14, 2011 and to Accenture SCA Class I common shareholders of record at the close of business on Oct. 11, 2011. These cash dividend payments totaled $475 million. This dividend represents an increase of 22.5 cents per share, or 50 percent, over the company's previous semi-annual dividend, declared in March.
Share Repurchase Activity
During the first quarter of fiscal 2012, Accenture repurchased or redeemed 5.3 million shares for a total of $285 million, including 3.4 million shares repurchased in the open market.
Accenture's total remaining share repurchase authority at Nov. 30, 2011 was approximately $5.8 billion.
At Nov. 30, 2011, Accenture had approximately 706 million total shares outstanding, including 645 million Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares and 61 million Accenture SCA Class I common shares and Accenture Canada Holdings Inc. exchangeable shares.
Business Outlook
Second Quarter Fiscal 2012
Accenture expects net revenues for the second quarter of fiscal 2012 to be in the range of $6.5 billion to $6.8 billion. This range assumes a foreign-exchange impact of negative 1 percent compared with the second quarter of fiscal 2011.
Full Fiscal Year 2012
For fiscal 2012, the company continues to expect net revenue growth to be in the range of 7 percent to 10 percent in local currency.
Accenture's business outlook for the full 2012 fiscal year now assumes a foreign-exchange impact of negative 1 percent compared with fiscal 2011, which is lower than the zero-percent impact the company had assumed when it previously provided business outlook during its fourth-quarter fiscal 2011 earnings announcement in September.
The company now expects diluted EPS for fiscal 2012 to be in the range of $3.76 to $3.84. This revised range is $0.04 lower than the company's previous outlook of $3.80 to $3.88, based on the company's updated foreign-exchange assumption.
Accenture continues to expect operating margin for the full fiscal year to be in the range of 13.7 percent to 13.9 percent, an expansion of 10 to 30 basis points.
The company continues to expect operating cash flow to be $3.6 billion to $3.9 billion; property and equipment additions to be $490 million; and free cash flow to be in the range of $3.1 billion to $3.4 billion. The company continues to expect its annual effective tax rate to be in the range of 27 percent to 28 percent.
Accenture continues to target new bookings for fiscal 2012 in the range of $28 billion to $31 billion.
Conference Call and Webcast Details
Accenture will host a conference call at 4:30 p.m. EST today to discuss its first-quarter fiscal 2012 financial results. To participate, please dial +1 (800) 398-9389 [+1 (612) 332-0637 outside the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada] approximately 15 minutes before the scheduled start of the call. The conference call will also be accessible live on the Investor Relations section of the Accenture Web site at www.accenture.com.
A replay of the conference call will be available online at www.accenture.com beginning at 7:00 p.m. EST today, Thursday, Dec. 15, and continuing until Wednesday, March 21, 2012. A podcast of the conference call will be available online at www.accenture.com beginning approximately 24 hours after the call and continuing until Wednesday, March 21, 2012. The replay will also be available via telephone by dialing +1 (800) 475-6701 [+1 (320) 365-3844 outside the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada] and entering access code 222491 from 7:00 p.m. EST Thursday, Dec. 15 through Wednesday, March 21, 2012.
About Accenture
Accenture is a global management consulting, technology services and outsourcing company, with more than 244,000 people serving clients in more than 120 countries. Combining unparalleled experience, comprehensive capabilities across all industries and business functions, and extensive research on the world's most successful companies, Accenture collaborates with clients to help them become high-performance businesses and governments. The company generated net revenues of US$25.5 billion for the fiscal year ended Aug. 31, 2011. Its home page is www.accenture.com.
Non-GAAP Financial Information
This press release includes certain non-GAAP financial information as defined by Securities and Exchange Commission Regulation G. Pursuant to the requirements of this regulation, reconciliations of this non-GAAP financial information to Accenture's financial statements as prepared under generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) are included in this press release. Financial results "in local currency" are calculated by restating current-period activity into U.S. dollars using the comparable prior-year period's foreign-currency exchange rates. Accenture's management believes providing investors with this information gives additional insights into Accenture's results of operations. While Accenture's management believes that the non-GAAP financial measures herein are useful in evaluating Accenture's operations, this information should be considered as supplemental in nature and not as a substitute for the related financial information prepared in accordance with GAAP.
Forward-Looking Statements
Except for the historical information and discussions contained herein, statements in this news release may constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve a number of risks, uncertainties and other factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed or implied. These include, without limitation, risks that: the company's results of operations could be adversely affected by volatile, negative or uncertain economic conditions and the effects of these conditions on the company's clients' businesses and levels of business activity; the company's business depends on generating and maintaining ongoing, profitable client demand for the company's services and solutions, and a significant reduction in such demand could materially affect the company's results of operations; if the company is unable to keep its supply of skills and resources in balance with client demand around the world and attract and retain professionals with strong leadership skills, the company's business, the utilization rate of the company's professionals and the company's results of operations may be materially adversely affected; the consulting and outsourcing markets are highly competitive, and the company might not be able to compete effectively; the company's results of operations (including its net revenues and operating income) and the value of balance-sheet items originally denominated in other currencies could be materially adversely affected by unfavorable fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates; the company could have liability or the company's reputation could be damaged if the company fails to protect client and company data or information systems as obligated by law or contract or if the company's information systems are breached; the company's Global Delivery Network is increasingly concentrated in India and the Philippines, which may expose it to operational risks; as a result of the company's geographically diverse operations and its growth strategy to continue geographic expansion, the company is more susceptible to certain risks; the company's results of operations could materially suffer if the company is not able to obtain sufficient pricing to enable it to meet its profitability expectations; if the company's pricing estimates do not accurately anticipate the cost, risk and complexity of the company performing its work or third parties upon which it relies do not meet their commitments, then the company's contracts could have delivery inefficiencies and be unprofitable; the company's work with government clients exposes the company to additional risks inherent in the government contracting environment, including risks related to governmental budget and debt constraints; the company's business could be materially adversely affected if it incurs legal liability in connection with providing its services and solutions; the company's results of operations and ability to grow could be materially negatively affected if the company cannot adapt and expand its services and solutions in response to ongoing changes in technology and offerings by new entrants; outsourcing services subject the company to different operational risks than its consulting and systems integration services; the company's services or solutions could infringe upon the intellectual property rights of others or the company might lose its ability to utilize the intellectual property of others; the company has only a limited ability to protect its intellectual property rights, which are important to the company's success; the company's ability to attract and retain business and employees may depend on its reputation in the marketplace; the company's alliance relationships may not be successful or may change, which could adversely affect the company's results of operations; the company may not be successful at identifying, acquiring or integrating other businesses; the company's profitability could suffer if its cost-management strategies are unsuccessful, and the company may not be able to improve its profitability through improvements to cost-management to the degree it has done in the past; many of the company's contracts include performance payments that link some of its fees to the attainment of performance or business targets and/or require the company to meet specific service levels, which could increase the variability of the company's revenues and impact its margins; changes in the company's level of taxes, and audits, investigations and tax proceedings, or changes in the company's treatment as an Irish company, could have a material adverse effect on the company's results of operations and
financial condition; if the company is unable to manage the organizational challenges associated with its size, the company might be unable to achieve its business objectives; if the company is unable to collect its receivables or unbilled services, the company's results of operations, financial condition and cash flows could be adversely affected; the company's share price and results of operations could fluctuate and be difficult to predict; the company's results of operations and share price could be adversely affected if it is unable to maintain effective internal controls; the company may be subject to criticism and negative publicity related to its incorporation in Ireland; as well as the risks, uncertainties and other factors discussed under the "Risk Factors" heading in Accenture plc's most recent annual report on Form 10-K and other documents filed with or furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission. Statements in this news release speak only as of the date they were made, and Accenture undertakes no duty to update any forward-looking statements made in this news release or to conform such statements to actual results or changes in Accenture's expectations.
Contact:
Roxanne Taylor
Accenture
+1 (917) 452-5106
roxanne.taylor@accenture.com
 
 
 
 
n/m = not meaningful
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ACN/ACN-8K-20120209160734.txt.gz
TIME:20120209160734
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.07 Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders.
On February 9, 2012, Accenture plc ("Accenture") held its 2012 annual general meeting of shareholders (the "Annual Meeting") as described in Accenture's definitive proxy statement for the Annual Meeting filed on December 19, 2011. A quorum was present at the meeting as required by Accenture's articles of association. The immediately following chart sets forth the number of votes cast for and against, and the number of abstention votes and broker non-votes, with respect to each matter voted upon by the shareholders:
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ACN/ACN-8K-20120209160954.txt.gz
TIME:20120209160954
EVENTS:	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.03 Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year.
On February 9, 2012, at the annual general meeting of shareholders (the "Annual Meeting") of Accenture plc (the "Company"), the shareholders of the Company approved an amendment to the Company's articles of association that provides for a phased-in declassification of the Board of Directors and the annual election of all directors who are re-appointed beginning at the Company's 2013 annual general meeting of shareholders.
Because the amendment does not shorten the existing terms of the directors, the directors who have been elected to three-year terms prior to the effectiveness of the amendment, including directors elected at the Annual Meeting, will complete those three-year terms. Effective February 9, 2012, pursuant to the amended and restated memorandum and articles of association, (1) the Class III directors standing for appointment at the Company's 2013 annual general meeting of shareholders will stand for appointment for a one-year term and (2) the Class I directors standing for appointment at the Company's 2014 annual general meeting of shareholders will stand for appointment for a one-year term, along with the Class III directors. Beginning with the Company's 2015 annual general meeting of shareholders, and at each annual general meeting of shareholders thereafter, the Company's entire Board of Directors will stand for appointment for a one-year term and there will no longer be any designation by classes.
The above summary of the amendments to the articles of association of Accenture plc is qualified in its entirety by reference to Exhibit 3.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d)  The following exhibit is attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K
3.1    Amended and Restated Memorandum and Articles of Association of Accenture plc
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 3.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Cert. No.: 471706
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
WE, the several persons whose names, addresses and descriptions are subscribed, wish to be formed into a Company in pursuance of this memorandum of association, and we agree to take the number of shares in the capital of the Company set opposite our respective names.
 
Dated the 4th day of June 2009
Witness to the above signatures
/s/ Jenny L. Lauth
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
after making all necessary provisions, where relevant, for payment of any preferred dividend in respect of any preference shares in the Company then outstanding, the Company shall apply any profits or reserves which the Directors resolve to distribute in paying such profits or reserves to the holders of the Class A Ordinary Shares in respect of their holdings of such shares pari passu and pro rata to the number of Class A Ordinary Shares held by each of them;
 
on a return of assets on liquidation, reduction of capital or otherwise, the holders of the Class A Ordinary Shares shall be entitled to be paid the surplus assets of the Company remaining after payment of its liabilities (subject to the rights of the holders of any preferred shares in the Company then in issue, having preferred rights on a return of capital) in respect of their holdings of Class A Ordinary Shares pari passu and pro rata to the number of Class A Ordinary Shares held by each of them;
 
subject to the right of the Company to set record dates for the purpose of determining the identity of Shareholders entitled to notice of and/or vote at a general meeting, the holders of the Class A Ordinary Shares shall be entitled to receive notice of, and to attend and vote at, general meetings of the Company; every holder of Class A Ordinary Shares present in person or by proxy shall have one vote for each Class A Ordinary Share held by him (and, except as otherwise provided by the Companies Acts or these articles, the holders of Class A Ordinary Shares and Class X Ordinary Shares shall vote as a single class);
 
a Class A Ordinary Share shall be deemed to be a Redeemable Share on, and from the time of, the existence or creation of an agreement, transaction or trade between the Company and any third party pursuant to which the Company acquires or will acquire Class A Ordinary Shares, or an interest in Class A Ordinary Shares, from the relevant third party. In these circumstances, the acquisition of such shares by the Company shall constitute the Redemption of a Redeemable Share in accordance with Part XI of the 1990 Act;
 
unless the Board resolves otherwise (either generally or in any particular case or cases) holders of Class A Ordinary Shares will not be entitled to receive a share certificate in respect of any Class A Ordinary Shares.
 
 
 
the holders of Class X Ordinary Shares will have no right to receive any dividend or distribution in respect of their holdings of Class X Ordinary Shares;
 
on a return of assets on liquidation, reduction of capital or otherwise, the holders of the Class X Ordinary Shares will not be entitled to any payment out of the surplus assets of the Company in respect of their holdings of Class X Ordinary Shares;
 
subject to the right of the Company to set record dates for the purpose of determining the identity of Shareholders entitled to notice of and/or vote at a general meeting, the holders of the Class X Ordinary Shares shall be entitled to receive notice of, and to attend and vote at, general meetings of the Company; every holder of Class X Ordinary Shares present in person or by proxy shall have one vote for each Class X Ordinary Share held by him (and, except as otherwise provided by the Companies Acts or these articles, the holders of Class A Ordinary Shares and Class X Ordinary Shares shall vote as a single class);
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Class X Ordinary Shares are not transferable by their holders, unless the Class X Ordinary Shareholder has received the prior written consent of the Company to the proposed transfer to the proposed transferee; and
 
unless the Board resolves otherwise (either generally or in any particular case or cases) holders of Class X Ordinary Shares will not be entitled to receive a share certificate in respect of any Class X Ordinary Shares held by him.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The chairman of the general meeting shall be present at, and the meeting shall be deemed to take place at, the principal meeting place. If it appears to the chairman of the general meeting that the facilities at the principal meeting place or any satellite meeting place are or become inadequate for the purposes referred to above, then the chairman may, without the consent of the meeting, interrupt or adjourn the general meeting. All business conducted at that general meeting up to the time of such adjournment shall be valid.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Nothing in this article 95 shall create any duty owed by any Director to any person or entity to consider, or afford any particular weight to, any of the foregoing matters or to limit his consideration to the foregoing matters. No such employee, retired former partner of Accenture, former employee, beneficiary, customer, creditor or community or member thereof shall have any rights against any Director under this article 95.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
shall not be limited by the fact that in certain provisions of these articles, but not in others, express reference is made to a committee or to particular powers, authorities or discretions being exercised by the Board or by a committee of the Board.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
president and vice-president are appointed under article 113(a)) or a president and one or more vice-presidents (if a chairman and deputy chairman are appointed under article 113(a)), to the extent that such offices are not filled pursuant to article 113(a). A person appointed to any such other office need not be a Director and the same person may hold more than one office.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The records of account shall at all times be open to inspection by the Directors. No Shareholder shall have any right to inspect any accounting record or book or document of the Company except as conferred by law or authorised by the Board or by Ordinary Resolution.
 
 
 
the Companies Acts to receive them; provided that in the case of those documents sent by electronic mail or any other means of electronic communication, such documents shall be sent with the consent of the recipient, to the address of the recipient notified to the Company by the recipient for such purposes.
 
 
 
 
 
 
The Company's power of sale shall extend to any share which, on or before the date or first date on which any such advertisement appears, is issued in right of a share to which article 136(a) applies.
To give effect to any such sale the Board may authorise some person to transfer the shares to the purchaser who shall not be bound to see to the application of the purchase money nor shall his title to the shares be affected by any irregularity or invalidity in the proceedings relating to the sale. The net proceeds of sale shall belong to the Company which shall be obliged to account to the former Shareholder or person entitled by transmission for an amount equal to such proceeds and shall enter the name of such former Shareholder or person entitled by transmission in the books of the Company as a creditor for such amount. No trust shall be created in respect of the debt, no interest shall be payable in respect of the same and the Company shall not be required to account for any money earned on the net proceeds, which may be employed in the business of the Company or invested in such investments as the Board may from time to time think fit.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
mail or other means of electronic communications approved by the Board, he may revoke such consent at any time by requesting the Company to communicate with him in documented form; provided however, that such revocation shall not take effect until five days after written notice of the revocation is received by the Company.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ACN/ACN-8K-20120301163525.txt.gz
TIME:20120301163525
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On March 1, 2012, Kevin Campbell, group chief executive of the Technology growth platform of Accenture plc (the "Company" or "Accenture"), informed the Company of his intention to resign from Accenture for personal reasons, effective immediately.
In connection with his departure from Accenture, the Company entered into an agreement with Mr. Campbell, pursuant to which, among other items, Mr. Campbell has agreed that he will not compete with the Company or solicit its clients or employees during the 12-month period following his separation from the Company. In exchange for agreeing to the terms of the separation arrangement, along with signing a general release of claims in favor of Accenture, Mr. Campbell will be entitled to receive, among certain other consideration: (1) cash payments totaling $3 million over a 12-month period and (2) the vesting of unvested equity comprised of (a) approximately 52,701 shares of time-vested restricted share units plus an additional number of shares to be determined based on actual dividends declared by the Company prior to the regular release dates in accordance with Mr. Campbell's equity award agreements ("dividend shares") and (b) up to an additional 90,510 shares of performance-based restricted share units (plus related dividend shares), subject to the Company's achievement of certain performance goals. The separation agreement further provides that, among other remedies available to the Company, Mr. Campbell's right to receive separation payments will be forfeited, and he will have an obligation to re-pay any separation payments received and forfeit any restricted share units that vest pursuant to the separation agreement, in the event that he breaches his restrictive covenants.
The foregoing summary of the separation agreement does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the agreement itself, which is filed hereto as Exhibit 10 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 

EXHIBIT 10
Execution Copy
March 1, 2012
Dear Mr. Kevin Campbell:
As discussed, you hereby confirm your voluntary termination of employment and resignation for personal reasons, as of March 1, 2012 (the ""), from any and all employee, officer and director positions with Accenture LLP and Accenture plc (collectively, "") and their respective Affiliates. As used herein, the term "" means Accenture SCA and any other entity directly or indirectly controlling, controlled by, or under common control with, Accenture or any other entity in which Accenture or an Affiliate has an interest and which has been designated as an Affiliate by the Board of Directors of Accenture pursuant to the terms of the Accenture 2010 Share Incentive Plan (as amended from time to time), or any of their respective assigns or predecessor or successor entities. Following the Termination Date, you will be eligible for certain separation benefits as provided herein in lieu of any payments or benefits that you otherwise might have been eligible to receive under the Accenture LLP Senior Executive Separation Benefits Plan, as amended from time to time (the ""), or under your Employment Agreement with Accenture, dated as of February 25, 2005 (the "") or otherwise, if you submit a signed copy of this letter (the "") to Accenture by the deadline specified below (and do not revoke this Letter Agreement) and otherwise comply with all the terms and conditions of this Letter Agreement. You have also received a copy of the summary plan description and plan document for the Plan and relevant appendix.
Termination Date
Accenture
Affiliate
Plan
Employment Agreement
Letter Agreement
Accenture is offering you the opportunity to receive aggregate cash payments of $3 million, treatment of your outstanding equity awards as set forth below and other valuable consideration, including but not limited to, certain outplacement benefits and retiree health benefits (collectively, the "") in exchange for signing a general release and waiver of claims and the Restrictive Covenant Agreement attached as Exhibit B hereto, and your agreement to the other terms and conditions set forth in this Letter Agreement. If you accept the terms and conditions set forth below and want to enter into a binding agreement with Accenture, you must sign and date this Letter Agreement where indicated no later than twenty-one (21) days after the date you receive this Letter Agreement and return it to Accenture by email PDF or mail to the attention of Jill B. Smart as follows:
Separation Benefits
Jill B. Smart
Chief Human Resources Officer
161 North Clark Street
Chicago, IL 60601
jill.b.smart@accenture.com
Please email or mail the signed agreement in its entirety.
The terms and conditions of this Letter Agreement are set forth below.
 
In consideration of your acceptance of all of the terms and conditions of this Letter Agreement, Accenture will provide you with Separation Benefits as described below.
Separation Pay
Subject to the terms of this Letter Agreement, you will receive cash payments aggregating $3 million (the ""), of which $2 million will be payable in 12 equal monthly installments commencing on the first regular payroll date that is more than one month after the Termination Date (the ""), and the remaining $1 million will be payable in a single lump sum on the first anniversary of the Termination Date. If you die before receiving full payment of your separation payments, any remaining amounts otherwise payable pursuant to this Letter Agreement shall be paid to your estate.
Separation Pay
Payment Start Date
Equity Awards
You and Accenture hereby agree that, notwithstanding your voluntary termination of employment with Accenture, your outstanding equity awards shall partially vest and be released in the manner set forth on Exhibit A hereto. The portion of your equity awards that becomes or may become vested pursuant to the preceding sentence shall be referred to herein as your "".
Termination Equity Awards
Outplacement Services and Other Benefits
As additional consideration for signing the Letter Agreement, you shall be entitled to participate in a senior executive Professional Outplacement Services program to be provided by an outside firm selected by Accenture in accordance with the terms of the Plan. You shall receive from Accenture separate, detailed information about the Professional Outplacement Services program, including the types of available services, how to enroll, and the locations of available programs. You may not receive cash in lieu of the Professional Outplacement Services. You must enroll in the Professional Outplacement Services program between the Payment Start Date and 60 days thereafter in order to participate; enrollment is not automatic. Additionally, Accenture hereby acknowledges and agrees that following the Termination Date you will qualify for certain retiree health benefits pursuant to and subject to the terms and conditions of Accenture's retiree health plan. You shall retain your rights, if any, to indemnification from Accenture with respect to actions taken by you as an officer or director of Accenture or its Affiliates to the extent Accenture's or its Affiliates' charters and by-laws generally provide such indemnification rights to former officers and directors, and subject to the terms and conditions of such indemnification rights under the applicable charter and by-laws. Additionally, you will continue to be covered by the directors and officers liability insurance policies maintained by Accenture and its Affiliates on the same basis as is generally made available to former executives of Accenture, but subject to the terms and conditions of such policies. Finally, Accenture intends to send you its standard form D&O Questionnaire during the month of September 2012, and you agree to complete and return such form to Accenture within two weeks of its receipt by you.
 
As a material inducement to Accenture to enter into this Letter Agreement and as part of the consideration for the Separation Benefits offered to you, to which you agree you are not otherwise entitled, you are expressly agreeing to the general release and waiver of claims in this Section 2 (the ""). Under this General Release and Waiver of Claims, you hereby forever release, waive and discharge Accenture, its Affiliates and all of their present and former directors, officers, partners, employees, representatives, fiduciaries, attorneys and agents ("") from any and all claims of any nature whatsoever, known or unknown which you now have,
General Release and Waiver of Claims
Released Parties
or at any time may have had, against the Released Parties up to and including the Termination Date (""). This General Release and Waiver of Claims includes, without limitation, any Claims related to your employment, the Employment Agreement, the Plan, your equity award agreements and other employee benefits, your compensation, your activities on behalf of Accenture and its Affiliates, the termination of your employment, Claims of wrongful discharge, Claims of discrimination under the common law or any federal or state statute (including, without limitation, Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, the Americans with Disabilities Act and the Age Discrimination in Employment Act, all as amended), Claims relating to Accenture's or its Affiliates' intellectual property, Confidential Information and Trade Secrets, Claims of misrepresentation, Claims of detrimental reliance, and all other statutory, common law or other Claims of any nature whatsoever. This General Release and Waiver of Claims does not apply to any Claims concerning a breach of this Letter Agreement or any Claims arising after the Termination Date. As used in this Letter Agreement, the terms "" and "" shall have the meanings assigned to such terms under the Restrictive Covenant Agreement attached as Exhibit B hereto.
Claims
Confidential Information
Trade Secrets
With respect to the Claims you are waiving herein, you are waiving your right to receive money or other relief in any action instituted by you or on your behalf by any person, entity or government agency. You are also waiving any right to participate in any class, collective, or representative action against Accenture or any of its Affiliates (including, but not limited to, in the capacity of class representative, absent class member or opt-in plaintiff) with regard to any Claims released in this Letter Agreement and its General Release and Waiver of Claims. Nothing in this Letter Agreement shall limit the rights of any government agency or your right of access to, cooperation or participation with any government agency, including, without limitation, the United States Equal Employment Opportunity Commission.
 
You agree that you have been paid for all wages, bonuses, commissions and other compensation due to you as of the Termination Date. You will be paid your regular salary or wages through your Termination Date, as well as any paid-time off due in accordance with Accenture's policies. You shall submit all of your business expenses to Accenture for reimbursement within 10 days following the Termination Date, and Accenture shall thereafter promptly reimburse you for any such expenses in accordance with and subject to Accenture's standard expense reimbursement policies. To the extent that you have incurred any personal charges for which reimbursement is owed to Accenture or its Affiliates, you shall promptly repay such amounts to Accenture and, to the extent you have not made such repayments prior to the date when any portion of your Separation Pay is due, you hereby authorize Accenture to offset such amounts against the Separation Pay that you are otherwise entitled to receive hereunder.
 
You hereby acknowledge and agree that, except as provided in the last sentence of this Section 4, the restrictive covenants applicable to you pursuant to the terms of the Employment Agreement (including the Exhibits attached thereto) and pursuant to the various equity award agreements between you and Accenture shall remain in effect pursuant to the terms of such agreements after the Termination Date. Additionally, without limiting the preceding sentence, you hereby agree to be bound by the restrictive covenants set forth in Exhibit B attached hereto. You and Accenture hereby agree that, solely with respect to any restrictive covenants related to noncompetition and nonsolicitation of clients, prospective clients and employees (the ""), the restrictions provided under the Restrictive Covenant Agreement attached hereto as Exhibit B shall be the exclusive restrictions limiting your activities with respect to such matters; , , that in the event of your breach of such Noncompete/Nonsolicit Restrictions, the applicable provisions related to forfeiture and return of equity awards and other property contained in
Noncompete/Nonsolicit Restrictions
provided
however
any or all of your equity agreements and the applicable provisions relating to liquidated damages in your Employment Agreement shall apply to the same extent as if you had breached the restrictions contained in such other agreements related to noncompetition and nonsolicitation of clients, prospective clients and employees.
 
You agree that you shall forfeit and return to Accenture the full amount of Separation Benefits you received pursuant to this Letter Agreement, including, without limitation the number of shares of common stock underlying your Termination Equity Awards if (i) you subsequently threaten to or disclose any Trade Secrets or Confidential Information of Accenture or any of its Affiliates, clients or alliance partners, (ii) violate the terms of this Letter Agreement or any written covenants or agreements with Accenture or an Affiliate, including but not limited to non-compete, non-solicitation, confidentiality or trade secret provisions contained in your Employment Agreement or in any of your equity agreements or in Exhibit B attached hereto (after giving effect to the last sentence of Section 4 hereof), or (iii) otherwise engage in conduct that adversely affects Accenture's (or an Affiliate's) reputation or business relations. In addition, in the event of the situations described in the preceding sentence, you shall forfeit any right to and/or return (i) any previously undelivered Separation Benefits, (ii) any previously undelivered shares underlying the Termination Equity Awards and (iii) any equity awards (or the value thereof) that were vested or released prior to the date of this Letter Agreement in accordance with the terms of the relevant equity award agreements. As additional consideration for the Separation Benefits, you agree to inform Accenture of your employment plans during the 18-month period following the Termination Date. You hereby acknowledge and agree that in the event of any legal proceeding or arbitration between you and Accenture or its Affiliates with respect to the terms of this Letter Agreement or any other agreement between you and Accenture or its Affiliates, including, without limitation, with respect to the enforcement of any applicable noncompetition or nonsolicitation provisions, you shall be deemed to have voluntarily resigned from Accenture for personal reasons and the "employee choice" doctrine under New York State law shall be applicable with respect to any dispute related to your Separation Benefits pursuant to this Letter Agreement, including, without limitation, your Termination Equity Awards and any and all equity awards under any other equity award agreements.
 
This Letter Agreement, together with the Restrictive Covenant Agreement in the form attached hereto and the other Exhibits attached hereto, constitutes the full and entire understanding between you and Accenture and supersedes any other agreements of any kind with Accenture and its Affiliates, whether oral or written, formal or informal concerning the subject matter of these agreements, provided however, that you shall remain bound by and must comply with any continuing obligations under your Employment Agreement, and/or any intellectual property and/or confidentiality agreements with Accenture or any of its Affiliates (or with any third parties entered into as part of your employment with Accenture), and you must continue to comply with Accenture's applicable policies for former employees, including, without limitation, policies with respect to insider trading, intellectual property and confidentiality and any other policies that remain applicable beyond the Termination Date. Additionally, subject to Section 4, the restrictive covenant and cancellation and rescission provisions in your Employment Agreement and your equity award agreements with Accenture and its Affiliates will remain in effect.
 
If any provision of this Letter Agreement (including, without limitation, any portion of the General Release and Waiver of Claims) shall be held or deemed to be invalid, illegal, or unenforceable in any jurisdiction, for any reason, the invalidity of that provision shall not have the effect of rendering
the provision in question unenforceable in any other jurisdiction or in any other case or of rendering any other provisions herein unenforceable, but the invalid provision shall be substituted with a valid provision which most closely approximates the intent and the economic effect of the invalid provision and which would be enforceable to the maximum extent permitted in such jurisdiction or in such case. Any claim or cause of action by you against Accenture, whether predicated on this Letter Agreement, your Employment Agreement, the Restrictive Covenant Agreement attached hereto as Exhibit B or otherwise, shall not constitute a waiver of or excuse for non-compliance with your obligations hereunder.
 
This Letter Agreement is binding upon and shall inure to the benefit of you, your heirs, administrators, representatives and executors and upon the successors and assigns of Accenture. This Letter Agreement shall be governed by and construed and enforced in accordance with the laws of the State of New York, without regard to principles of conflicts of law. Any disputes with respect to this Letter Agreement shall be resolved in accordance with Section 5 of the Restrictive Covenant Agreement attached as Exhibit B hereto. This Letter Agreement may not be modified, other than by a written agreement executed by you and Accenture, nor may any provision hereof be waived other than by a writing executed by Accenture. The waiver by Accenture of any particular default by you shall not affect or impair the rights of Accenture with respect to any subsequent default by you of the same or of a different kind, nor shall any delay or omission by Accenture to exercise any right arising from any default by you affect or impair any rights that Accenture may have with respect to the same or any future default by you. Any communication, demand or notice to be given hereunder will be duly given (and shall be deemed to be received) when delivered in writing by hand or first class mail or by email to a party at its address as set forth in Section 7 of the Restrictive Covenant Agreement attached as Exhibit B hereto.
 
You are advised to review this Letter Agreement with an attorney of your choice before signing this Letter Agreement. In any event, you should thoroughly review and understand the effect of this Letter Agreement and its General Release and Waiver of Claims before signing below. You have up to twenty-one (21) days from the date you receive this Letter Agreement to complete your review and sign it. You acknowledge that if you sign this Letter Agreement prior to the expiration of the twenty-one (21) day period that you did so voluntarily, and you expressly waive any and all rights to consider this Letter Agreement for the balance of the 21-day review period. The Section of this Letter Agreement titled "GENERAL RELEASE AND WAIVER OF CLAIMS" includes a release of any claim you might have under the Age Discrimination in Employment Act (""). For seven days after the Termination Date, you have the right to revoke your release of ADEA Claims. To revoke your release of any ADEA Claims, you must submit a written notice of revocation to Accenture by email or mail (as directed on the first page of this Letter Agreement) no later than seven (7) days after the Termination Date. You should understand that revoking your release of ADEA Claims does not revoke your release of other claims that you have released in this Letter Agreement, nor does it affect the validity or remainder of this Letter Agreement in any way. If you exercise your right to revoke the release of ADEA Claims, you will forfeit the first $100,000 in Separation Pay that otherwise would have been payable to you pursuant to this Letter Agreement.
ADEA Claims
 
By signing this Letter Agreement, you agree and acknowledge that you have been represented by counsel and that you have carefully read and fully understand all of its provisions and that you are voluntarily entering into this Letter Agreement. By signing this Letter Agreement you agree and
acknowledge that you have not relied upon any promise, inducement, representation or statement, whether oral or in writing, made by Accenture or Accenture's agents, representatives or attorneys with regard to the subject matter, basis, or effect of this Letter Agreement, except as expressly set forth in this Letter Agreement.
 
You agree to cooperate fully with the Released Parties (without additional compensation) in connection with any dispute arising out of matters with which you were directly or indirectly involved while serving as a senior executive of Accenture. This cooperation shall include, but shall not be limited to, meeting with, and providing information to, Accenture and its Affiliates and their respective legal counsel, maintaining the confidentiality of any past or future privileged communications with Accenture's or its Affiliate's legal counsel (outside and in-house counsel), and making yourself available to testify truthfully by affidavit, in depositions, or in any other forum at the request of Accenture or any of its Affiliates. You understand that the term "cooperate" is without regard for whether the information or testimony you provide is favorable or unfavorable to Accenture and its Affiliates. You further agree that you will cooperate with and not take any actions against any employee of Accenture or its Affiliates in connection with your termination of employment. In connection with any cooperation that you provide at Accenture's request in accordance with this Section 11, you will be entitled to reimbursement for any reasonable out-of-pocket expenses for travel and accommodations that are pre-approved in writing by Accenture and incurred by you in connection with the performance of such services.
 
Except as otherwise required by law, you shall respond to any inquiries with respect to the circumstances of your termination of employment in a manner which is consistent with Exhibit C attached hereto, and you agree that you will not at any time during or subsequent to your employment with Accenture, make public statements which are materially inconsistent with Exhibit C. Additionally, you agree that you will not at any time during or subsequent to your employment with Accenture send any email, text or other written or electronic notifications to any employee of Accenture or its Affiliates, or post to any blog or social media vehicles, on topics relating to or arising out of your termination of employment without receiving prior written approval from Accenture.
If you wish to enter into this Letter Agreement with Accenture, please sign and date below and return it to Accenture within the time period and as directed on the first page and in Section 9 of this Letter Agreement.
We thank you for your service to Accenture and wish you the very best in the future.
 
I hereby acknowledge and agree that I have resigned voluntarily from Accenture for personal reasons. I have reviewed the Letter Agreement in its entirety. I understand its contents. I voluntarily agree to all of the terms and conditions of the Letter Agreement and the Restrictive Covenant Agreement attached as Exhibit B hereto.
 
 
 
This Restrictive Covenant Agreement ("") is between Accenture LLP and Accenture plc (collectively, "") and Kevin Campbell ("" and all similar references) as of March 1, 2012 (the ""). Capitalized terms used but not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings assigned thereto under Section 1 hereof.
Agreement
Accenture
You
Termination Date
WHEREAS, you acknowledge and agree that in the course of your employment with Accenture, you have been provided with Confidential Information including with respect to sensitive and proprietary information about the Clients, Prospective Clients, knowledge capital and business practices of Accenture and its Affiliates, among other information, and you were provided with the opportunity to develop relationships with Clients, Prospective Clients and alliance partners of Accenture and its Affiliates; and
WHEREAS, you acknowledge and agree that in the course of your employment with Accenture, you have been provided with access to Trade Secrets in accordance with protocols and procedures that you expressly acknowledge were appropriate to protect such Trade Secrets; and
WHEREAS, you acknowledge and agree that during your employment with Accenture, you did in the course of your employment customarily and regularly solicit for Accenture Clients or Prospective Clients and you obtained customer contacts and information; and
WHEREAS, you acknowledge and agree that such Confidential Information, Trade Secrets and relationships are extremely valuable assets in which Accenture and its Affiliates have invested and will continue to invest substantial time, effort and expense, and which Accenture and its Affiliates have properly protected; and
WHEREAS, you acknowledge and agree that your unauthorized or improper use or disclosure of Confidential Information or Trade Secrets will cause serious and irreparable harm to Accenture and its Affiliates, and that Accenture and its Affiliates would suffer significant and irreparable harm from you competing with Accenture for a period of time following your termination of employment; and
WHEREAS, you acknowledge and agree that the restrictions set forth in this Agreement are reasonable, fair, and necessary to protect Accenture's and its Affiliates' legitimate business interests in protecting its Confidential Information, Trade Secrets and client relationships; and
WHEREAS, this Agreement is being entered into in connection with your resignation from positions and termination of employment with Accenture and your entering into a letter agreement with Accenture contemporaneously with this Agreement as of the date hereof (the "");
Letter Agreement
NOW, THEREFORE, for good and valuable consideration (including, without limitation, the monetary and non-monetary consideration provided to you and the Separation Benefits pursuant to the Letter Agreement), you hereby covenant and agree to the following restrictions which you acknowledge and agree are reasonably designed to protect the legitimate business interests of Accenture and its Affiliates and which will not unreasonably restrict your professional opportunities following your termination of employment with Accenture:
Section 1. Non-Competition and Non-Solicitation Covenants
(a) . You shall not for a period of twelve (12) months following the date hereof (the ""):
General Restrictions
Restricted Period
(i) associate (including, but not limited to, association as a sole proprietor, owner, employer, partner, principal, investor, joint venture, shareholder, associate, employee, member, consultant, contractor or otherwise) with any Competitive Enterprise in the Territory and in connection with such association engage in Services; provided, however, that with respect to the equity of any Competitive Enterprise which is or becomes publicly traded, your ownership as a passive investor of less than 1% of the outstanding publicly traded stock of a Competitive Enterprise shall not be deemed a violation of Section 1(a)(i) of this Agreement;
(ii) directly or indirectly (a) solicit, or assist any other individual, person, firm or other entity in soliciting, any Client or Prospective Client for the purposes of performing or providing any Services within the Territory, or (b) perform or provide, or assist any other individual, person, firm or other entity in performing or providing, Services for any Client or Prospective Client within the Territory; or (c) interfere with or damage (or attempt to interfere with or damage) any relationship and/or agreement between Accenture or any of its Affiliates and a Client or Prospective Client; or
(iii) directly or indirectly, solicit, employ or retain, or assist any other individual, person, firm or other entity in soliciting, employing or retaining, any employee or other agent of Accenture or any of its Affiliates, including, without limitation, any former employee or other agent of Accenture or any of its Affiliates who ceased working for Accenture or any of its Affiliates within a twelve month period before or after your Termination Date (as defined in the Letter Agreement).
(b) . For purposes of this Agreement, the following definitions shall apply:
Certain Definitions
(i) The term "" has the meaning assigned to such term under the Letter Agreement.
Affiliate
(ii) The term "" shall mean, for a given employee in any given fiscal year, that employee's total compensation, including all base compensation, bonus compensation and any other compensation reported or to be reported on an IRS Form W-2 (or an IRS Form K-1, as the case may be) paid or payable by Accenture (or any Affiliate with which the employee was employed or otherwise associated and received reportable compensation, as the case may be) for such fiscal year.
Annual Compensation
(iii) The term "" shall mean any person, firm, corporation or other organization whatsoever for whom Accenture or any of its Affiliates provided services within a three year period before the date on which your employment with Accenture terminated.
Client
(iv) The term "" shall mean a business enterprise that engages in, or owns or controls a significant interest in any entity that engages in, the performance of Services. Without limiting the generality of the preceding sentence, the companies listed on Exhibit A attached hereto shall be considered Competitive Enterprises.
Competitive Enterprise
(v) The term "" shall mean data or other information relating to the business of Accenture, Accenture's Affiliates or their respective Clients, Prospective Clients or alliance partners that is or has been disclosed to you or of which you became aware as a consequence of or through your relationship with Accenture and its Affiliates and which has value to Accenture or its Affiliates, and is not generally known to their competitors, including but not limited to methods of operation, names of customers, pricing lists, pricing information, pricing and estimating methodologies, strategic plans, financial information and projections, personnel data, and similar information. Confidential Information shall not
Confidential Information
include any data or information that has been voluntarily disclosed to the public by Accenture or its Affiliates or their respective Clients, Prospective Clients or alliance partners (except where such public disclosure has been made by you without authorization) or that has been independently developed and disclosed by others, or that otherwise enters the public domain through lawful means.
(vi) The term "" has the meaning assigned to such term under the Letter Agreement.
Employment Agreement
(vii) The term "" shall mean any person, firm, corporation, or other organization whatsoever with whom Accenture or any of its Affiliates have had any negotiations or discussions regarding the possible performance of Services within the twelve months preceding your termination of employment with Accenture, provided that you either participated, directly or indirectly, in such negotiations or discussions or were aware of such discussions or negotiations prior to the Termination Date.
Prospective Client
(viii) The term "" shall mean the performance of any consulting, outsourcing or other services of the type conducted, offered or provided by Accenture or any of its Affiliates within three years prior to the Termination Date.
Services
(ix) The term "" shall mean to have any direct or indirect communication of any kind whatsoever, regardless of by whom initiated, inviting, advising, encouraging or requesting any person or entity, in any manner, to take or refrain from taking any action.
solicit
(x) The term "" shall mean the entire world.
Territory
(xi) The term "" shall mean information relating to Accenture, its Affiliates, Clients, Prospective Clients or alliance partners that is protectable as a trade secret
Trade Secrets
under applicable law, including, without limitation, and without regard to form: technical or non-technical data, a formula, a pattern, a compilation, a program, a device, a method, a technique, a drawing, a process, financial data, financial plans, business and strategic plans, product plans, source code, software, unpublished patent applications, customer proposals or pricing information or a list of actual or potential customers or suppliers which is not commonly known by or available to the public and which information (1) derives economic value, actual or potential, from not being generally known to, and not being readily ascertainable by proper means by, other persons who can obtain economic value from its disclosure or use and (2) is the subject of efforts that are reasonable under the circumstances to maintain its secrecy. For purposes of this Agreement, the term Trade Secret shall not include data or information that has been voluntarily disclosed to the public by Accenture or its Affiliates, Clients, Prospective Clients or alliance partners (except where such public disclosure has been made by you without authorization) or that has been independently developed and disclosed by others, or that otherwise enters the public domain through lawful means.
(c) . Accenture is authorized to waive any or all of the foregoing restrictions, or any portion thereof, provided, however, that Accenture must first obtain the written consent of such waiver of the Chief Executive Officer of Accenture plc and notice of any such waiver request by you must initially be provided in accordance with Section 7 hereof, who may grant or withhold such consent in his or her sole and absolute discretion.
Waivers
Section 2. Non-Disclosure of Confidential Information and Trade Secrets
(a) . You agree to and shall hold in confidence all Trade Secrets and all Confidential Information and will not, either directly or indirectly, use, sell, lend, lease, distribute, license, give, transfer, assign, show, disclose, disseminate, reproduce, copy,
Generally
appropriate, or otherwise communicate any Trade Secrets or Confidential Information to any person or entity, without the prior written consent of Accenture. Your obligation of non-disclosure as set forth herein shall continue for so long as such item continues to constitute a Trade Secret or Confidential Information. Your obligation of non-disclosure as set forth herein shall not apply if disclosure is ordered by a court having jurisdiction thereof but only if you have followed the notification requirements set forth in Section 2(b) below.
(b) . You will promptly notify Accenture in writing if you are requested or required pursuant to any legal, governmental or investigatory proceeding or process or otherwise, to disclose any Trade Secret or Confidential Information, so that Accenture may seek a protective order or other appropriate remedy, or, if it chooses, waive compliance with the applicable provision of this Agreement.
Notification Requirements
(c) . Nothing in this Agreement is intended to or should be interpreted as diminishing any rights and remedies Accenture has under applicable law related to the protection of Confidential Information or Trade Secrets.
No Diminishment of Rights
(d) . You agree that you will deliver to Accenture at the conclusion of your employment, and at any other time at Accenture's request, all property of Accenture and its Affiliates, and in furtherance thereof, you shall deliver a signed copy of the statement attached as Exhibit B hereto to Accenture on the Termination Date.
Return of Property
Section 3. Remedies Upon Breach
(a)
Damages
You agree that if you were to breach any provisions of this Agreement, Accenture and its Affiliates would suffer damages that are not readily ascertainable. Accordingly, in addition to or without limiting any remedies in law or in equity available to Accenture for the
breach of this Agreement, including, but not limited to, the provisions set forth under Section 4 of the Letter Agreement and injunctive and other equitable relief (including on an basis, to the extent permissible by law), you agree that in the event of a breach of this Agreement, the Letter Agreement or your Employment Agreement by you (after giving effect to Section 4 of the Letter Agreement), you shall be obligated to pay to Accenture a cash payment in an amount equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the Annual Compensation paid or payable to you by Accenture or any of its Affiliates over the course of the most recent complete full fiscal year of Accenture during which you were employed by Accenture or any of its Affiliates immediately preceding the fiscal year in which the breach occurs, as and for liquidated damages (""). You acknowledge and agree that the payment required by this Section 3 is a reasonable forecast of the damages likely to result from such breach and is not a penalty of any kind.
ex parte
Liquidated Damages
You further agree that the payment of Liquidated Damages shall not be construed as a release or waiver by Accenture of the right to prevent the continuation of any such breach of this Agreement in equity or otherwise and shall not preclude or be construed to preclude Accenture from making a showing of irreparable injury or any other element that may be necessary to secure injunctive relief.
(b)
Injunctive Relief
You acknowledge and agree that Accenture's remedy at law for any breach of the covenants contained herein would be inadequate and that for any breach of such covenants, Accenture shall, in addition to other remedies as may be available to it at law or in equity, or as provided for in this Agreement, be entitled to an injunction, restraining order, or other equitable relief, without the necessity of posting a bond, restraining you from commencing or continuing
to commit any violation of the covenants. You agree that proof shall not be required that monetary damages for breach of the provisions of this Agreement would be difficult to calculate and that remedies at law would be inadequate.
Section 4. Governing Law
This Agreement shall be governed by and construed and enforced in accordance with the laws of the State of New York, without regard to principles of conflicts of law.
Section 5. Resolution of Disputes
(a) Disputes under this Agreement, the Letter Agreement, your Employment Agreement (including the exhibits thereto) and any equity award agreements between you and Accenture or any of its Affiliates shall be resolved as set forth below, and the provisions set forth below shall supersede and replace any dispute resolution provisions otherwise contained in any and all such other agreements. References in this Section 5 to disputes related to "this Agreement" shall be deemed to also refer to disputes under any other agreements described in the preceding sentence.
(b) Subject to paragraphs (c) through (e), any and all disputes which cannot be settled amicably, including any claims of any party, arising out of, relating to or in connection with the validity, negotiation, execution, interpretation, performance or nonperformance of any or all noncompetition or nonsolicitation obligations, Trade Secrets or Confidential Information, nondisclosure obligations or any other obligations and/or termination of this Agreement and any amendment thereto (including without limitation the validity, scope and enforceability of this arbitration provision) (each a "") shall be finally settled by arbitration conducted by a single arbitrator in New York (or at such other place of arbitration as the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of Accenture may approve) in accordance with the then-
Dispute
existing Rules of Arbitration of the International Chamber of Commerce (""), except that the parties may select an arbitrator who is a national of the same country as one of the parties. If the parties to the dispute fail to agree on the selection of an arbitrator within thirty (30) days of the receipt of the request for arbitration, the ICC shall make the appointment. The arbitrator shall be a lawyer and shall conduct the proceedings in the English language.
ICC
(c) Either party may bring an action or proceeding in any court of law for the purpose of compelling a party to arbitrate, seeking temporary or preliminary relief in aid of an arbitration hereunder, and/or enforcing an arbitration award and/or in support of the arbitration as permitted by any applicable arbitration law and, for the purposes of this paragraph (c), each party expressly consents to the application of paragraphs (d) and (e) to any such suit, action or proceeding.
(d) Judgment on any award(s) rendered by the tribunal may be entered in any court having jurisdiction thereof.
(e) (i) Each party hereby irrevocably submits to the exclusive jurisdiction of the Courts located in New York, United States for the purpose of any suit, action or proceeding brought in accordance with the provisions of paragraphs (c) or (d). The parties acknowledge that the forum designated by this paragraph (e) has a reasonable relation to this Agreement, and to the parties' relationship with one another.
(ii) The parties hereby waive, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, any objection which they now or hereafter may have to personal jurisdiction or to the laying of venue of any suit, action or proceeding brought in any court referred to in paragraph (e) (i) pursuant to paragraphs (c) or (d) and such parties agree not to plead or claim the same.
Section 6. Amendment; Waiver
This Agreement may not be modified, other than by a written agreement executed by you and Accenture, nor may any provision hereof be waived other than by a writing executed by Accenture.
The waiver by Accenture of any particular default by you shall not affect or impair the rights of Accenture with respect to any subsequent default by you of the same or of a different kind, nor shall any delay or omission by Accenture to exercise any right arising from any default by you affect or impair any rights that Accenture may have with respect to the same or any future default by you.
Section 7. Notice
Any communication, demand or notice to be given hereunder will be duly given (and shall be deemed to be received) when delivered in writing by hand or first class mail or by email to a party at its address as indicated below:
If to Accenture,
Accenture LLP
161 North Clark Street
Chicago, IL 60601
jill.b.smart@accenture.com
Attention: Chief Human Resources Officer
(or, if different, the then-current principal business address of the duly appointed Chief Human Resources Officer of Accenture LLP)
and to:
Accenture plc
161 North Clark Street
Chicago, IL 60601
julie.sweet@accenture.com
Attention: General Counsel
(or, if different, the then-current notice address of the duly appointed General Counsel of Accenture plc)
If to you, to:
Kevin Campbell
2875 Darlington Point
Duluth, GA 30097
and to:
Cohen Pollock Merlin & Small, P.C.
3350 Riverwood Parkway
Suite 1600
Atlanta, GA 30339
pfriedman@cpmas.com
Attention: Pepi Friedman
You agree to notify Accenture of any change in address by giving Accenture notice of such change in accordance with the provisions of this Section 7.
Section 8. Severability; Reformation
If any provision of this Agreement shall be held or deemed to be invalid, illegal, or unenforceable in any jurisdiction, for any reason, the invalidity of that provision shall not have the effect of rendering the provision in question unenforceable in any other jurisdiction or in any other case or of rendering any other provisions herein unenforceable, but the invalid provision shall be substituted with a valid provision which most closely approximates the intent and the economic effect of the invalid provision and which would be enforceable to the maximum extent permitted in such jurisdiction or in such case. Any claim or cause of action by you against Accenture, whether predicated on this Agreement, your Employment Agreement (as defined in the Letter Agreement), your Letter Agreement or otherwise, shall not constitute a waiver of or excuse for non-compliance with your obligations hereunder. You also agree not to challenge or raise any equitable defenses to the enforceability of the restrictive covenants contained in this Agreement.
Section 9. Entire Agreement
This Agreement, together with the Letter Agreement and the other exhibits attached thereto, constitutes the full and entire understanding between you and Accenture and supersedes any other agreements of any kind with Accenture and its Affiliates, whether oral or written, formal or informal concerning the subject matter of these agreements, provided however, that you shall remain bound by and must comply with any continuing obligations under your Employment Agreement, and/or any intellectual property and/or confidentiality agreements with Accenture or any of its Affiliates (or with any third parties entered into as part of your employment with Accenture), and you must continue to comply with Accenture's applicable policies for former employees, including, without limitation, policies with respect to insider trading, intellectual property and confidentiality and any other policies that remain applicable beyond the Termination Date. Additionally, subject to Section 4 of the Letter Agreement, the restrictive covenant and cancellation and rescission provisions in your Employment Agreement and your equity award agreements with Accenture and its Affiliates will remain in effect.
Section 10. Further Assurance
You agree to execute all such further instruments and documents and to take all such further action as may be reasonably necessary to effect the terms and purposes of this Agreement.
Section 11. Execution in Counterparts
This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be deemed an original, but all such counterparts shall together constitute one agreement.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have duly executed or caused to be duly executed this Restrictive Covenant Agreement as of the date first above written.
 
Capitalized terms used in this termination certification (the "") but not otherwise defined shall have the meanings assigned to such terms under my Restrictive Covenant Agreement with Accenture LLP and Accenture plc, dated as of March 1, 2012. This is to certify that, except as provided below, I do not have in my possession, nor have I failed to return: (1) computer software in any form or medium belonging to Accenture and/or any of its Affiliates (collectively, "the ") or any of its Clients or Prospective Clients or alliance partners; (2) any information or materials intended to be of a confidential nature and in any way pertaining to any of the Company's computer software products or those of its Clients or Prospective Clients or alliance partners; (3) any information or materials intended to be of a confidential nature obtained during the course of my employment by the Company; (4) any records, documents, data, laboratory sketches, notes, reports, proposals, or copies of them, or other documents or materials, equipment or other property belonging to the Company, or any of its Clients or Prospective Clients or alliance partners; or (5) any responsive data or documents that have been preserved in compliance to an existing "hold notice". With respect to Accenture's TelePresence unit, telephone, other home office equipment and any other property belonging to Accenture presently located in my home, I will cooperate with Accenture in arranging a mutually acceptable time within ten (10) days following the Termination Date to return such equipment.
Termination Certification
Company
I further certify that I have complied with and will continue to comply with all the terms of the Company's policies as set forth in the "Accenture Policies" database, and in particular the policies reflected therein relating to confidentiality and intellectual property rights. I acknowledge having read and understood my obligations stated in such policies within the Accenture Policies database, shortly after the commencement of my employment with the Company. I hereby reaffirm my understanding of these obligations.
I certify that I have fully and completely reported to the Company any inventions and original works of authorship, conceived or made by me (solely or jointly with others), during the course of my employment with the Company, to which the Company retains all rights of ownership. I further agree that I will preserve as confidential all Trade Secrets and Confidential Information, data or other proprietary information relating to products, processes, know-how, designs, mask works, formulas, test data, computer programs and databases and other original works of authorship, consumer lists, business plans, marketing plans and strategies and pricing strategies or other subject matter pertaining to any business of the Company or any of its Clients, Prospective Clients, customers, consultants, licensees or Affiliates.
This is my official acknowledgment of the Termination Certification document, and I hereby confirm that I have read the document and agree to the conditions contained therein.
Dated: , 2012
3/1
 
Kevin Campbell has resigned from Accenture LLP for personal reasons. Mr. Campbell held the position of group chief executive of the Technology growth platform since August 2009. In connection with his departure from Accenture, Accenture entered into an agreement with Mr. Campbell, pursuant to which, among other items, Mr. Campbell has agreed that he will not compete with the company or solicit its clients or employees during the 12-month period following his separation from Accenture. In exchange for agreeing to the terms of the agreement, along with signing a general release of claims in favor of Accenture, Mr. Campbell will be entitled to receive certain payments and benefits as set forth in the agreement

EXHIBIT 99
NEW YORK; March 1, 2012  Accenture (NYSE: ACN) announced today that Martin I. Cole, 55, has been named group chief executive of the company's Technology growth platform, effective immediately. He succeeds Kevin Campbell who has resigned from the company for personal reasons. Mr. Campbell has held the position of group chief executive of the Technology growth platform since August 2009.
Until a successor is named, Mr. Cole will also continue to serve as group chief executive of Accenture's Communications, Media & Technology operating group, a position he has held since September 2006. In addition, Mr. Cole leads Mobility, one of Accenture's company-wide strategic growth initiatives.
Previously, Mr. Cole held a wide variety of leadership roles including group chief executive of Accenture's Public Service operating group. From 2000 to 2004, Mr. Cole led Accenture's Outsourcing & Infrastructure Delivery group, where he oversaw the execution of the company's outsourcing strategy, including responsibility for the global delivery capability of Accenture's business process outsourcing services.
"Marty is a great leader with a proven track record of successfully running key parts of our business," said Pierre Nanterme, Accenture's Chief Executive Officer. "He has tremendous knowledge of our business and operations, and has a unique understanding of the global marketplace, competitive landscape and technology ecosystem. He is client focused and has a track record of building outstanding teams. We expect a seamless transition."
About Accenture
Accenture is a global management consulting, technology services and outsourcing company, with more than 244,000 people serving clients in more than 120 countries. Combining unparalleled experience, comprehensive capabilities across all industries and business functions, and extensive research on the world's most successful companies, Accenture collaborates with clients to help them become high-performance businesses and governments. The company generated net revenues of US$25.5 billion for the fiscal year ended Aug. 31, 2011. Its home page is
www.accenture.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ACN/ACN-8K-20120322161040.txt.gz
TIME:20120322161040
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition
On March 22, 2012, Accenture issued a press release announcing financial results for itssecond quarter of fiscal year 2012, which fiscal quarter ended on February 29, 2012.
A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1. All information in the press release is furnished but not filed.
Non-GAAP Financial Information
In the attached press release Accenture discloses the following non-GAAP financial measures:
 
 
Reconciliations of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable financial measures calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP are included in the press release. While Accenture's management believes that this non-GAAP financial information is useful in evaluating Accenture's operations, this information should be considered as supplemental in nature and not as a substitute for the related financial information prepared in accordance with GAAP.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
NEW YORK; March 22, 2012  Accenture (NYSE: ACN) reported strong financial results for the second quarter of fiscal 2012, ended Feb. 29, 2012, with net revenues of $6.8 billion, an increase of 12 percent in U.S. dollars and 13 percent in local currency over the same period last year and at the top end of the company's guided range. Diluted earnings per share were $0.97, an increase of $0.22 over the same period last year, driven principally by higher revenue and operating income, as well as a lower effective tax rate in the quarter.
Operating income was $889 million, an increase of 15 percent over the same period last year, and operating margin was 13.1 percent.
New bookings for the quarter were $7.94 billion, with consulting bookings of $4.05 billion and outsourcing bookings of $3.89 billion.
Pierre Nanterme, Accenture's chief executive officer, said, "We are very pleased with our second-quarter performance, which included strong revenue growth in all five operating groups and all three geographic regions. We're also pleased with our profitability  both the growth in EPS and the expansion of operating margin  due to the disciplined management of our business. We continued to see solid demand for our services, as demonstrated by outstanding bookings of nearly $8 billion, and our balance sheet remains very strong.
"Given our strong results for the first half of fiscal 2012, we've raised our outlook for revenue growth and EPS for the year. We continue to invest to further differentiate our industry and technology capabilities and remain focused on gaining market share and driving profitable growth."
Financial Review
Revenues before reimbursements ("net revenues") for the second quarter of fiscal 2012 were $6.8 billion, compared with $6.1 billion for the second quarter of fiscal 2011, an increase of 12 percent in U.S. dollars and 13 percent in local currency.
 
Diluted EPS for the quarter were $0.97, compared with $0.75 for the second quarter last year, an increase of $0.22, or 29 percent. The $0.22 increase in EPS reflects:
 
Gross margin (gross profit as a percentage of net revenues) for the quarter was 31.1 percent, compared with 31.7 percent for the second quarter last year. Selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses for the second quarter were $1.23 billion, or approximately 18.0 percent of net revenues, compared with $1.15 billion, or 18.9 percent of net revenues, for the second quarter last year.
Operating income for the quarter increased 15 percent, to $889 million, or 13.08 percent of net revenues, from $772 million, or 12.74 percent of net revenues, for the second quarter of fiscal 2011, an expansion of 34 basis points.
The company's effective tax rate for the quarter was 20.5 percent, compared with 26.9 percent for the second quarter last year. The lower effective tax rate in the second quarter this year was primarily due to higher benefits related to final determinations of tax liabilities for prior years, partially offset by increases in tax reserves.
Net income for the quarter was $714 million, compared with $566 million for the second quarter last year, an increase of 26 percent.
Operating cash flow for the quarter was $858 million, and property and equipment additions were $85 million. Free cash flow, defined as operating cash flow net of property and equipment additions, was $772 million. For the same period last year, operating cash flow was $601 million; property and equipment additions were $79 million; and free cash flow was $523 million.
Days services outstanding, or DSOs, were 29 days, compared with 30 days at Aug. 31, 2011 and 32 days at Feb. 28, 2011.
Accenture's total cash balance at Feb. 29, 2012 was $5.6 billion, compared with $5.7 billion at Aug. 31, 2011.
Utilization for the quarter was 87 percent. Attrition for the second quarter of fiscal 2012 was 12 percent, compared with 12 percent for the first quarter of fiscal 2012 and 14 percent for the second quarter of fiscal 2011.
New Bookings
New bookings for the second quarter were $7.94 billion and reflect a negative 1 percent foreign-currency impact compared with new bookings in the second quarter last year.
 
 
Net Revenues by Operating Group
Net revenues by operating group were as follows:
 
 
 
 
 
Net Revenues by Geographic Region
Net revenues by geographic region were as follows:
 
 
 
Returning Cash to Shareholders
Accenture continues to return cash to shareholders through cash dividends and share repurchases.
Dividend
Accenture plc has declared a semi-annual cash dividend of 67.5 cents per share on Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares for shareholders of record at the close of business on April 13, 2012, and Accenture SCA will declare a semi-annual cash dividend of 67.5 cents per share on Accenture SCA Class I common shares for shareholders of record at the close of business on April 10, 2012. These dividends are both payable on May 15, 2012.
Combined with the semi-annual cash dividend of 67.5 cents per share paid on Nov. 15, 2011, this brings the total dividend payments for the fiscal year to $1.35 per share, for total projected cash dividend payments of approximately $945 million.
Share Repurchase Activity
During the second quarter of fiscal 2012, Accenture repurchased or redeemed 8.6 million shares for a total of $465 million, including 6.5 million shares repurchased in the open market. This brings Accenture's total share repurchases and redemptions for the first half of fiscal 2012 to 13.9 million shares, for a total of $750 million, including 9.9 million shares repurchased in the open market.
Accenture's total remaining share repurchase authority at Feb. 29, 2012 was approximately $5.5 billion.
At Feb. 29, 2012, Accenture had approximately 705 million total shares outstanding, including 644 million Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares and 60 million Accenture SCA Class I common shares and Accenture Canada Holdings Inc. exchangeable shares.
Business Outlook
Third Quarter Fiscal 2012
Accenture expects net revenues for the third quarter of fiscal 2012 to be in the range of $7.05 billion to $7.25 billion. This range assumes a foreign-exchange impact of negative 3 percent compared with the third quarter of fiscal 2011.
Full Fiscal Year 2012
For fiscal 2012, the company has raised its outlook for revenue growth to the range of 10 percent to 12 percent in local currency, up from its previous range of 7 percent to 10 percent in local currency.
Accenture's business outlook for the full 2012 fiscal year continues to assume a foreign-exchange impact of negative 1 percent compared with fiscal 2011.
The company has raised its outlook for diluted EPS for fiscal 2012 to the range of $3.82 to $3.90. This revised range is $0.06 higher than the company's previous outlook of $3.76 to $3.84, based primarily on the company's increased outlook for revenue.
Accenture continues to expect operating margin for the full fiscal year to be in the range of 13.7 percent to 13.9 percent, an expansion of 10 to 30 basis points.
The company now expects operating cash flow to be $3.65 billion to $3.95 billion; property and equipment additions to be $450 million; and free cash flow to be in the range of $3.2 billion to $3.5 billion. The company continues to expect its annual effective tax rate to be in the range of 27 percent to 28 percent.
Accenture now expects new bookings for the full fiscal year to be in the upper half of its previously guided range of $28 billion to $31 billion.
Conference Call and Webcast Details
Accenture will host a conference call at 4:30 p.m. EDT today to discuss its second-quarter fiscal 2012 financial results. To participate, please dial +1 (800) 230-1096 [+1 (612) 288-0337 outside the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada] approximately 15 minutes before the scheduled start of the call. The conference call will also be accessible live on the Investor Relations section of the Accenture Web site at www.accenture.com.
A replay of the conference call will be available online at www.accenture.com beginning at 7:00 p.m. EDT today, Thursday, March 22, and continuing until Wednesday, June 27, 2012. A podcast of the conference call will be available online at www.accenture.com beginning approximately 24 hours after the call and continuing until Wednesday, June 27. The replay will also be available via telephone by dialing +1 (800) 475-6701 [+1 (320) 365-3844 outside the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada] and entering access code 235944 from 7:00 p.m. EDT today, Thursday, March 22, through Wednesday, June 27.
About Accenture
Accenture is a global management consulting, technology services and outsourcing company, with more than 246,000 people serving clients in more than 120 countries. Combining unparalleled experience, comprehensive capabilities across all industries and business functions, and extensive research on the world's most successful companies, Accenture collaborates with clients to help them become high-performance businesses and governments. The company generated net revenues of US$25.5 billion for the fiscal year ended Aug. 31, 2011. Its home page is www.accenture.com.
Non-GAAP Financial Information
This press release includes certain non-GAAP financial information as defined by Securities and Exchange Commission Regulation G. Pursuant to the requirements of this regulation, reconciliations of this non-GAAP financial information to Accenture's financial statements as prepared under generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) are included in this press release. Financial results "in local currency" are calculated by restating current-period activity into U.S. dollars using the comparable prior-year period's foreign-currency exchange rates. Accenture's management believes providing investors with this information gives additional insights into Accenture's results of operations. While Accenture's management believes that the non-GAAP financial measures herein are useful in evaluating Accenture's operations, this information should be considered as supplemental in nature and not as a substitute for the related financial information prepared in accordance with GAAP.
Forward-Looking Statements
Except for the historical information and discussions contained herein, statements in this news release may constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve a number of risks, uncertainties and other factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed or implied. These include, without limitation, risks that: the company's results of operations could be adversely affected by volatile, negative or uncertain economic conditions and the effects of these conditions on the company's clients' businesses and levels of business activity; the company's business depends on generating and maintaining ongoing, profitable client demand for the company's services and solutions, and a significant reduction in such demand could materially affect the company's results of operations; if the company is unable to keep its supply of skills and resources in balance with client demand around the world and attract and retain professionals with strong leadership skills, the company's business, the utilization rate of the company's professionals and the company's results of operations may be materially adversely affected; the consulting and outsourcing markets are highly competitive, and the company might not be able to compete effectively; the company's results of operations (including its net revenues and operating income) and the value of balance-sheet items originally denominated in other currencies could be materially adversely affected by unfavorable fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates or changes to existing currencies; the company could have liability or the company's reputation could be damaged if the company fails to protect client and company data or information systems as obligated by law or contract or if the company's information systems are breached; the company's Global Delivery Network is increasingly concentrated in India and the Philippines, which may expose it to operational risks; as a result of the company's geographically diverse operations and its growth strategy to continue geographic expansion, the company is more susceptible to certain risks; the company's results of operations could materially suffer if the company is not able to obtain sufficient pricing to enable it to meet its profitability expectations; if the company's pricing estimates do not accurately anticipate the cost, risk and complexity of the company performing its work or third parties upon which it relies do not meet their commitments, then the company's contracts could have delivery inefficiencies and be unprofitable; the company's work with government clients exposes the company to additional risks inherent in the government contracting environment, including risks related to governmental budget and debt constraints; the company's business could be materially adversely affected if it incurs legal liability in connection with providing its services and solutions; the company's results of operations and ability to grow could be materially negatively affected if the company cannot adapt and expand its services and solutions in response to ongoing changes in technology and offerings by new entrants; outsourcing services subject the company to different operational risks than its consulting and systems integration services; the company's services or solutions could infringe upon the intellectual property rights of others or the company might lose its ability to utilize the intellectual property of others; the company has only a limited ability to protect its intellectual property rights, which are important to the company's success; the company's ability to attract and retain business and employees may depend on its reputation in the marketplace; the company's alliance relationships may not be successful or may change, which could adversely affect the company's results of operations; the company may not be successful at identifying, acquiring or integrating other businesses; the company's profitability could suffer if its cost-management strategies are unsuccessful, and the company may not be able to improve its profitability through improvements to cost-management to the degree it has done in the past; many of the company's contracts include performance payments that link some of its fees to the attainment of performance or business targets and/or require the company to meet specific service levels, which could increase the variability of the company's revenues and impact its margins; changes in the company's level of taxes, and audits, investigations and tax proceedings, or changes in the company's treatment as an Irish company, could have a
material adverse effect on the company's results of operations and financial condition; if the company is unable to manage the organizational challenges associated with its size, the company might be unable to achieve its business objectives; if the company is unable to collect its receivables or unbilled services, the company's results of operations, financial condition and cash flows could be adversely affected; the company's share price and results of operations could fluctuate and be difficult to predict; the company's results of operations and share price could be adversely affected if it is unable to maintain effective internal controls; the company may be subject to criticism and negative publicity related to its incorporation in Ireland; as well as the risks, uncertainties and other factors discussed under the "Risk Factors" heading in Accenture plc's most recent annual report on Form 10-K and other documents filed with or furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission. Statements in this news release speak only as of the date they were made, and Accenture undertakes no duty to update any forward-looking statements made in this news release or to conform such statements to actual results or changes in Accenture's expectations.
Contact:
Roxanne Taylor
Accenture
+1 (917) 452-5106
roxanne.taylor@accenture.com
 
 
 
 
n/m = not meaningful
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ACN/ACN-8K-20120413161753.txt.gz
TIME:20120413161753
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On April 13, 2012, Accenture plc (the "Company") issued a press release announcing that Robert E. Sell has been named group chief executive of the Company's Communications, Media & Technology operating group. A copy of the Company's press release is attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
NEW YORK; April 13, 2012  Accenture (NYSE: ACN) announced today that Robert E. Sell has been named group chief executive of the company's Communications, Media & Technology operating group, effective immediately. He succeeds Martin I. Cole, who was named group chief executive of the company's Technology growth platform in March.
Mr. Sell, 50, has served as managing director of Communications, Media & Technology in North America since August 2007. He has significant experience across many industries and has held a variety of leadership roles during his 28-year career with Accenture. Mr. Sell has also managed the business relationships with some of Accenture's largest global clients. Given the clients he has served and the scope of his work, Mr. Sell has a unique perspective on the current state of technology and innovation.
"Bob is an outstanding leader with a proven track record of successfully running key parts of our business," said Pierre Nanterme, Accenture's Chief Executive Officer. "His ability to build major client relationships and his commitment to our people make him the perfect choice to be group chief executive of our Communications, Media & Technology operating group."
About Accenture
Accenture is a global management consulting, technology services and outsourcing company, with more than 246,000 people serving clients in more than 120 countries. Combining unparalleled experience, comprehensive capabilities across all industries and business functions, and extensive research on the world's most successful companies, Accenture collaborates with clients to help them become high-performance businesses and governments. The company generated net revenues of US$25.5 billion for the fiscal year ended Aug. 31, 2011. Its home page is www.accenture.com.
Contact:
Alex Pachetti
Accenture
+1 917 452-5519
Alex.pachetti@accenture.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ACN/ACN-8K-20120501161803.txt.gz
TIME:20120501161803
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On April 27, 2012, the Board of Directors (the "Board") of Accenture plc (the "Company") appointed Gilles C. Plisson as a new director of the Company, upon the recommendation of its Nominating & Governance Committee. Mr. Plisson will serve until the Company's 2013 annual general meeting of shareholders, when he will be subject to re-appointment by a vote of the Company's shareholders.
Mr. Plisson began his career with Accor SA ("Accor") in the United States and then served as Senior Vice President for Accor's Asia-Pacific region. In 1995, Mr. Plisson was appointed Chief Executive Officer of Disneyland Paris Resort and later added the title of Chairman. He also served as Chairman and Chief Executive Officer at Bouygues Telecom. Mr. Plisson rejoined Accor as CEO in 2006 and later was also appointed Chairman. He served at Accor until January 2011.
Mr. Plisson joins the Board as a Class III director and has been appointed to serve on the Board's Audit Committee. He will receive the pro rata portion of the standard compensation for service on the Board (currently $90,000 per annum) and the Audit Committee (currently $5,000 per annum), based on the number of days remaining in the current director compensation year. Mr. Plisson may elect to receive this compensation in cash or equity. Mr. Plisson will also receive the standard grant of restricted share units valued at $185,000 made by the Company to directors newly appointed to the Board.
The Company expects Mr. Plisson to enter into the standard director indemnification agreement that Accenture International Srl, an indirect subsidiary of the Company, has with the Company's directors. A copy of a substantially similar form of the indemnification agreement is filed as Exhibit 10.5 to the Company's Form 8-K12B filed on September 1, 2009.
A copy of the Company's press release issued on May 1, 2012, regarding Mr. Plisson's appointment to the Board is filed as Exhibit 99 to this Form 8-K.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 99
NEW YORK; May 1, 2012  Accenture today announced that Gilles C. Plisson has been appointed to the company's Board of Directors, effective April 27. Mr. Plisson, 54, is an experienced business leader who most recently served as Chairman and CEO of Accor SA, the Paris-based global hotel group.
Mr. Plisson joins the board as a Class III director, subject to re-appointment at the next Accenture plc annual general meeting of shareholders. He has been appointed to serve on the board's Audit Committee.
"We are very excited to have Gilles join our board of directors," said William D. Green, Accenture's Executive Chairman. "He is a highly accomplished executive with significant international experience as both a CEO and director of large, global companies. I know I speak for all of our board members when I say that we look forward to the valuable perspective Gilles will provide related to Accenture's strategy, operations and management as we remain focused on providing exceptional results for our clients and shareholders."
With the appointment, Accenture's board now comprises 13 directors, 11 of whom are external and independent. Mr. Green and CEO Pierre Nanterme are the board's only internal directors.
Mr. Plisson began his career with Accor in the United States and then served as Senior Vice President for Accor's Asia-Pacific region. In 1995, Mr. Plisson was appointed Chief Executive Officer of Disneyland Paris Resort and later added the title of Chairman. He also served as Chairman and Chief Executive Officer at Bouygues Telecom. Mr. Plisson rejoined Accor as CEO in 2006 and later was also appointed Chairman. He served at Accor until January 2011.
Mr. Plisson serves on the board of directors of BIC SA, TF1 Group, Groupe Lucien Barrire and NH Hoteles.
Mr. Plisson studied at ESSEC (cole Suprieure des Sciences conomiques et Commerciales) in Paris and holds an M.B.A. from the Harvard Business School.
About Accenture
Accenture is a global management consulting, technology services and outsourcing company, with more than 246,000 people serving clients in more than 120 countries. Combining unparalleled experience, comprehensive capabilities across all industries and business functions, and extensive research on the world's most successful companies, Accenture collaborates with clients to help them become high-performance businesses and governments. The company generated net revenues of US$25.5 billion for the fiscal year ended Aug. 31, 2011. Its home page is .
www.accenture.com
Contact:
Alex Pachetti
Accenture
+1 (917) 452-5519
alex.pachetti@accenture.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ACN/ACN-8K-20120628160356.txt.gz
TIME:20120628160356
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, DC 20549
____________________ 
Form 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 ____________________
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): June 28, 2012
Accenture plc
(Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter)
 
1 Grand Canal Square,
Grand Canal Harbour,
Dublin 2, Ireland
(Address of principal executive offices)
Registrants telephone number, including area code: (353) (1) 646-2000
Not Applicable
(Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (
see
General Instruction A.2. below):
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition
On June 28, 2012, Accenture plc (Accenture) issued a press release announcing financial results for its third quarter of fiscal year 2012, which fiscal quarter ended on May 31, 2012.
A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99. All information in the press release is furnished but not filed.
Non-GAAP Financial Information
In the attached press release Accenture discloses the following non-GAAP financial measures:
Reconciliations of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable financial measures calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP are included in the press release. While Accentures management believes that this non-GAAP financial information is useful in evaluating Accentures operations, this information should be considered as supplemental in nature and not as a substitute for the related financial information prepared in accordance with GAAP.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) Exhibits
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 99
Accenture Reports Solid Third-Quarter Fiscal 2012 Results,
With Record Quarterly Revenues and EPS
 Revenues increase 6% in U.S. dollars and 9% in local currency, to $7.2 billion 
 EPS up 11%, to $1.03 
 Operating income increases 12%, to $1.06 billion, with operating margin of 14.8% 
 New bookings are $7.3 billion, with consulting bookings of $4.05 billion
and outsourcing bookings of $3.24 billion 
 Company continues to expect full-year revenue growth in range of
10% to 12% in local currency 
    
NEW YORK; June 28, 2012  Accenture (NYSE: ACN) reported financial results in line with its guided range for the third quarter of fiscal 2012, ended May 31, 2012. Net revenues were $7.2 billion, an increase of 6 percent in U.S. dollars and 9 percent in local currency over the same period last year. Diluted earnings per share were $1.03, an increase of $0.10 over the same period last year, driven principally by higher revenue and operating results.
Operating income was $1.06 billion, an increase of 12 percent over the same period last year, and operating margin was 14.8 percent, compared with 14.1 percent for the same period last year.
New bookings for the quarter were $7.29 billion, with consulting bookings of $4.05 billion and outsourcing bookings of $3.24 billion.
Pierre Nanterme, Accentures chief executive officer, said, We are pleased with our third-quarter performance.  Our revenue growth in local currency was broad-based across all five operating groups and all three geographic regions, with particularly strong growth in outsourcing revenues. Quarterly new bookings of $7.3 billion took us to $23 billion for the first three quarters of the year, positioning us very well to achieve our annual outlook. Our balance sheet remains very strong, with a cash balance of $5.6 billion.
While we continue to monitor the global economic environment, our highly diversified portfolio of business continues to position us well to drive profitable growth and deliver value to our clients and shareholders.
Financial Review
Revenues before reimbursements (net revenues) for the third quarter of fiscal 2012 were $7.2 billion, compared with $6.7 billion for the third quarter of fiscal 2011, an increase of 6 percent in U.S. dollars and 9 percent in local currency.
 
Diluted EPS for the quarter were $1.03, compared with $0.93 for the third quarter last year, an increase of $0.10, or 11 percent. The $0.10 increase in EPS reflects:
partially offset by:
Gross margin (gross profit as a percentage of net revenues) for the quarter was 33.1 percent, compared with 34.4 percent for the third quarter last year. Selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses for the third quarter were $1.31 billion, or 18.3 percent of net revenues, compared with $1.36 billion, or 20.2 percent of net revenues, for the third quarter last year. SG&A costs in the third quarter last year included a $75 million provision, with an impact of 110 basis points, for litigation matters.
Operating income for the quarter was $1.06 billion, or 14.8 percent of net revenues, compared with $949 million, or 14.1 percent of net revenues, for the third quarter of fiscal 2011, an expansion of 70 basis points.
The companys effective tax rate for the quarter was 28.5 percent, compared with 27.0 percent for the third quarter last year. The higher rate in the third quarter this year was primarily due to a net increase in reserves and a change in the geographic mix of income.
Net income for the quarter was $763 million, compared with $699 million for the third quarter last year, an increase of 9 percent.
Operating cash flow for the quarter was $1.22 billion, and property and equipment additions were $90 million. Free cash flow, defined as operating cash flow net of property and equipment additions, was $1.13 billion. For the same period last year, operating cash flow was $1.35 billion; property and equipment additions were $113 million; and free cash flow was $1.24 billion.
Days services outstanding, or DSOs, were 30 days, compared with 30 days at Aug. 31, 2011 and 32 days at May 31, 2011.
Accentures total cash balance at May 31, 2012 was $5.6 billion, compared with $5.7 billion at Aug. 31, 2011.
  
Utilization for the quarter was 87 percent, compared with 87 percent for the second quarter of fiscal 2012 and 85 percent for the third quarter of fiscal 2011. Attrition for the third quarter of fiscal 2012 was 13 percent, compared with 12 percent for the second quarter of fiscal 2012 and 15 percent for the third quarter of fiscal 2011.
New Bookings
New bookings for the third quarter were $7.29 billion and reflect a negative 4 percent foreign-currency impact compared with new bookings in the third quarter last year.
Net Revenues by Operating Group
Net revenues by operating group were as follows:
Net Revenues by Geographic Region
Net revenues by geographic region were as follows:
Returning Cash to Shareholders
Accenture continues to return cash to shareholders through cash dividends and share repurchases.
Dividend
    
On May 15, 2012, a semi-annual cash dividend of 67.5 cents per share was paid on Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares to shareholders of record at the close of business on April 13, 2012, and on Accenture SCA Class I common shares to shareholders of record at the close of business on April 10, 2012.
Combined with the semi-annual cash dividend of 67.5 cents per share paid on Nov. 15, 2011, this brings the total dividend payments for the fiscal year to $1.35 per share, for total cash dividend payments of $951 million.
Share Repurchase Activity
During the third quarter of fiscal 2012, Accenture repurchased or redeemed 10.7 million shares, including 9.8 million shares repurchased in the open market, for a total of $653 million. This brings Accentures total share repurchases and redemptions for the first three quarters of fiscal 2012 to 24.7 million shares, including 19.7 million shares repurchased in the open market, for a total of approximately $1.4 billion.
Accentures total remaining share repurchase authority at May 31, 2012 was approximately $4.8 billion.
At May 31, 2012, Accenture had approximately 697 million total shares outstanding, including 639 million Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares and 58 million Accenture SCA Class I common shares and Accenture Canada Holdings Inc. exchangeable shares.
Business Outlook
Fourth Quarter Fiscal 2012
Accenture expects net revenues for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2012 to be in the range of $6.60 billion to $6.85 billion. This range assumes a foreign-exchange impact of negative 7 percent compared with the fourth quarter of fiscal 2011.
Full Fiscal Year 2012
Accentures business outlook for the full 2012 fiscal year now assumes a foreign-exchange impact of negative 2 percent compared with fiscal 2011; its previous outlook for full-year foreign-exchange impact was negative 1 percent.
For fiscal 2012, the company continues to expect revenue growth to be in the range of 10 percent to 12 percent in local currency.
The company has updated and narrowed its range for diluted EPS for fiscal 2012 to $3.80 to $3.84 from its previously guided range of $3.82 to $3.90. The update is primarily due to the companys revised foreign-exchange assumption, which reduced the range by approximately $0.04.
Accenture continues to expect operating margin for the full fiscal year to be in the range of 13.7 percent to 13.9 percent, an expansion of 10 to 30 basis points.
The company now expects operating cash flow to be $3.55 billion to $3.85 billion and property and equipment additions to be $350 million and continues to expect free cash flow to be in the range of $3.2 billion to $3.5 billion. The company continues to expect its annual effective tax rate to be in the range of 27 percent to 28 percent.
Accenture expects new bookings for the full fiscal year to be toward the upper end of its previously guided range of $28 billion to $31 billion.
Conference Call and Webcast Details
Accenture will host a conference call at 4:30 p.m. EDT today to discuss its third-quarter fiscal 2012 financial results. To participate, please dial +1 (888) 276-0010 [+1 (612) 332-0720 outside the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada] approximately 15 minutes before the scheduled start of the call. The conference call will also be accessible live on the Investor Relations section of the Accenture Web site at
www.accenture.com
.
A replay of the conference call will be available online at www.accenture.com beginning at 7:00 p.m. EDT today, Thursday, June 28, and continuing until Wednesday, Sept. 26, 2012. A podcast of the conference call will be available online at www.accenture.com beginning approximately 24 hours after the call and continuing until Wednesday, Sept. 26. The replay will also be available via telephone by dialing +1 (800) 475-6701 [+1 (320) 365-3844 outside the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada] and entering access code 248732 from 7:00 p.m. EDT today, Thursday, June 28, through Wednesday, Sept. 26.
    
About Accenture
 
Accenture is a global management consulting, technology services and outsourcing company, with more than 249,000 people serving clients in more than 120 countries. Combining unparalleled experience, comprehensive capabilities across all industries and business functions, and extensive research on the worlds most successful companies, Accenture collaborates with clients to help them become high-performance businesses and governments.  The company generated net revenues of US$25.5 billion for the fiscal year ended Aug. 31, 2011. Its home page is
www.accenture.com
.
Non-GAAP Financial Information
 
This news release includes certain non-GAAP financial information as defined by Securities and Exchange Commission Regulation G. Pursuant to the requirements of this regulation, reconciliations of this non-GAAP
financial information to Accentures financial statements as prepared under generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) are included in this press release. Financial results in local currency are calculated by restating current-period activity into U.S. dollars using the comparable prior-year periods foreign-currency exchange rates. Accentures management believes providing investors with this information gives additional insights into Accentures results of operations.  While Accentures management believes that the non-GAAP financial measures herein are useful in evaluating Accentures operations, this information should be considered as supplemental in nature and not as a substitute for the related financial information prepared in accordance with GAAP.
Forward-Looking Statements
 
Except for the historical information and discussions contained herein, statements in this news release may constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve a number of risks, uncertainties and other factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed or implied. These include, without limitation, risks that: the companys results of operations could be adversely affected by volatile, negative or uncertain economic conditions and the effects of these conditions on the companys clients businesses and levels of business activity; the companys business depends on generating and maintaining ongoing, profitable client demand for the companys services and solutions, and a significant reduction in such demand could materially affect the companys results of operations; if the company is unable to keep its supply of skills and resources in balance with client demand around the world and attract and retain professionals with strong leadership skills, the companys business, the utilization rate of the companys professionals and the companys results of operations may be materially adversely affected; the consulting and outsourcing markets are highly competitive, and the company might not be able to compete effectively; the companys results of operations (including its net revenues and operating income) and the value of balance-sheet items originally denominated in other currencies could be materially adversely affected by unfavorable fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates or changes to existing currencies; the company could have liability or the companys reputation could be damaged if the company fails to protect client and company data or information systems as obligated by law or contract or if the companys information systems are breached; the companys Global Delivery Network is increasingly concentrated in India and the Philippines, which may expose it to operational risks; as a result of the companys geographically diverse operations and its growth strategy to continue geographic expansion, the company is more susceptible to certain risks; the companys results of operations could materially suffer if the company is not able to obtain sufficient pricing to enable it to meet its profitability expectations; if the companys pricing estimates do not accurately anticipate the cost, risk and complexity of the company performing its work or third parties upon which it relies do not meet their commitments, then the companys contracts could have delivery inefficiencies and be unprofitable; the companys work with government clients exposes the company to additional risks inherent in the government contracting environment, including risks related to governmental budget and debt constraints; the companys business could be materially adversely affected if it incurs legal liability in connection with providing its services and solutions; the companys results of operations and ability to grow could be materially negatively affected if the company cannot adapt and expand its services and solutions in response to ongoing changes in technology and offerings by new entrants; outsourcing services subject the company to different operational risks than its consulting and systems integration services; the companys services or solutions could infringe upon the intellectual property rights of others or the company might lose its ability to utilize the intellectual property of others; the company has only a limited ability to protect its intellectual property rights, which are important to the companys success; the companys ability to attract and retain business and employees may depend on its reputation in the marketplace; the companys alliance relationships may not be successful or may change, which could adversely affect the companys results of operations; the company may not be successful at identifying, acquiring or integrating other businesses; the companys profitability could suffer if its cost-management strategies are unsuccessful, and the company may not be able to improve its profitability through improvements to cost-management to the degree it has done in the past; many of the companys contracts include performance payments that link some of its fees to the attainment of performance or business targets and/or require the company to meet specific service levels, which could increase the variability of the companys revenues and impact its margins; changes in the companys level of taxes, and audits, investigations and tax proceedings, or changes in the companys treatment as an Irish company, could have a material adverse effect on the companys results of operations and financial condition; if the company is unable to manage the organizational challenges associated with its size, the company might be unable to achieve its business objectives; if the company is unable to collect its receivables or unbilled services, the companys results of operations, financial condition and cash flows could be adversely affected; the companys share price and results of
operations could fluctuate and be difficult to predict; the companys results of operations and share price could be adversely affected if it is unable to maintain effective internal controls; the company may be subject to criticism and negative publicity related to its incorporation in Ireland; as well as the risks, uncertainties and other factors discussed under the Risk Factors heading in Accenture plcs most recent annual report on Form 10-K and other documents filed with or furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission. Statements in this news release speak only as of the date they were made, and Accenture undertakes no duty to update any forward-looking statements made in this news release or to conform such statements to actual results or changes in Accentures expectations.
###
 
Contact:
 
Roxanne Taylor
Accenture
+1 (917) 452-5106
roxanne.taylor@accenture.com
ACCENTURE PLC
CONSOLIDATED INCOME STATEMENTS
(In thousands of U.S. dollars, except share and per share amounts)
(Unaudited)
 
_______________
ACCENTURE PLC
SUMMARY OF REVENUES
(In thousands of U.S. dollars)
(Unaudited)
_______________
n/m = not meaningful
 
ACCENTURE PLC
OPERATING INCOME BY OPERATING GROUP (OG)
(In thousands of U.S. dollars)
(Unaudited)
_______________ 
ACCENTURE PLC
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
(In thousands of U.S. dollars)
 
ACCENTURE PLC
CONSOLIDATED CASH FLOWS STATEMENTS
(In thousands of U.S. dollars)
(Unaudited)


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ACN/ACN-8K-20120720160244.txt.gz
TIME:20120720160244
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, DC 20549
____________________ 
Form 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 ____________________
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): July 19, 2012
Accenture plc
(Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter)
 
1 Grand Canal Square,
Grand Canal Harbour,
Dublin 2, Ireland
(Address of principal executive offices)
Registrants telephone number, including area code: (353) (1) 646-2000
Not Applicable
(Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (
see
General Instruction A.2. below):
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On July 19, 2012, Dennis F. Hightower advised the Board of Directors (the Board) of Accenture plc that he was resigning from the Board, effective immediately.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ACN/ACN-8K-20120927161831.txt.gz
TIME:20120927161831
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, DC 20549
____________________ 
Form 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 ____________________
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): September 27, 2012
Accenture plc
(Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter)
 
1 Grand Canal Square,
Grand Canal Harbour,
Dublin 2, Ireland
(Address of principal executive offices)
Registrants telephone number, including area code: (353) (1) 646-2000
Not Applicable
(Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (
see
General Instruction A.2. below):
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition
On September 27, 2012, Accenture plc (Accenture) issued a press release announcing financial results for its fourth quarter and full fiscal year ended August 31, 2012.
A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99. All information in the press release is furnished but not filed.
Non-GAAP Financial Information
In the attached press release Accenture discloses the following non-GAAP financial measures:
Reconciliations of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable financial measures calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP are included in the press release. While Accentures management believes that this non-GAAP financial information is useful in evaluating Accentures operations, this information should be considered as supplemental in nature and not as a substitute for the related financial information prepared in accordance with GAAP.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) Exhibits
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 99
Accenture Reports Fourth-Quarter and Full-Year Fiscal 2012 Results,
With Record Annual Revenues, EPS, Operating Margin,
Free Cash Flow and New Bookings
 Fourth-quarter revenues increase 2% in U.S. dollars and 9% in local currency, to $6.8 billion; quarterly EPS are $0.88; free cash flow is $1.6 billion 
 For full year, revenues increase 9% in U.S. dollars and 11% in local currency, to $27.9 billion; EPS increase 13%, to $3.84; and free cash flow is $3.9 billion 
 New bookings are $9.2 billion for fourth quarter and $32.2 billion for full year 
 Company increases semi-annual cash dividend 20%, to $0.81 per share 
 For fiscal year 2013, Accenture expects net revenue growth of 5% to 8% in local currency and EPS of $4.22 to $4.30, an increase of 10% to 12% 
NEW YORK; Sept. 27, 2012  Accenture (NYSE: ACN) reported financial results for the fourth quarter and full 2012 fiscal year, ended Aug. 31, 2012, with record annual revenues, earnings per share, operating margin, free cash flow and new bookings.
For the fourth quarter, revenues before reimbursements (net revenues) were $6.8 billion, an increase of 2 percent in U.S. dollars and 9 percent in local currency compared with the fourth quarter of fiscal 2011.  Diluted earnings per share were $0.88. Operating margin was 13.8 percent.  Operating cash flow was $1.7 billion and free cash flow was $1.6 billion. New bookings were $9.2 billion, the companys highest quarterly bookings ever.
For the full fiscal year, net revenues were $27.9 billion, an increase of 9 percent in U.S. dollars and 11 percent in local currency compared with fiscal 2011. Diluted earnings per share were $3.84, an increase of 13 percent. Operating margin was 13.9 percent.
 
Operating cash flow was $4.3 billion and free cash flow was $3.9 billion, which exceeded the top end of the companys guided range by nearly $400 million. New bookings were $32.2 billion, an annual record, and $1.2 billion above the top of the companys guided range.
In addition, Accentures Board of Directors has declared a semi-annual cash dividend of $0.81 per share, an increase of 13.5 cents per share, or 20 percent, over its previous semi-annual dividend, declared in March.
Pierre Nanterme, Accentures chief executive officer, said, We are very pleased with our financial results for fiscal 2012, which met or exceeded our business outlook for the year. Our revenue growth was strong and broad-based across the different dimensions of our business, and we increased EPS by 13 percent. Our balance sheet remains very strong, with a cash balance of $6.6 billion. We also achieved record new bookings of $9.2 billion for the fourth quarter, bringing us to $32.2 billion for the year, our highest ever.
With our diverse portfolio of business, our industry and technology expertise, and the focused execution of our growth strategy, we are very well-positioned to continue gaining market share and delivering value to our clients and shareholders.
Financial Review
Fourth Quarter Fiscal 2012
Net revenues for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2012 were $6.84 billion, compared with $6.69 billion for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2011, an increase of 2 percent in U.S. dollars and 9 percent in local currency and at the upper end of the companys guided range of $6.6 billion to $6.85 billion. The foreign-exchange impact of negative 7 percent for the quarter was consistent with the assumption provided in the companys third-quarter earnings release.
Diluted EPS for the fourth quarter were $0.88, compared with $0.91 for the fourth quarter last year. The $0.03 decrease in EPS reflects:
more than offset by
Gross margin (gross profit as a percentage of net revenues) for the fourth quarter was 32.9 percent, compared with 33.1 percent for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2011. Selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses for the fourth quarter were $1.31 billion, or approximately 19.2 percent of net revenues, compared with $1.29 billion, or approximately 19.4 percent of net revenues, for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2011.
 
Operating income for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2012 was $940 million, or 13.8 percent of net revenues, compared with $923 million, or 13.8 percent of net revenues, for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2011.
The companys effective tax rate for the fourth quarter was 32.8 percent, compared with 27.0 percent for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2011. The higher rate in the fourth quarter of fiscal 2012 was primarily due to an increase in reserves and a change in the geographic mix of income.
Net income for the fourth quarter was $636 million, compared with $683 million for the same period of fiscal 2011, a decrease of 7 percent, due to the higher tax rate compared with the fourth quarter of fiscal 2011.
Operating cash flow for the fourth quarter was $1.71 billion, and property and equipment additions were $115 million. Free cash flow, defined as operating cash flow net of property and equipment additions, was $1.59 billion. For the same period of fiscal 2011, operating cash flow was $1.38 billion, property and equipment additions were $137 million, and free cash flow was $1.24 billion.
Days services outstanding, or DSOs, were 27 days at Aug. 31, 2012, compared with 30 days at Aug. 31, 2011.
Accentures total cash balance at Aug. 31, 2012 was $6.6 billion, compared with $5.7 billion at Aug. 31, 2011.
Utilization for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2012 was 87 percent, compared with 87 percent for the third quarter of fiscal 2012 and 85 percent for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2011. Attrition for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2012 was 12 percent, compared with 13 percent for the third quarter of fiscal 2012 and 14 percent for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2011.
New Bookings
New bookings for the fourth quarter were $9.2 billion and reflect a negative 9 percent foreign-currency impact compared with new bookings in the fourth quarter of fiscal 2011.
Net Revenues by Operating Group
Net revenues by operating group for the fourth quarter were as follows:
Net Revenues by Geographic Region
Net revenues by geographic region for the fourth quarter were as follows:
Full Year Fiscal 2012
Net revenues for the full 2012 fiscal year were $27.9 billion, compared with $25.5 billion for fiscal 2011, an increase of 9 percent in U.S. dollars and 11 percent in local currency. Net revenues for fiscal 2012 reflect a foreign-exchange impact of negative 2 percent compared with fiscal 2011.
Diluted EPS for the full 2012 fiscal year were $3.84, compared with $3.39 for fiscal 2011, an increase of 13 percent.  The $0.45 increase in EPS reflects:
partially offset by
Gross margin (gross profit as a percentage of net revenues) for fiscal 2012 was 32.3 percent, compared with 32.9 percent for fiscal 2011. Selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses for the full fiscal year were $5.11 billion, or 18.4 percent of net revenues, compared with $4.91 billion, or approximately 19.2 percent of net revenues, for fiscal 2011.
Operating income for the full fiscal year was $3.87 billion, or 13.9 percent of net revenues, compared with $3.47 billion, or 13.6 percent of net revenues, for fiscal 2011, an expansion of 30 basis points.
Accentures annual effective tax rate for fiscal 2012 was 27.6 percent, compared with 27.3 percent for fiscal 2011, in line with the companys guided range of 27 percent to 28 percent.
Net income for the full fiscal year was $2.82 billion, compared with $2.55
 
billion for fiscal 2011, an increase of 11 percent.
For the full 2012 fiscal year, operating cash flow was $4.26 billion and property and equipment additions were $372
 
million. Free cash flow, defined as operating cash flow net of property and equipment additions, was $3.88 billion, exceeding the companys previously guided range of $3.2 billion to $3.5 billion, principally due to record-low days services outstanding of 27 days as of Aug. 31, 2012. For the prior fiscal year, ended Aug. 31, 2011, operating cash flow was $3.44 billion, property and equipment additions were $404 million, and free cash flow was $3.04 billion.
Utilization for the full 2012 fiscal year was 87 percent, compared with 86 percent for fiscal 2011. Attrition for the full 2012 fiscal year was 12 percent, compared with 14 percent for fiscal 2011.
New Bookings
New bookings for the full fiscal year were $32.2 billion, an increase of 12 percent in U.S. dollars and 15 percent in local currency over fiscal 2011.
Net Revenues by Operating Group
All of Accentures operating groups grew revenues in both U.S. dollars and local currency in fiscal 2012 compared with fiscal 2011. Net revenues by operating group for the full fiscal year were as follows:
Net Revenues by Geographic Region
All of Accentures geographic regions grew revenues in both U.S. dollars and local currency in fiscal 2012 compared with fiscal 2011. Net revenues by geographic region for the full fiscal year were as follows:
Returning Cash to Shareholders
Accenture continues to return cash to shareholders through cash dividends and share repurchases. In fiscal 2012, the company returned more than $3 billion to shareholders, including $951 million in cash dividends and $2.1 billion in share repurchases.
Dividend
Accenture plc has declared a semi-annual cash dividend of $0.81 per share on Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares for shareholders of record at the close of business on Oct. 12, 2012, and Accenture SCA will declare a semi-annual cash dividend of $0.81 per share on Accenture SCA Class I common shares for shareholders of record at the close of business on Oct. 9, 2012. Both dividends are payable on Nov. 15, 2012. This represents an increase of 13.5 cents per share, or 20 percent, over the companys previous semi-annual dividend, declared in March.
Share Repurchase Activity
During the fourth quarter of fiscal 2012, Accenture repurchased or redeemed 12.0 million shares, including 10.4 million shares repurchased in the open market, for a total of $696 million. During the full fiscal year 2012, Accenture repurchased or redeemed 36.6 million shares, including 30.1 million shares repurchased in the open market, for a total of $2.1 billion. 
Accentures total remaining share repurchase authority at Aug. 31, 2012 was approximately $4.2 billion.
At Aug. 31, 2012, Accenture had approximately 689 million total shares outstanding, including 633 million Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares and minority holdings of 56 million shares (Accenture SCA Class I common shares and Accenture Canada Holdings Inc. exchangeable shares).
Business Outlook
First Quarter Fiscal 2013
Accenture expects net revenues for the first quarter of fiscal 2013 to be in the range of $7.1 billion to $7.35 billion, which assumes a foreign-exchange impact of negative 3 percent compared with the first quarter of fiscal 2012.
Fiscal Year 2013
Accentures business outlook for the full 2013 fiscal year assumes a foreign-exchange impact of negative 1 percent compared with fiscal 2012.
For fiscal 2013, the company expects net revenue growth to be in the range of 5 percent to 8 percent in local currency. The company expects diluted EPS to be in the range of $4.22 to $4.30.
Accenture expects operating margin for the full fiscal year to be in the range of 14.0 percent to 14.1 percent, an expansion of 10 to 20 basis points.
For fiscal 2013, the company expects operating cash flow to be in the range of $3.2 billion to $3.5 billion; property and equipment additions to be $420 million; and free cash flow to be in the range of $2.8 billion to $3.1 billion. The outlook for operating cash flow and free cash flow includes the impact of a discretionary cash contribution of $500 million that the company expects to make to its U.S. defined benefit pension plan in fiscal 2013.
The company expects its annual effective tax rate to be in the range of 26 percent to 27 percent.
Accenture is targeting new bookings for fiscal 2013 in the range of $31 billion to $34 billion.
Conference Call and Webcast Details
Accenture will host a conference call at 4:30 p.m. EDT today to discuss its fourth-quarter and full-year fiscal 2012 financial results. To participate, please dial +1 (800) 230-1059 [+1 (612) 234-9960 outside the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada] approximately 15 minutes before the scheduled start of the call. The conference call will also be accessible live on the Investor Relations section of the Accenture Web site at
www.accenture.com
.
A replay of the conference call will be available online at www.accenture.com beginning at 7:00 p.m. EDT today, Thursday, Sept. 27, and continuing until Wednesday, Dec. 19, 2012. A podcast of the conference call will be available online at www.accenture.com beginning approximately 24 hours after the call and continuing until Wednesday, Dec. 19. The replay will also be available via telephone by dialing +1 (800) 475-6701 [+1 (320) 365-3844 outside the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada] and entering access code 256202 from 7:00 p.m. EDT today, Thursday, Sept. 27, through Wednesday, Dec. 19.
    
About Accenture
Accenture is a global management consulting, technology services and outsourcing company, with 257,000 people serving clients in more than 120 countries. Combining unparalleled experience, comprehensive capabilities across all industries and business functions, and extensive research on the worlds most successful companies, Accenture collaborates with clients to help them become high-performance businesses and governments.  The company generated net revenues of US$27.9 billion for the fiscal year ended Aug. 31, 2012. Its home page is
www.accenture.com
.
Non-GAAP Financial Information
This news release includes certain non-GAAP financial information as defined by Securities and Exchange Commission Regulation G. Pursuant to the requirements of this regulation, reconciliations of this non-GAAP financial information to Accentures financial statements as prepared under generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) are included in this press release. Financial results in local currency are calculated by restating current-period activity into U.S. dollars using the comparable prior-year periods foreign-currency exchange rates. Accentures management believes providing investors with this information gives additional insights into Accentures results of operations.  While Accentures management believes that the non-GAAP financial measures herein are useful in evaluating Accentures operations, this information should be considered as supplemental in nature and not as a substitute for the related financial information prepared in accordance with GAAP.
Forward-Looking Statements
 
Except for the historical information and discussions contained herein, statements in this news release may constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements involve a number of risks, uncertainties and other factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed or implied. These include, without limitation, risks that: the companys results of operations could be adversely affected by volatile, negative or uncertain economic conditions and the effects of these conditions on the companys clients businesses and levels of business activity; the companys business depends on generating and maintaining ongoing, profitable client demand for the companys services and solutions, and a significant reduction in such demand could materially affect the companys results of operations; if the company is unable to keep its supply of skills and resources in balance with client demand around the world and attract and retain professionals with strong leadership skills, the companys business, the utilization rate of the companys professionals and the companys results of operations may be materially adversely affected; the consulting and outsourcing markets are highly competitive, and the company might not be able to compete effectively; the companys results of operations (including its net revenues and operating income) and the value of balance-sheet items originally denominated in other currencies could be materially adversely affected by unfavorable fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates or changes to existing currencies; the company could have liability or the companys reputation could be damaged if the company fails to protect client and company data or information systems as obligated by law or contract or if the companys information systems are breached; the companys Global Delivery Network is increasingly concentrated in India and the Philippines, which may expose it to operational risks; as a result of the companys geographically diverse operations and its growth strategy to continue geographic expansion, the company is more susceptible to certain risks; the companys results of operations could materially suffer if the company is not able to obtain sufficient pricing to enable it to meet its profitability expectations; if the companys pricing estimates do not accurately anticipate the cost, risk and complexity of the company performing its work or third parties upon which it relies do not meet their commitments, then the companys contracts could have delivery inefficiencies and be unprofitable; the companys work with government clients exposes the company to additional risks inherent in the government contracting environment, including risks related to governmental budget and debt constraints; the companys business could be materially adversely affected if it incurs legal liability in connection with providing its services and solutions; the companys results of operations and ability to grow could be materially negatively affected if the company cannot adapt and expand its services and solutions in response to ongoing changes in technology and offerings by new entrants; outsourcing services subject the company to different operational risks than its consulting and systems integration services; the
companys services or solutions could infringe upon the intellectual property rights of others or the company might lose its ability to utilize the intellectual property of others; the company has only a limited ability to protect its intellectual property rights, which are important to the companys success; the companys ability to attract and retain business and employees may depend on its reputation in the marketplace; the companys alliance relationships may not be successful or may change, which could adversely affect the companys results of operations; the company might not successfully manage the operational and other risks associated with acquiring or integrating businesses or entering into joint ventures; the companys profitability could suffer if its cost-management strategies are unsuccessful, and the company may not be able to improve its profitability through improvements to cost-management to the degree it has done in the past; many of the companys contracts include performance payments that link some of its fees to the attainment of performance or business targets and/or require the company to meet specific service levels, which could increase the variability of the companys revenues and impact its margins; changes in the companys level of taxes, and audits, investigations and tax proceedings, or changes in the companys treatment as an Irish company, could have a material adverse effect on the companys results of operations and financial condition; if the company is unable to manage the organizational challenges associated with its size, the company might be unable to achieve its business objectives; if the company is unable to collect its receivables or unbilled services, the companys results of operations, financial condition and cash flows could be adversely affected; the companys share price and results of operations could fluctuate and be difficult to predict; the companys results of operations and share price could be adversely affected if it is unable to maintain effective internal controls; the company may be subject to criticism and negative publicity related to its incorporation in Ireland; as well as the risks, uncertainties and other factors discussed under the Risk Factors heading in Accenture plcs most recent annual report on Form 10-K and other documents filed with or furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission. Statements in this news release speak only as of the date they were made, and Accenture undertakes no duty to update any forward-looking statements made in this news release or to conform such statements to actual results or changes in Accentures expectations.
###
 
Contact:
 
Roxanne Taylor
Accenture
+1 (917) 452-5106
roxanne.taylor@accenture.com
ACCENTURE PLC
CONSOLIDATED INCOME STATEMENTS
(In thousands of U.S. dollars, except share and per share amounts)
(Unaudited)
 
_______________
from $3.40 to $3.39 for the year ended August 31, 2011.
ACCENTURE PLC
SUMMARY OF REVENUES
(In thousands of U.S. dollars)
(Unaudited)
_______________
n/m = not meaningful
 
ACCENTURE PLC
OPERATING INCOME BY OPERATING GROUP (OG)
(In thousands of U.S. dollars)
(Unaudited)
_______________ 
ACCENTURE PLC
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
(In thousands of U.S. dollars)
 
ACCENTURE PLC
CONSOLIDATED CASH FLOWS STATEMENTS
(In thousands of U.S. dollars)
(Unaudited)


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ACN/ACN-8K-20121022160801.txt.gz
TIME:20121022160801
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, DC 20549
____________________ 
Form 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 ____________________
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): October 18, 2012
Accenture plc
(Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter)
 
1 Grand Canal Square,
Grand Canal Harbour,
Dublin 2, Ireland
(Address of principal executive offices)
Registrants telephone number, including area code: (353) (1) 646-2000
Not Applicable
(Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (
see
General Instruction A.2. below):
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On October 18, 2012, William D. Green, executive chairman of the Board of Directors (the Board) of Accenture plc (Accenture), advised the Board that he would step down as chairman and from the Board and retire from Accenture, effective February 1, 2013. Accenture also announced that Pierre Nanterme, Accentures chief executive officer, has been appointed to succeed Mr. Green as chairman of the Board upon Mr. Greens retirement.
In connection with Mr. Greens retirement from Accenture, the Board has determined to waive the remaining service-based vesting conditions for that portion of Mr. Greens outstanding awards that is not otherwise scheduled to vest on or prior to his retirement. The waiver of service-based vesting applies to Mr. Greens awards under the 2011 and 2012 Key Executive Performance Share Programs with respect to his shares of performance-vested restricted share units (which, assuming target performance, would be 76,236 shares), plus an additional number of shares that could be earned as dividend equivalents in accordance with Mr. Greens equity award agreements. Although the Board waived the remaining service-based vesting conditions for these awards, the vesting for each award will occur only to the extent that performance objectives are met over the three-year performance period for each award, with the actual number of shares (which may be below, at, or above target) determined based on Accentures cumulative performance over the relevant performance period.
In addition, Mr. Green will receive office space with administrative support for his use after retirement, until such time that he notifies Accenture that he no longer wishes to maintain the office.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) The following exhibits are attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 99
Accenture Names CEO Pierre Nanterme to Additional Position of Chairman,
Effective Feb. 1, 2013
 
 Accenture Chairman William D. Green to retire and step down from the board 
NEW YORK; Oct. 22, 2012  The board of directors of Accenture (NYSE: ACN) has named CEO Pierre Nanterme to the additional position of chairman of the board, effective Feb. 1, 2013.  He succeeds William D. Green, who will step down as chairman and from the board on that date.  Mr. Nanterme, 53, succeeded Mr. Green as CEO on Jan. 1, 2011, and has been a member of the Accenture board of directors since October 2010. 
    
The appointment of Pierre Nanterme as chairman reflects his tremendous knowledge of Accentures business and global organization
,
and the high regard in which he is held by the board of directors, said Sir Mark Moody-Stuart, lead director of the Accenture board.  He has proven himself to be an outstanding leader.
At the same time, we recognize the significant contributions that Bill Green has made to Accenture during his 34-year career with the company, including six years as CEO, and we thank him for the excellent stewardship he has provided as chairman. Throughout his career, Bill has contributed to and then led a great organization. An important part of this contribution has been to build succession and in-depth leadership talent at Accenture.
Mr. Green, 59, joined Accenture in 1977.  He has served as chairman of the board since 2006 and was chief executive officer from Sept. 1, 2004 until Jan. 1, 2011.  During his tenure as CEO, Mr. Green led Accenture to record growth and profits, nearly doubled the companys global workforce, expanded Accentures global footprint and successfully navigated the company through a challenging economic environment.  Under his leadership, the company
launched its highly successful Skills to Succeed corporate citizenship initiative.
Im honored to be selected to succeed Bill as chairman, said Mr. Nanterme.  Bill has always been a strong advocate for our clients and our people, and I want to recognize and thank him for his tireless commitment to helping make Accenture the exceptional company it is today.
 
About Accenture
 
Accenture is a global management consulting, technology services and outsourcing company, with 257,000 people serving clients in more than 120 countries.  Combining unparalleled experience, comprehensive capabilities across all industries and business functions, and extensive research on the worlds most successful companies, Accenture collaborates with clients to help them become high-performance businesses and governments.  The company generated net revenues of US$27.9 billion for the fiscal year ended Aug. 31, 2012.  Its home page is
www.accenture.com
.
 
# # #
 
Alex Pachetti
Accenture
+1 (917) 452-5519
alex.pachetti@accenture.com
Roxanne Taylor
Accenture
+1 (917) 452-5106
roxanne.taylor@accenture.com
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ACN/ACN-8K-20121219161212.txt.gz
TIME:20121219161212
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, DC 20549
____________________ 
Form 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 ____________________
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): December 19, 2012
Accenture plc
(Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter)
 
1 Grand Canal Square,
Grand Canal Harbour,
Dublin 2, Ireland
(Address of principal executive offices)
Registrants telephone number, including area code: (353) (1) 646-2000
Not Applicable
(Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (
see
General Instruction A.2. below):
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition
On December 19, 2012, Accenture plc (Accenture) issued a press release announcing financial results for its first quarter of fiscal year 2013, which fiscal quarter ended on November 30, 2012.
A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99. All information in the press release is furnished but not filed.
Non-GAAP Financial Information
In the attached press release Accenture discloses the following non-GAAP financial measures:
Reconciliations of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable financial measures calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP are included in the press release. While Accentures management believes that this non-GAAP financial information is useful in evaluating Accentures operations, this information should be considered as supplemental in nature and not as a substitute for the related financial information prepared in accordance with GAAP.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) Exhibits
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 99
Accenture Reports First-Quarter Fiscal 2013 Results,
With Record Quarterly Revenues and EPS
 Revenues increase 2% in U.S. dollars and 5% in local currency, to $7.2 billion 
 
 EPS up 10%, to $1.06 
 Operating income increases 7%, to $1.05 billion, with operating margin of 14.5% 
 New bookings are $7.5 billion, with consulting bookings of $4.2 billion
and outsourcing bookings of $3.3 billion 
 Company raises outlook for full-year EPS to range of $4.24 to $4.32 
NEW YORK; Dec. 19, 2012  Accenture (NYSE: ACN) reported financial results for the first quarter of fiscal 2013, ended Nov. 30, 2012, with record net revenues of $7.2 billion, an increase of 2 percent in U.S. dollars and 5 percent in local currency over the same period last year. Diluted earnings per share were $1.06, an increase of $0.10, or 10 percent, over the same period last year.
Operating income was $1.05 billion, an increase of 7 percent over the same period last year, and operating margin was 14.5 percent, a year-over-year expansion of more than 60 basis points.
New bookings for the quarter were $7.5 billion, with consulting bookings of $4.2 billion and outsourcing bookings of $3.3 billion.
Pierre Nanterme, Accentures chief executive officer, said, We are pleased with our first-quarter results, in particular our ability to drive profitable growth despite the continued volatility in the global economic environment. Revenue growth, which included a strong 13 percent local-currency increase in outsourcing, was in line with our expectations. We also delivered very good profitability, reflecting our disciplined management of the business.
Looking ahead, we remain focused on the successful execution of our growth strategy and are investing to further differentiate our industry and technology capabilities, as well as to expand our geographic footprint in key growth markets. We are raising our business outlook for both EPS and operating margin for the full fiscal year and remain well-positioned to continue delivering value for our clients and shareholders.
Financial Review
Revenues before reimbursements (net revenues) for the first quarter of fiscal 2013 were $7.22 billion, compared with $7.07 billion for the first quarter of fiscal 2012, an increase of 2 percent in U.S. dollars and 5 percent in local currency and within the companys guided range of $7.1 billion to $7.35 billion. The foreign-exchange impact of approximately negative 3 percent was consistent with the assumption provided in the companys fourth-quarter earnings release.
Diluted EPS for the quarter were $1.06, compared with $0.96 for the first quarter last year. The $0.10 increase in EPS reflects:
partially offset by:
Gross margin (gross profit as a percentage of net revenues) for the quarter was 32.8 percent, compared with 31.8 percent for the first quarter last year. Selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses for the quarter were $1.32 billion, or 18.2 percent of net revenues, compared with $1.27 billion, or approximately 17.9 percent of net revenues, for the first quarter last year.
Operating income for the quarter increased 7 percent, to $1.05 billion, or 14.5 percent of net revenues, compared with $981 million, or 13.9 percent of net revenues, for the first quarter of fiscal 2012. The operating margin expansion of more than 60 basis points reflects improvements in contract profitability and overall cost management compared with the first quarter last year.
The companys effective tax rate for the quarter was 26.8 percent, compared with 28.3 percent for the first quarter last year. The lower rate in the first quarter of fiscal 2013 was primarily due to higher benefits related to final determinations of prior-year tax liabilities.
Net income for the quarter was $766 million, compared with $712 million for the first quarter last year, an 8 percent increase.
Operating cash flow for the quarter was negative $109 million, and property and equipment additions were $87 million. Free cash flow, defined as operating cash flow net of property and equipment additions, was negative $195 million. Operating cash flow and free cash flow for the first quarter of fiscal 2013 include a discretionary cash contribution of $500 million the company made to its U.S. defined benefit pension plan, which had a net impact, after tax, of $350 million. For the same period last year, operating cash flow was $475 million; property and equipment additions were $81 million; and free cash flow was $394 million.
Days services outstanding, or DSOs, were 32 days at Nov. 30, 2012, compared with 27 days at Aug. 31, 2012 and 32 days at Nov. 30, 2011.
Accentures total cash balance at Nov. 30, 2012 was $5.7 billion, compared with $6.6 billion at Aug. 31, 2012.
Utilization for the quarter was 88 percent, compared with 87 percent for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2012 and 87 percent for the first quarter of fiscal 2012. Attrition for the first quarter of fiscal 2013 was 11 percent, compared with 12 percent for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2012 and 12 percent for the first quarter of fiscal 2012.
New Bookings
New bookings for the first quarter were $7.5 billion and reflect a negative 2 percent foreign-currency impact compared with new bookings in the first quarter last year.
Net Revenues by Operating Group
Net revenues by operating group were as follows:
Net Revenues by Geographic Region
Net revenues by geographic region were as follows:
Returning Cash to Shareholders
Accenture continues to return cash to shareholders through cash dividends and share repurchases.
Dividend
    
On Nov. 15, 2012, a semi-annual cash dividend of $0.81 per share was paid to Accenture plc Class A ordinary shareholders of record at the close of business on Oct. 12, 2012 and to Accenture SCA Class I common shareholders of record at the close of business on Oct. 9, 2012. These cash dividend payments totaled $560 million. This dividend represents an increase of 13.5 cents per share, or 20 percent, over the companys previous semi-annual dividend, declared in March.
Share Repurchase Activity
During the first quarter of fiscal 2013, Accenture repurchased or redeemed 3.3 million shares for a total of $221 million, including approximately 656,000 shares repurchased in the open market.
Accentures total remaining share repurchase authority at Nov. 30, 2012 was approximately $4.05 billion.
At Nov. 30, 2012, Accenture had approximately 693 million total shares outstanding, including 641 million Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares and 52 million Accenture SCA Class I common shares and Accenture Canada Holdings Inc. exchangeable shares.
Business Outlook
Second Quarter Fiscal 2013
Accenture expects net revenues for the second quarter of fiscal 2013 to be in the range of $6.9 billion to $7.15 billion. This range assumes a foreign-exchange impact of negative 1 percent compared with the second quarter of fiscal 2012.
Full Fiscal Year 2013
For fiscal 2013, the company continues to expect net revenue growth to be in the range of 5 percent to 8 percent in local currency.
Accentures business outlook for the full 2013 fiscal year continues to assume a foreign-exchange impact of negative 1 percent compared with fiscal 2012.
The company has raised its outlook for diluted EPS for fiscal 2013 to the range of $4.24 to $4.32 from its previously guided range of $4.22 to $4.30.
Accenture has raised its outlook for operating margin for the full fiscal year to the range of 14.1 percent to 14.2 percent, an expansion of 20 to 30 basis points. The companys previously guided range was 14.0 percent to 14.1 percent.
The company continues to expect operating cash flow to be in the range of $3.2 billion to $3.5 billion; property and equipment additions to be $420 million; and free cash flow to be in the range of $2.8 billion to $3.1 billion.
The company continues to expect to return at least $3.3 billion to its shareholders in fiscal 2013 through dividends and share repurchases.
The company continues to expect its annual effective tax rate to be in the range of 26 percent to 27 percent.
Accenture continues to target new bookings for fiscal 2013 in the range of $31 billion to $34 billion.
Conference Call and Webcast Details
Accenture will host a conference call at 4:30 p.m. EST today to discuss its first-quarter fiscal 2013 financial results. To participate, please dial +1 (800) 230-1059 [+1 (612) 234-9959 outside the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada] approximately 15 minutes before the scheduled start of the call. The conference call will also be accessible live on the Investor Relations section of the Accenture Web site at
www.accenture.com
.
A replay of the conference call will be available online at www.accenture.com beginning at 7:00 p.m. EST today, Wednesday, Dec. 19, and continuing until Thursday, March 28, 2013. A podcast of the conference call will be available online at www.accenture.com beginning approximately 24 hours after the call and continuing until Thursday, March 28, 2013. The replay will also be available via telephone by dialing +1 (800) 475-6701 [+1 (320) 365-3844 outside the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada] and entering access code 271680 from 7:00 p.m. EST Wednesday, Dec. 19 through Thursday, March 28, 2013.
    
About Accenture
 
Accenture is a global management consulting, technology services and outsourcing company, with approximately 259,000 people serving clients in more than 120 countries. Combining unparalleled experience, comprehensive capabilities across all industries and business functions, and extensive research on the worlds most successful companies, Accenture collaborates with clients to help them become high-performance businesses and governments. The company generated net revenues of US$27.9 billion for the fiscal year ended Aug. 31, 2012. Its home page is
www.accenture.com
.
Non-GAAP Financial Information
 
This news release includes certain non-GAAP financial information as defined by Securities and Exchange Commission Regulation G. Pursuant to the requirements of this regulation, reconciliations of this non-GAAP financial information to Accentures financial statements as prepared under generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) are included in this press release. Financial results in local currency are calculated by restating current-period activity into U.S. dollars using the comparable prior-year periods foreign-currency exchange rates. Accentures management believes providing investors with this information gives additional insights into Accentures results of operations. While Accentures management believes that the non-GAAP financial measures herein are useful in evaluating Accentures operations, this information should be considered as supplemental in nature and not as a substitute for the related financial information prepared in accordance with GAAP.
Forward-Looking Statements
 
Except for the historical information and discussions contained herein, statements in this news release may constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as may, will, should, likely, anticipates, expects, intends, plans, projects, believes, estimates, positioned, outlook and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. These statements involve a number of risks, uncertainties and other factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed or implied. These include, without limitation, risks that: the companys results of operations could be adversely affected by volatile, negative or uncertain economic conditions and the effects of these conditions on the companys clients businesses and levels of business activity; the companys business depends on generating and maintaining ongoing, profitable client demand for the companys services and solutions, and a significant reduction in such demand could materially affect the companys results of operations; if the company is unable to keep its supply of skills and resources in balance with client demand around the world and attract and retain professionals with strong leadership skills, the companys business, the utilization rate of the companys professionals and the companys results of operations may be materially adversely affected; the markets in which the company competes are highly competitive, and the company might not be able to compete effectively; the company could have liability or the companys reputation could be damaged if the company fails to protect client and/or company data or information systems as obligated by law or contract or if the companys information systems are breached; as a result of the companys geographically diverse operations and its growth strategy to continue geographic expansion, the company is more susceptible to certain risks; the companys results of operations could be materially adversely affected by fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates; the companys Global Delivery Network is increasingly concentrated in India and the Philippines, which may expose it to operational risks; the companys results of operations could materially suffer if the company is not able to obtain sufficient pricing to enable it to meet its profitability expectations; if the companys pricing estimates do not accurately anticipate the cost, risk and complexity of the company performing its work or third parties upon whom it relies do not meet their commitments, then the companys contracts could have delivery inefficiencies and be unprofitable; the companys work with government clients exposes the company to additional risks inherent in the government contracting environment; the companys business could be materially adversely affected if the company incurs legal liability in connection with providing its services and solutions; the companys results of operations and ability to grow could be materially negatively affected if the company cannot adapt and expand its services and solutions in response to ongoing changes in technology and offerings by new entrants; the companys alliance relationships may not be successful or may change, which could adversely affect the companys results of operations; outsourcing services and the continued expansion of the companys other services and solutions into new areas subject the company to different operational risks than its consulting and systems integration services; the companys services or solutions could infringe upon the intellectual property rights of others or the company might lose its ability to utilize the intellectual property of others; the company has only a limited ability to protect its intellectual property rights, which are important to the companys success; the companys ability to attract and retain business and employees may depend on its reputation in the marketplace; the company might not be successful at identifying, acquiring or integrating businesses or entering into joint ventures; the companys profitability could suffer if its cost-management strategies are unsuccessful, and the company may not be able to improve its profitability through improvements to cost-management to the degree it has done in the past; many of the companys contracts include payments that link some of its fees to the attainment of performance or business targets and/or require the company to meet specific service levels, which could increase the variability of the companys revenues and impact its margins; changes in the companys level of taxes, and audits, investigations and tax proceedings, or changes in the companys treatment as an Irish company, could have a material adverse effect on the companys results of operations and financial condition; if the company is unable to manage the organizational challenges associated with its size, the company might be unable to achieve its business objectives; if the company is unable to collect its receivables or unbilled services, the companys results of operations, financial condition and cash flows could be adversely affected; the companys share price and results of operations could fluctuate and be difficult to predict; the companys results of operations and share price could be adversely affected if it is unable to maintain effective internal controls; the company may be subject to criticism and negative publicity related to its incorporation in Ireland; as well as the risks, uncertainties and other factors discussed under the Risk Factors heading in Accenture plcs most recent annual report on Form 10-K and other documents filed with or furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission. Statements in this news release speak only as of the date they were made, and Accenture undertakes no duty to update any forward-looking statements made in this news release or to conform such statements to actual results or changes in Accentures expectations.
###
 
Contact:
 
Roxanne Taylor
Accenture
+1 (917) 452-5106
roxanne.taylor@accenture.com
ACCENTURE PLC
CONSOLIDATED INCOME STATEMENTS
(In thousands of U.S. dollars, except share and per share amounts)
(Unaudited)
_______________
ACCENTURE PLC
SUMMARY OF REVENUES
(In thousands of U.S. dollars)
(Unaudited)
_______________
n/m = not meaningful
OPERATING INCOME BY OPERATING GROUP (OG)
(In thousands of U.S. dollars)
(Unaudited)
ACCENTURE PLC
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
(In thousands of U.S. dollars)
 
ACCENTURE PLC
CONSOLIDATED CASH FLOWS STATEMENTS
(In thousands of U.S. dollars)
(Unaudited)


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ACN/ACN-8K-20130201080156.txt.gz
TIME:20130201080156
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, DC 20549
____________________ 
Form 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 ____________________
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): February 1, 2013
Accenture plc
(Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter)
 
1 Grand Canal Square,
Grand Canal Harbour,
Dublin 2, Ireland
(Address of principal executive offices)
Registrants telephone number, including area code: (353) (1) 646-2000
Not Applicable
(Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (
see
General Instruction A.2. below):
Item 8.01 Other Events.
On February 1, 2013, Accenture plc (Accenture) issued a press release announcing that chief executive officer Pierre Nanterme has assumed the additional position of chairman of the Board of Directors (the Board) of Accenture, effective February 1, 2013. He succeeds William D. Green, who stepped down as chairman of the Board and retired from Accenture, effective February 1, 2013. Accenture previously announced these planned changes in a press release issued on October 22, 2012.
A copy of the press release announcing that Mr. Nanterme has assumed the additional position of chairman is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) The following exhibits are attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 99
Accenture CEO Pierre Nanterme Assumes Additional Position of Chairman
 
NEW YORK; Feb. 1, 2013  Accenture (NYSE: ACN) announced today that CEO Pierre Nanterme has assumed the additional position of chairman of the board. The company had previously announced, on October 22, 2012, that Mr. Nanterme would succeed William D. Green, who has stepped down as chairman of the board and retired from Accenture, effective today. 
I am honored to take on the additional role of chairman, said Mr. Nanterme. I want to thank Bill Green, once again, for his tremendous leadership and stewardship of Accenture, and for his significant contributions during his 35-year career with the company. 
Mr. Nanterme, 53, succeeded Mr. Green as CEO in January 2011 and has served on the Accenture board of directors since October 2010. In his 30-year career with Accenture, he has held a wide variety of leadership positions across key parts of the business. Prior to becoming CEO, Mr. Nanterme was group chief executive of Accentures Financial Services operating group, and earlier served as the companys chief leadership officer.
About Accenture
 
Accenture is a global management consulting, technology services and outsourcing company, with approximately 259,000 people serving clients in more than 120 countries. Combining unparalleled experience, comprehensive capabilities across all industries and business functions, and extensive research on the world
s most successful companies, Accenture collaborates with clients to help them become high-performance businesses and governments. The company generated net revenues of US$27.9 billion for the fiscal year ended Aug. 31, 2012. Its home page is
www.accenture.com
.
 
# # #
 
Alex Pachetti
Accenture
+ 917 452-5519
alex.pachetti@accenture.com
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ACN/ACN-8K-20130206165001.txt.gz
TIME:20130206165001
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, DC 20549
____________________ 
Form 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 ____________________
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): February 6, 2013
Accenture plc
(Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter)
 
1 Grand Canal Square,
Grand Canal Harbour,
Dublin 2, Ireland
(Address of principal executive offices)
Registrants telephone number, including area code: (353) (1) 646-2000
Not Applicable
(Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (
see
General Instruction A.2. below):
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
(e) On February 6, 2013, Accenture plc (Accenture) held its 2013 annual general meeting of shareholders (the Annual Meeting). At the Annual Meeting, Accentures shareholders approved an amendment to the Accenture plc 2010 Share Incentive Plan (the Amended 2010 SIP), which had previously been approved by the Board of Directors of Accenture, subject to the approval of its shareholders.
The Amended 2010 SIP is substantially the same as the current Accenture plc 2010 Share Incentive Plan, except that it has been amended to (1) authorize an additional 24 million shares and (2) expressly prohibit the repricing of options and share appreciation rights.
The material features of the Amended 2010 SIP are described in Accentures definitive proxy statement for the Annual Meeting filed on December 17, 2012 (the Proxy Statement), and the description of the plan included in the Proxy Statement is incorporated herein by reference. The above description of the Amended 2010 SIP is qualified in its entirety by reference to the full text of the Amended 2010 SIP, a copy of which is attached hereto as Exhibit 10.
Item 5.07 Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders.
          As indicated above, on February 6, 2013, Accenture held its Annual Meeting. A quorum was present at the meeting as required by Accentures Articles of Association. The immediately following chart sets forth the number of votes cast for and against, and the number of abstention votes and broker non-votes, with respect to each matter voted upon by the shareholders:
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 10
AMENDED AND RESTATED ACCENTURE PLC 2010 SHARE INCENTIVE PLAN
The purpose of the Plan is to aid the Company and its Affiliates in recruiting, retaining and rewarding key employees, directors, consultants or other service providers of outstanding ability and to motivate such employees, directors, consultants or service providers for the Company or an Affiliate to exert their best efforts on behalf of the Company and its Affiliates by providing incentives through the granting of Awards. The Company expects that it will benefit from the added interest which such key employees, directors, consultants or other service providers will have in the welfare of the Company as a result of their proprietary interest in the Company.
The following capitalized terms used in the Plan have the respective meanings set forth in this Section:
 
provided
,
however
, that in the event the granting of an Award requires a different calculation of fair market value in order to comply with local tax regulations, then, for purposes of such Award, the Fair Market Value shall be determined by the Committee in good faith in a manner intended to comply with such local regulations.
 
The total number of Shares that may be used to satisfy Awards under the Plan is 74,000,000. The Shares may consist, in whole or in part, of unissued Shares or previously-issued Shares. The issuance or transfer of Shares or the payment of cash to a Participant upon the exercise or payment of an Award shall reduce the total number of Shares available under the Plan, as applicable. Shares that are subject to Awards that terminate, lapse or are cancelled may again be used to satisfy Awards under the Plan.
The Plan shall be administered by the Committee, which may delegate its duties and powers in whole or in part to any subcommittee thereof consisting solely of at least two individuals who are intended to qualify as Non-Employee Directors within the meaning of Rule 16b-3 under the Act (or any successor rule thereto) and independent directors within the meaning of the New York Stock Exchange or other applicable listed company rules. Additionally, the Committee may delegate the authority to grant Awards under the Plan to any employee or group of employees of the Company or an Affiliate;
provided
that
such delegation and grants are consistent with applicable law and guidelines established by the Board from time to time. The Committee may grant Awards under this Plan only to Participants;
provided
that Awards may also, in the discretion of the Committee, be made under the Plan in assumption of, or in substitution for, outstanding awards previously granted by the Company, its predecessor, Accenture Ltd, or the Companys Affiliates or a company that becomes an Affiliate. The number of Shares underlying such substitute Awards shall be counted against the aggregate number of Shares available for Awards under the Plan. The Committee is authorized to interpret the Plan, to establish, amend and rescind any rules and regulations relating to the Plan, and to make any other determinations that it deems necessary or desirable for the administration of the Plan. The Committee may correct any defect or supply any omission or reconcile any inconsistency in the Plan in the manner and to the extent the Committee deems necessary or desirable. Any decision of the Committee in the interpretation and administration of the Plan, as described herein, shall lie within its sole and absolute discretion and shall be final, conclusive and binding on all parties concerned (including, but not limited to, Participants and their beneficiaries or successors). The Committee shall have the full power and authority to establish the terms and conditions of any Award consistent with the provisions of the Plan and to waive any such terms and conditions at any time (including, without limitation, accelerating or waiving any vesting conditions). The Committee shall require payment of any amount it may determine to be necessary to withhold for federal, state, local or other taxes of any relevant jurisdiction as a result of the granting, vesting or exercise of an Award, the delivery of cash or Shares pursuant to an Award, or upon the sale of Shares acquired by the granting, vesting or exercise of an Award.
No Award may be granted under the Plan after the tenth anniversary of the Board Approval Date, but Awards theretofore granted may extend beyond that date.
Options granted under the Plan shall be, as determined by the Committee, non-qualified stock options or ISOs for United States federal income tax purposes (or other types of Options in jurisdictions outside the United States), as evidenced by the related Award agreements, and shall be subject to the foregoing and the following terms and conditions and to such other terms and conditions, not inconsistent therewith, as the Committee shall determine:
an Award agreement, the purchase price for the Shares as to which an Option is exercised shall be paid in full no later than the time when Shares are delivered following option exercise, with such payment made to the Company (i) in cash or its equivalent (e.g., by check), (ii) to the extent permitted by the Committee, by net-settlement in Shares or by transferring Shares having a Fair Market Value equal to the aggregate Grant Price for the Shares being purchased to a nominee of the Company and satisfying such other requirements as may be imposed by the Committee;
provided
, that such Shares have been held by the Participant for no less than six months (or such other period as established from time to time by the Committee or generally accepted accounting principles), (iii) partly in cash and, to the extent permitted by the Committee, partly in such Shares or (iv) through the delivery of irrevocable instructions to a broker to sell Shares obtained upon the exercise of the Option and deliver promptly to the Company an amount out of the proceeds of such sale equal to the aggregate Grant Price for the Shares being purchased. No Participant shall have any rights to dividends or other rights of a shareholder with respect to Shares subject to an Option until the Participant has given written notice of exercise of the Option, the Participant has paid in full for such Shares, the Shares in question have been registered in the Companys register of shareholders and, if applicable, the Participant has satisfied any other conditions imposed by the Committee pursuant to the Plan.
The Committee, in its sole discretion, may grant Awards of Shares, Awards of restricted Shares, Awards of RSUs and other Awards that are valued in whole or in part by reference to, or are otherwise based on the Fair Market Value of, Shares (
Other Share-Based Awards
). Such Other Share-Based Awards shall be in such form, and dependent on such conditions, as the Committee shall determine, including, without limitation, the right to receive one or more Shares (or the equivalent cash value of such Shares) upon the completion of a specified period of service, the occurrence of an event and/or the attainment of performance objectives. Other Share-Based Awards may be granted alone or in addition to any other Awards granted under the Plan. Subject to the provisions of the Plan, the Committee shall determine: (i) to whom and when Other Share-Based Awards will be made; (ii) the number of Shares to be awarded under (or otherwise related to) such Other Share-Based Awards; (iii) whether such Other
Share-Based Awards shall be settled in cash, Shares or a combination of cash and Shares; and (iv) all other terms and conditions of such Other Share-Based Awards (including, without limitation, the vesting provisions thereof, any required payments to be received from Participants and other provisions ensuring that all Shares so awarded and issued shall be fully paid and non-assessable).
Notwithstanding any other provisions in the Plan to the contrary, the following provisions shall apply to all Awards granted under the Plan:
The granting of an Award under the Plan shall impose no obligation on the Company or any Affiliate to continue the employment or service or consulting relationship of a Participant and shall not lessen or affect the Companys or Affiliates right to terminate the employment or service or consulting relationship of such Participant. No Participant or other person shall have any claim to be granted any Award, and there is no obligation for uniformity of treatment of Participants, or holders or beneficiaries of Awards. The terms and conditions of Awards and the Committees determinations and interpretations with respect thereto need not be the same with respect to each Participant (whether or not such Participants are similarly situated).
The Plan shall be binding on all successors and assigns of the Company and a Participant, including without limitation, the estate of such Participant and the executor, administrator or trustee of such estate, or any receiver or trustee in bankruptcy or representative of the Participants creditors.
Unless otherwise determined by the Committee, an Award shall not be transferable or assignable by the Participant other than by will or by the laws of descent and distribution. An Award exercisable after the death of a Participant may be exercised by the legatees, personal representatives or distributees of the Participant.
The Board may amend, alter or discontinue the Plan, but no amendment, alteration or discontinuation shall be made which (a) without the approval of the shareholders of the Company, would (except as provided in Section 9 of the Plan) increase the total number of Shares reserved for the purposes of the Plan, or (b) without the consent of a Participant, would materially adversely effect any of the rights of the Participant under any Award theretofore granted to such Participant under the Plan;
provided
,
however
, that the Committee may amend the Plan in such manner as it deems necessary to permit Awards to meet the requirements of the Code or other applicable laws.
With respect to Participants who reside or work outside the United States of America, the Committee may, in its sole discretion, amend the terms of the Plan or Awards with respect to such Participants in order to conform such terms with the provisions of local law, and the Committee may, where appropriate, establish one or more sub-plans to reflect such amended or varied provisions.
The Plan shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York without regard to conflicts of laws.
The Plan shall be effective as of the Effective Date.
Notwithstanding other provisions of the Plan or any Award agreements thereunder, no Award shall be granted, deferred, accelerated, extended, paid out or modified under this Plan in a manner that would result in the imposition of an additional tax under Section 409A of the Code upon a Participant. In the event that it is reasonably determined by the Committee that, as a result of Section 409A of the Code, payments in respect of any Award under the Plan may not be made at the time contemplated by the terms of the Plan or the relevant Award agreement, as the case may be, without causing the Participant holding such Award to be subject to taxation under Section 409A of the Code, the Company will make such payment on the first day that would not result in the Participant incurring any tax liability under Section 409A of the Code. If pursuant to the provisions of Section 409A of the Code any distribution or payment is required to be delayed as a result of a Participant being deemed to be a specified employee within the meaning of that term under Section 409A(a)(2)(B) of the Code, then any such distributions or payments under the Plan shall not be made or provided prior to the earlier of (A) the expiration of the six month period measured from the date of the Participants separation from service (as defined under Section 409A of the Code) or (B) the date of the Participants death. The Company shall use commercially reasonable efforts to implement the provisions of this Section 17 in good faith;
provided
that neither the Company, the Committee nor any of the Companys employees, directors or representatives shall have any liability to Participants with respect to this Section 17.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ACN/ACN-8K-20130328073521.txt.gz
TIME:20130328073521
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, DC 20549
____________________ 
Form 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 ____________________
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): March 28, 2013
Accenture plc
(Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter)
 
1 Grand Canal Square,
Grand Canal Harbour,
Dublin 2, Ireland
(Address of principal executive offices)
Registrants telephone number, including area code: (353) (1) 646-2000
Not Applicable
(Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (
see
General Instruction A.2. below):
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition
On March 28, 2013, Accenture plc (Accenture) issued a press release announcing financial results for its second quarter of fiscal year 2013, which fiscal quarter ended on February 28, 2013.
A copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99. All information in the press release is furnished but not filed.
Non-GAAP Financial Information
In the attached press release Accenture discloses the following non-GAAP financial measures:
Reconciliations of these non-GAAP financial measures to the most directly comparable financial measures calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP are included in the press release. While Accentures management believes that this non-GAAP financial information is useful in evaluating Accentures operations, this information should be considered as supplemental in nature and not as a substitute for the related financial information prepared in accordance with GAAP.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) Exhibits
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 99
Accenture Reports Second-Quarter Fiscal 2013 Results
 Revenues increase 4% in both U.S. dollars and local currency, to $7.1 billion 
 
 Record EPS of $1.65 include $0.65 in benefits from final determinations of prior-year tax liabilities and a reduction in reorganization liabilities. Excluding these benefits, EPS are $1.00 
 New bookings are $9.1 billion, with record consulting bookings of $4.4 billion
and outsourcing bookings of $4.7 billion 
 Operating income is $1.16 billion, including a benefit of $224 million from a reduction in reorganization liabilities. Excluding the benefit, operating income is $940 million and operating margin is 13.3%, an expansion of 20 basis points 
 Company declares semi-annual cash dividend of $0.81 per share 
NEW YORK; March 28, 2013  Accenture (NYSE: ACN) reported financial results for the second quarter of fiscal 2013, ended Feb. 28, 2013, with net revenues of $7.1 billion, an increase of 4 percent in both U.S. dollars and local currency over the same period last year and within the companys guided range.
Diluted earnings per share were $1.65, including benefits of $243 million, or $0.34 per share, from final determinations of prior-year tax liabilities and $224 million, or $0.31 per share, from a reduction in reorganization liabilities. Excluding these benefits, diluted earnings per share were $1.00. Reorganization liabilities were established in connection with the companys transition to a corporate structure in 2001.
Operating income for the quarter increased to $1.16 billion, including the benefit of $224 million from the reduction in reorganization liabilities. Excluding the benefit, operating income increased 6 percent, to $940 million, and operating margin expanded 20 basis points, to 13.3 percent.
New bookings for the quarter were $9.1 billion, with record consulting bookings of $4.4 billion and outsourcing bookings of $4.7 billion.
Pierre Nanterme, Accentures chairman and CEO, said, We are pleased with our second-quarter financial results, which were in line with our expectations.  We saw very strong demand for our services, with $9.1 billion in new bookings, including record consulting bookings.  Our revenue growth was within our guided range for the quarter, including a 10 percent local-currency increase in outsourcing.  We also increased operating income and again expanded operating margin, reflecting our continued focus on driving profitable growth.
Our strategy continues to differentiate Accenture in the marketplace, and our excellent bookings in the second quarter further demonstrate that our services are resonating with the needs of our clients.  We remain confident in our ability to seize the opportunities in this fast-changing environment and to continue to deliver tangible business outcomes for our clients and value for our shareholders.
Financial Review
Revenues before reimbursements (net revenues) for the second quarter of fiscal 2013 were $7.1 billion, compared with $6.8 billion for the second quarter of fiscal 2012, an increase of 4 percent in both U.S. dollars and local currency. Net revenues for the quarter were within the companys guided range of $6.9 billion to $7.15 billion, which assumed a foreign-exchange impact of negative 1 percent. Adjusting for the actual foreign-exchange impact of approximately 0 percent in the quarter, the companys guided range for quarterly net revenues would have been $6.96 billion to $7.21 billion.
Diluted EPS for the quarter were $1.65, compared with $0.97 for the second quarter last year, an increase of $0.68. The reorganization benefit and final determinations of prior-year tax liabilities had a positive $0.65 impact on EPS in the second quarter of fiscal 2013.  Excluding these benefits, EPS for the quarter were $1.00, an increase of $0.03 from the second quarter last year.
The $0.68 increase in GAAP EPS reflects:
partially offset by:
Gross margin (gross profit as a percentage of net revenues) for the quarter was 31.6 percent, compared with 31.1 percent for the second quarter last year. Selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses for the second quarter were $1.3 billion, or approximately 18.3 percent of net revenues, compared with $1.2 billion, or approximately 18.0 percent of net revenues, for the second quarter last year.
Operating income for the second quarter was $1.16 billion, or 16.5 percent of net revenues, compared with $889 million, or 13.1 percent of net revenues, for the second quarter of fiscal 2012. Excluding the $224 million reorganization benefit, operating income for the second quarter of fiscal 2013 was $940 million, or 13.3 percent of net revenues, a 20-basis-point expansion from the second quarter of fiscal 2012.
The companys effective tax rate for the quarter was negative 0.5 percent, including the benefit from final determinations of prior-year U.S. federal tax liabilities. The effective tax rate was also impacted by the reorganization benefit, which increased income before income taxes without any increase in income tax expense. Excluding these benefits, the effective tax rate for the second quarter of fiscal 2013 was 24.8 percent, compared with 20.5 percent for the second quarter last year.
Net income for the quarter was $1.19 billion, compared with $714 million for the second quarter last year, and includes the favorable impact of both the $224 million reorganization benefit and $243 million from final determinations of prior-year tax liabilities.
Operating cash flow for the quarter was $634 million, and property and equipment additions were $90 million. Free cash flow, defined as operating cash flow net of property and equipment additions, was $544 million. For the same period last year, operating cash flow was $858 million; property and equipment additions were $85 million; and free cash flow was $772 million.
Days services outstanding, or DSOs, were 31 days, compared with 27 days at Aug. 31, 2012 and 29 days at Feb. 29, 2012.
Accentures total cash balance at Feb. 28, 2013 was $5.6 billion, compared with $6.6 billion at Aug. 31, 2012.
Utilization for the quarter was 88 percent, compared with 88 percent for the first quarter of fiscal 2013 and 87 percent for the second quarter of fiscal 2012. Attrition for the second quarter of fiscal 2013 was 11 percent, compared with 11 percent for the first quarter of fiscal 2013 and 12 percent for the second quarter of fiscal 2012.
New Bookings
New bookings for the second quarter were $9.1 billion and reflect zero foreign-exchange impact compared with new bookings in the second quarter last year.
Net Revenues by Operating Group
Net revenues by operating group were as follows:
Net Revenues by Geographic Region
Net revenues by geographic region were as follows:
Returning Cash to Shareholders
Accenture continues to return cash to shareholders through cash dividends and share repurchases.
Dividend
    
Accenture plc has declared a semi-annual cash dividend of $0.81 per share on Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares for shareholders of record at the close of business on April 12, 2013, and Accenture SCA will declare a semi-annual cash dividend of $0.81 per share on Accenture SCA Class I common shares for shareholders of record at the close of business on April 9, 2013. These dividends are both payable on May 15, 2013.
Combined with the semi-annual cash dividend of $0.81 per share paid on Nov. 15, 2012, this will bring the total dividend payments for the fiscal year to $1.62 per share, for total projected cash dividend payments of approximately $1.1 billion.
Share Repurchase Activity
During the second quarter of fiscal 2013, Accenture repurchased or redeemed 8.8 million shares, including 5.5 million shares repurchased in the open market, for a total of $609 million. This brings Accentures total share repurchases and redemptions for the first half of fiscal 2013 to 12.1 million shares, including 6.1 million shares repurchased in the open market, for a total of $830 million.
Accentures total remaining share repurchase authority at Feb. 28, 2013 was approximately $3.6 billion.
At Feb. 28, 2013, Accenture had approximately 693 million total shares outstanding, including 650 million Accenture plc Class A ordinary shares and 43 million Accenture SCA Class I common shares and Accenture Canada Holdings Inc. exchangeable shares.
Business Outlook
Third Quarter Fiscal 2013
Accenture expects net revenues for the third quarter of fiscal 2013 to be in the range of $7.25 billion to $7.50 billion.  This range assumes a foreign-exchange impact of negative 2.5 percent compared with the third quarter of fiscal 2012.
Full Fiscal Year 2013 
For fiscal 2013, the company now expects net revenue growth to be in the lower half of its previously guided range of 5 percent to 8 percent in local currency. 
Accentures business outlook for the full 2013 fiscal year continues to assume a foreign-exchange impact of negative 1 percent compared with fiscal 2012.
The company now expects diluted EPS for fiscal 2013 to be in the range of $4.89 to $4.97, reflecting the $0.65 in benefits related to final determinations of prior-year tax liabilities and the reduction in reorganization liabilities in the second quarter.  Excluding these benefits, the company continues to expect EPS in the range of $4.24 to $4.32.
Accenture now expects operating margin for the full fiscal year to be in the range of 14.9 percent to 15.0 percent, including the estimated full-year positive impact of 80 basis points from the reduction in reorganization liabilities in the second quarter.  Excluding this impact, Accenture continues to expect operating margin for the full fiscal year to be in the range of 14.1 percent to 14.2 percent, an expansion of 20 to 30 basis points.   
The company continues to expect operating cash flow to be in the range of $3.2 billion to $3.5 billion; now expects property and equipment additions to be approximately $400 million; and continues to expect free cash flow to be in the range of $2.8 billion to $3.1 billion. 
The company continues to expect to return at least $3.3 billion to its shareholders in fiscal 2013 through dividends and share repurchases. 
The company now expects its annual effective tax rate to be in the range of 19 percent to 20 percent, including the estimated full-year reduction of approximately 7 percentage points from benefits related to the final determinations of prior-year tax liabilities and the reduction in reorganization liabilities in the second quarter.  Excluding these benefits, Accenture continues to expect its annual effective tax rate to be in the range of 26 percent to 27 percent.
Accenture continues to target new bookings for fiscal 2013 in the range of $31 billion to $34 billion.
Conference Call and Webcast Details
Accenture will host a conference call at 8:00 a.m. EDT today to discuss its second-quarter fiscal 2013 financial results. To participate, please dial +1 (800) 230-1085 [+1 (612) 234-9960
outside the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada] approximately 15 minutes before the scheduled start of the call. The conference call will also be accessible live on the Investor Relations section of the Accenture Web site at
www.accenture.com
.
A replay of the conference call will be available online at www.accenture.com beginning at 10:30 a.m. EDT today, Thursday, March 28, and continuing until Thursday, June 27, 2013. A podcast of the conference call will be available online at www.accenture.com beginning approximately 24 hours after the call and continuing until Thursday, June 27. The replay will also be available via telephone by dialing +1 (800) 475-6701 [+1 (320) 365-3844 outside the United States, Puerto Rico and Canada] and entering access code 282767 from 10:30 a.m. EDT today, Thursday, March 28, through Thursday, June 27.
About Accenture
Accenture is a global management consulting, technology services and outsourcing company, with approximately 261,000 people serving clients in more than 120 countries. Combining unparalleled experience, comprehensive capabilities across all industries and business functions, and extensive research on the worlds most successful companies, Accenture collaborates with clients to help them become high-performance businesses and governments.  The company generated net revenues of US$27.9 billion for the fiscal year ended Aug. 31, 2012. Its home page is
www.accenture.com
.
Non-GAAP Financial Information
 
This news release includes certain non-GAAP financial information as defined by Securities and Exchange Commission Regulation G. Pursuant to the requirements of this regulation, reconciliations of this non-GAAP financial information to Accentures financial statements as prepared under generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) are included in this press release. Financial results in local currency are calculated by restating current-period activity into U.S. dollars using the comparable prior-year periods foreign-currency exchange rates. Accentures management believes providing investors with this information gives additional insights into Accentures results of operations. While Accentures management believes that the non-GAAP financial measures herein are useful in evaluating Accentures operations, this information should be considered as supplemental in nature and not as a substitute for the related financial information prepared in accordance with GAAP.
Forward-Looking Statements
Except for the historical information and discussions contained herein, statements in this news release may constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Words such as may, will, should, likely, anticipates, expects, intends, plans, projects, believes, estimates, positioned, outlook and similar expressions are used to identify these forward-looking statements. These statements involve a number of risks, uncertainties and other factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed or implied. These include, without limitation, risks that: the companys results of operations could be adversely affected by volatile, negative or uncertain economic conditions and the effects of these conditions on the companys clients businesses and levels of business activity; the companys business depends on generating and maintaining ongoing, profitable client demand for the companys services and solutions, and a significant reduction in such demand could materially affect the companys results of operations; if the company is unable to keep its supply of skills and resources in balance with client demand around the world and attract and retain professionals with strong leadership skills, the companys business, the utilization rate of the companys professionals and the companys results of operations may be materially adversely affected; the markets in which the company competes are highly competitive, and the company might not be able to compete effectively; the company could have liability or the companys reputation could be damaged if the company fails to protect client and/or company data or information systems as obligated by law or contract or if the companys information systems are breached; as a result of the companys geographically diverse operations and its growth strategy to continue geographic expansion, the company is more susceptible to certain risks; the companys Global Delivery Network is increasingly concentrated in India and the Philippines, which may
expose it to operational risks; the companys results of operations could materially suffer if the company is not able to obtain sufficient pricing to enable it to meet its profitability expectations; if the companys pricing estimates do not accurately anticipate the cost, risk and complexity of the company performing its work or third parties upon whom it relies do not meet their commitments, then the companys contracts could have delivery inefficiencies and be unprofitable; the companys work with government clients exposes the company to additional risks inherent in the government contracting environment; the companys business could be materially adversely affected if the company incurs legal liability in connection with providing its services and solutions; the companys results of operations could be materially adversely affected by fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates; the companys results of operations and ability to grow could be materially negatively affected if the company cannot adapt and expand its services and solutions in response to ongoing changes in technology and offerings by new entrants; the companys alliance relationships may not be successful or may change, which could adversely affect the companys results of operations; outsourcing services and the continued expansion of the companys other services and solutions into new areas subject the company to different operational risks than its consulting and systems integration services; the companys services or solutions could infringe upon the intellectual property rights of others or the company might lose its ability to utilize the intellectual property of others; the company has only a limited ability to protect its intellectual property rights, which are important to the companys success; the companys ability to attract and retain business and employees may depend on its reputation in the marketplace; the company might not be successful at identifying, acquiring or integrating businesses or entering into joint ventures; the companys profitability could suffer if its cost-management strategies are unsuccessful, and the company may not be able to improve its profitability through improvements to cost-management to the degree it has done in the past; many of the companys contracts include payments that link some of its fees to the attainment of performance or business targets and/or require the company to meet specific service levels, which could increase the variability of the companys revenues and impact its margins; changes in the companys level of taxes, and audits, investigations and tax proceedings, or changes in the companys treatment as an Irish company, could have a material adverse effect on the companys results of operations and financial condition; if the company is unable to manage the organizational challenges associated with its size, the company might be unable to achieve its business objectives; if the company is unable to collect its receivables or unbilled services, the companys results of operations, financial condition and cash flows could be adversely affected; the companys share price and results of operations could fluctuate and be difficult to predict; the companys results of operations and share price could be adversely affected if it is unable to maintain effective internal controls; the company may be subject to criticism and negative publicity related to its incorporation in Ireland; as well as the risks, uncertainties and other factors discussed under the Risk Factors heading in Accenture plcs most recent annual report on Form 10-K and other documents filed with or furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission. Statements in this news release speak only as of the date they were made, and Accenture undertakes no duty to update any forward-looking statements made in this news release or to conform such statements to actual results or changes in Accentures expectations.
###
 
Contact:
 
Roxanne Taylor
Accenture
+1 (917) 452-5106
roxanne.taylor@accenture.com
ACCENTURE PLC
CONSOLIDATED INCOME STATEMENTS
(In thousands of U.S. dollars, except share and per share amounts)
(Unaudited)
_______________
ACCENTURE PLC
SUMMARY OF REVENUES
(In thousands of U.S. dollars)
(Unaudited)
_________
n/m = not meaningful
ACCENTURE PLC
For the Three Months Ended February 28, 2013 and February 29, 2012
(In thousands of U.S. dollars)
(Unaudited)
OPERATING INCOME BY OPERATING GROUP
RECONCILIATION OF NET INCOME AND DILUTED EARNINGS PER SHARE, AS REPORTED (GAAP), TO NET INCOME
AND
DILUTED EARNINGS PER SHARE, AS ADJUSTED (NON-GAAP)
________
ACCENTURE PLC
For the Six Months Ended February 28, 2013 and February 29, 2012
(In thousands of U.S. dollars)
(Unaudited)
OPERATING INCOME BY OPERATING GROUP
RECONCILIATION OF NET INCOME AND DILUTED EARNINGS PER SHARE, AS REPORTED (GAAP), TO NET INCOME
AND
DILUTED EARNINGS PER SHARE, AS ADJUSTED (NON-GAAP)
________
ACCENTURE PLC
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
(In thousands of U.S. dollars)
 
ACCENTURE PLC
CONSOLIDATED CASH FLOWS STATEMENTS
(In thousands of U.S. dollars)
(Unaudited)


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ACN/ACN-8K-20130328083107.txt.gz
TIME:20130328083107
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, DC 20549
____________________ 
Form 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 ____________________
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): March 22, 2013
Accenture plc
(Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter)
 
1 Grand Canal Square,
Grand Canal Harbour,
Dublin 2, Ireland
(Address of principal executive offices)
Registrants telephone number, including area code: (353) (1) 646-2000
Not Applicable
(Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (
see
General Instruction A.2. below):
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On March 28, 2013, Accenture plc (Accenture or the Company) announced that Pamela J. Craig will step down as the Companys chief financial officer on July 1, 2013 and retire from the Company on August 31, 2013. David P. Rowland will be
come chief financial officer, effective July 1, 2013.
Mr. Rowland, 52, is currently senior vice presidentFinance, with global responsibility for Accentures Finance Operations, which includes approximately 3,500 finance professionals focused on client finance, country controllership and operating group and growth platform finance activities. He has served in this role since October 2006. He is a member of Accentures Global Management Committee and serves on the board of directors for Avanade, a joint venture of Accenture and Microsoft.  Mr. Rowland began his career with Accenture in 1983.
No determination regarding compensation arrangements relating to Mr. Rowlands promotion to chief financial officer has been made as of the date of filing of this Current Report on Form 8-K.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) The following exhibits are attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 99
Pamela J. Craig to Step Down as Accenture Chief Financial Officer,
Accenture Veteran David P. Rowland Named Chief Financial Officer,
Changes Effective July 1, 2013
NEW YORK; March 28, 2013 - Accenture (NYSE: ACN) announced today that Pamela J. Craig has decided to step down as chief financial officer on July 1 and retire from the company on Aug. 31, 2013.  David P. Rowland, senior vice presidentFinance, will become chief financial officer, effective July 1, 2013.
Pam has made a tremendous contribution to Accentures growth and success across a wide range of leadership roles during her 34-year career with our company, said Chairman & CEO Pierre Nanterme.  As chief financial officer, she built a world-class finance organization and her focus on rigorous financial discipline has contributed to Accentures strong performance.  As a key member of our senior leadership for many years, Pam has played an instrumental role working together with the rest of the leadership team in driving our growth and success in the marketplace.  It has been my pleasure to work with her over the years, especially since becoming CEO.
I am delighted that David Rowland will become our new CFO. David brings to the role long-standing financial and operational leadership at Accenture, and has a deep understanding of our business.  I have known David for many years, and I know that he is absolutely committed to ensuring that we continue to create value for our clients and our shareholders.
Mr. Rowland, 52, is currently senior vice presidentFinance, with global responsibility for Accentures Finance Operations, which includes approximately 3,500 finance professionals focused on client finance, country controllership and operating group and growth platform finance activities.  He is a member of Accentures Global Management Committee and serves on the board of directors for Avanade, a joint venture of Accenture and Microsoft.  Mr. Rowland began his career with Accenture in 1983.
About Accenture
 
Accenture is a global management consulting, technology services and outsourcing company, with approximately 261,000 people serving clients in more than 120 countries. Combining unparalleled experience, comprehensive capabilities across all industries and business functions, and extensive research on the worlds most successful companies, Accenture collaborates with clients to help them become high-performance businesses and governments.  The company generated net revenues of US$27.9 billion for the fiscal year ended Aug. 31, 2012. Its home page is
www.accenture.com
.
###
 
Contact:
 
Roxanne Taylor
Accenture
+1 (917) 452-5106
roxanne.taylor@accenture.com
Pamela J. Craig Bio
David P. Rowland Bio
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ACN/ACN-8K-20130430162037.txt.gz
TIME:20130430162037
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, DC 20549
____________________ 
Form 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 ____________________
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): April 24, 2013
Accenture plc
(Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter)
 
1 Grand Canal Square,
Grand Canal Harbour,
Dublin 2, Ireland
(Address of principal executive offices)
Registrants telephone number, including area code: (353) (1) 646-2000
Not Applicable
(Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (
see
General Instruction A.2. below):
Item 5.02
    
Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
In connection with the previously announced retirement of Pamela J. Craig, chief financial officer of Accenture plc (Accenture), the Board of Directors (the Board) of Accenture determined on April 24, 2013 to waive the remaining service-based vesting conditions for a portion of Ms. Craigs previously granted outstanding equity awards. These waivers apply to 27,278 time-vested restricted stock units, which were granted for her past performance, under the 2011, 2012 and 2013 Senior Officer Performance Equity Award Programs, and to 28,591 (assuming target performance) performance-vested restricted share units under the 2012 and 2013 Key Executive Performance Share Programs that are not otherwise scheduled to vest on or prior to her retirement. An additional number of shares could be earned as dividend equivalents in accordance with Ms. Craigs equity award agreements. Although the Board waived the remaining service-based vesting conditions for the awards under the Key Executive Performance Share Programs, the vesting for each award will occur only to the extent that Accentures performance objectives are met over the three-year performance period for each award, with the actual number of shares (which may be below, at or above target) determined based on Accentures cumulative performance over the relevant performance period.
In connection with Ms. Craigs retirement, the Board also determined that in lieu of any awards of restricted stock units under the Senior Officer Performance Equity Award Program and Accenture Leadership Equity Award Program, which would be intended to reward Ms. Craig for her performance in fiscal 2013, Ms. Craig should instead receive an equivalent cash payment for her fiscal 2013 performance in an amount to be established at the time that the award of restricted stock units to the other named executive officers is determined.
In addition, Ms. Craig will receive office space with administrative support for her use after retirement, until December 31, 2013.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
